CHAPTER I.
Unfoldunfoldthe day is going fast,
And I would know this old time history.
The
clouds were gathering fastthe waters were
troubledand the approaching tumult and disquiet of
all things in Carolina, clearly indicated the coming of
that strife, so soon to overcast the sceneso long to
keep it darkenedso deeply to impurple it with blood.
The continentals were approaching rapidly, and the
effect was that of magic upon the long prostrated
energies
of the South. The people were aroused,
awakened
,
stimulated, and emboldened. They gathered in
little squads throughout the country. The news was
generally abroad that Gates was to command the
expected
armyGates, the conqueror at Saratoga, whose
very name, at that time, was a host. The successes of
Sumter in the up-country, of Marion on the Peedee, of
Pickens with a troop of mounted riflemena new
species
of force projected by himselfof Butler, of
Horry
,
James, and others, were generally whispered about
among the hitherto desponding whigs. These
encouraging
prospects were not a little strengthened in
the parishes by rumours of small successes nearer at
hand. The swamps were now believed to be full of
enemies to royal power, only wanting imbodiment and
arms; and truly did Tarleton, dilating upon the
condition
of things at this period in the colony, give a
melancholy summary of those influences which were
crowding together, as it was fondly thought by the
patriots, for the overwhelming of foreign domination.
Discontentsaccording to his narrativewere
disseminatedsecret conspiracies entered into upon
the frontierhostilities were already begun in many
places, and every thing seemed to menace a revolution
as rapid as that which succeeded the surrender of
Charlestown. The storm grew more imposing in its
terrors, when, promising himself confidently a march
of triumph through the country, Gates, in a swelling
proclamation, announced his assumption of command
over the southern army. It was a promise sadly
disappointed
in the endyet the effect was instantaneous;
and with the knowledge of his arrival, the entire Black
River country was in insurrection. This was the
province of Marion, and to his active persuasion and
influence the outbreak must chiefly be ascribed. But
the influence of events upon other sections was not
less immediate, though less overt and important in
their development. The fermenting excitement, which,
in men's minds, usually precedes the action of
powerful
,
because long suppressed, elements of mischief, had
reached its highest point of forbearance. The
immediately
impelling power was alone wanting, and this is
always to be found in that restless love of change,
growing with its facilities, which forms so legitimate a
portion of our original nature. There is a wholesome
stir in strife itself, which, like the thunderstorm in the
sluggish atmosphere, imparts a renewed energy, and a
better condition of health and exercise, to the attributes
and agents of the moral man.
These old woods about Dorchester are famous.
There is not a wagon tracknot a defilenot a
clearing
not
a traverse of these plains, which has not
been consecrated by the strife for liberty; the close
strifethe desperate struggle; the contest, unrelaxing,
unyielding to the last, save only with death or conquest.
These old trees have looked down upon blood and
battles; the thick array and the solitary combat between
A 2
single foes, needing no other witnesses. What tales
might they not tell us! The sands have drunk deeply
of holy and hallowed bloodblood that gave them
value and a name, and made for them a place in all
human recollection. The grass here has been beaten
down, in successive seasons, by heavy feetby
conflicting
horsemenby driving and recoiling artillery.
Its deep green has been dyed with a yet deeper and a
darker stainthe outpourings of the invader's veins,
mingling with the generous streams flowing from
bosoms that had but one hopebut one purposethe
unpolluted freedom and security of home; the purity
of the threshold, the sweet repose of the domestic
hearth from the intrusion of hostile feetthe only
objects, for which men may brave the stormy and the
brutal strife, and still keep the whiteness of their
souls.
The Carolinian well knows these old-time places;
for every acre has its tradition in this neighbourhood.
He rides beneath the thick oaks, whose branches have
covered regiments, and looks up to them with regardful
veneration. Well he remembers the old defile at the
entrance just above Dorchester village, where a red clay
hill rises abruptly, breaking pleasantly the dead level
of country all around it. The rugged limbs and trunk
of a huge oak, which hung above its brow, and has been
but recently overthrown, was of itself his historian. It
was notorious in tradition as the gallows oak; its
limbs being employed by both parties, as they
severrally
obtained the ascendency, for the purposes of
summary execution. Famous, indeed, was all the
partisan warfare in this neighbourhood, from the time
of its commencement, with our story, in 1780, to the
day, when, hopeless of their object, the troops of the
invader
withdrew to their crowded vessels, flying from the
land they had vainly struggled to subdue. You should
hear the old housewives dilate upon these transactions.
You should hear them paint the disasters, the
depression
of the Carolinians! how their chief city was
besieged and taken; their little army dispersed or cut
to pieces; and how the invader marched over the
country
,
and called it his. Anon, they would show you the
little gathering in the swampthe small scouting squad
timidly stealing forth into the plain, and contenting
itself
with cutting off a foraging party or a baggage
wagon, or rescuing a disconsolate group of captives on
their way to the city and the prison-ships. Soon,
imboldened
by success, the little squad is increased by
numbers, and aims at larger game. Under some such
leader as Colonel Washington, you should see them,
anon, well mounted, streaking along the Ashley river
road, by the peep of day, well skilled in the
management
of their steeds, whose high necks beautifully
arch under the curb, while, in obedience to their rider's
will, they plunge fearlessly through brake and through
brier, over the fallen tree, and into the suspicious
water. Heedless of all things but the proper
achievement
of their bold adventure, the warriors go onward,
while the broadswords flash in the sunlight, and the
trumpet cheers them with a tone of victory. And
goodlier still is the sight, when, turning the narrow lane,
thick fringed with the scrubby oak and the pleasant
myrtle, you behold them come suddenly to the
encounter
with the hostile invaders. How they hurra, and
rush to the charge with a mad emotion that the steed
partakeshis ears erect, and his nostrils distended,
while his eyeballs start forward, and grow red with
the straining effort; then, how the riders bear down all
before them, and, with swords shooting out from their
cheeks, make nothing of the upraised bayonet and
pointed spear, but, striking in, flank and front, carry
confusion
wherever they gowhile the hot sands drink in
the life-blood of friend and foe, streaming through a
thousand wounds. Hear them tell of these, and of the
Game Cock, Sumter; how, always ready for fight,
with a valour which was frequently rashness, he
would rush into the hostile ranks, and, with his
powerful frame and sweeping sabre, would single out
for inveterate strife his own particular enemy. Then,
of the subtle Swamp Fox, Marion, who, slender
of form, and having but little confidence in his own
physical prowess, was never seen to use his sword in
battle; gaining by stratagem and unexpected enterprise
those advantages which his usual inferiority of force
would never have permitted him to gain otherwise.
They will tell you of his conduct and his coolness;
of his ability, with small means, to consummate
leading
objectsthe best proof of military talent; and of
his wonderful command of his men; how they would
do his will, though it led to the most perilous
adventure
,
with as much alacrity as if they were going to a
banquet. Of the men themselves, though in rags,
almost starving, and exposed to all changes of the
weather, how cheerfully, in the fastenesses of the swamp,
they would sing their rude song about the capacity of
their leader and their devotion to his person, in some
such strain as that which follows:
THE SWAMP FOX.
I.
We follow where the Swamp Fox guides,
His friends and merry men are we;
And when the troop of Tarleton rides,
We burrow in the cypress tree.
The turfy tussock is our bed,
Our home is in the red-deer's den,
Our roof, the tree-top overhead,
For we are wild and hunted men.
II.
We fly by day, and shun its light;
But, prompt to strike the sudden blow,
We mount, and start with early night,
And through the forest track our foe.
And soon he hears our chargers leap,
The flashing sabre blinds his eyes,
And ere he drives away his sleep,
And rushes from his camp, he dies.
III.
Free bridle-bit, good gallant steed,
That will not ask a kind caress,
To swim the Santee at our need,
When on his heels the foemen press
The true heart and the ready hand,
The spirit, stubborn to be free
The twisted bore, the smiting brand
And we are Marion's men, you see.
IV.
Now light the fire, and cook the meal,
The last, perhaps, that we shall taste;
I hear the Swamp Fox round us steal,
And that's a sign we move in haste.
He whistles to the scouts, and hark!
You hear his order calm and low
Come, wave your torch across the dark,
And let us see the boys that go.
V.
We may not see their forms again.
God help 'em, should they find the strife!
For they are strong and fearless men,
And make no coward terms for life:
They'll fight as long as Marion bids,
And when he speaks the word to shy,
Thennot till thenthey turn their steeds,
Through thickening shade and swamp to fly.
VI.
Now stir the fire, and lie at ease,
The scouts are gone, and on the brush
I see the colonel bend his knees,
To take his slumbers toobut hush!
He's praying, comrades: 'tis not strange;
The man that's fighting day by day,
May well, when night comes, take a change,
And down upon his knees to pray.
VII.
Break up that hoecake, boys, and hand
The sly and silent jug that's there;
I love not it should idle stand,
When Marion's men have need of cheer.
'Tis seldom that our luck affords
A stuff like this we just have quaffed,
And dry potatoes on our boards
May always call for such a draught.
VIII.
Now pile the brush and roll the log;
Hard pillow, but a soldier's head,
That's half the time in brake and bog,
Must never think of softer bed.
The owl is hooting to the night,
The cooter crawling o'er the bank,
And in that pond the plashing light,
Tells where the alligator sank.
IX.
What'tis the signal! start so soon,
And through the Santee swamp so deep,
Without the aid of friendly moon,
And we, Heaven help us, half asleep!
But courage, comrades, Marion leads,
The Swamp Fox takes us out to-night;
So clear your swords, and coax your steeds,
There's goodly chance, I think, of fight.
X.
We follow where the Swamp Fox guides,
We leave the swamp and cypress tree,
Our spurs are in our coursers' sides,
And ready for the strife are we
The tory camp is now in sight,
And there he cowers within his den
He hears our shout, he dreads the fight,
He fears, and flies from Marion's men.
And gallant men they weretaught by his precept
and example, their own peculiar deeds grow famous in
our story. Each forester became in time an adroit
partisan; learned to practise a thousand stratagems,
and most generally with a perfect success.
Imbedding
himself in the covering leaves and branches of
the thick-limbed tree, he would lie in wait till the fall
of evening; then, dropping suddenly upon the shoulders
of the sentry as he paced beneath, would drive the
keen knife into his heart, before he could yet recover
from his panic. Again, he would burrow in the hollow
of the miry ditch, and crawling, Indian fashion, into
the trench, wait patiently until the soldier came into
the moonlight, when the silver drop at his rifle's
muzzle
fell with fatal accuracy upon his button, or his
breastplate, and the sharp sudden crack which
followed
almost invariably announced the victim's long
sleep of death. And numerous besides were the
practices
,
of which tradition and history alike agree to tell
us, adopted in the war of our revolution by the
Carolina
partisan, to neutralize the superiority of European
force and tactics. Often and again have they lain
close to the gushing spring, and silent in the bush,
like the tiger in his jungle, awaiting until the foragers
had squatted around it for the enjoyment of their
midday
meal; then, rushing forth with a fierce halloo,
seize upon the stacked arms, and beat down the
surprised
but daring soldiers who might rise up to defend
them. And this sort of warfare, small though it may
appear, was at last triumphant. The successes of the
whigs, during the whole period of the revolutionary
contest in the South, were almost entirely the result of
the rapid, unexpected movementthe sudden stroke
made by the little troop, familiar with its ground,
knowing its object, and melting away at the approach
of a superior enemy, like so many dusky shadows,
secure in the thousand swamp recesses which
surrounded
them. Nor did they rely always on stratagem
in the prosecution of their enterprises. There were
gleams of chivalry thrown athwart this sombre waste
of strife and bloodshed, worthy of the middle ages.
Bold and graceful riders, with fine horses, ready in all
cases, fierce in onset, and reckless in valour, the
southern cavalry had an early renown. The audacity
with which they drove through the forest, through
broad rivers, such as the Santee, by day and by night,
in the face of the enemy, whether in flight or in
assault
the same, makes their achievements as worthy of
romance as those of a Bayard or Bernardo.
Thousands
of instances are recorded of that individual
gallantry
that
gallantry, stimulated by courage, warmed
by enthusiasm, and refined by courtesywhich gives
the only credentials of true chivalry. Such, among the
many, was the rescue of the prisoners, by Jasper and
Newton; the restoration of the flagstaff to Fort
Moultrie
,
in the hottest fire, by the former; and the manner
in which he got his death-wound at Savannah, in
carrying
off the colours which had been instrusted to him.
Such were many of the rash achievements of Sumter
and Laurens, and such was the daring of the brave
Conyers, who daily challenged his enemy in the face
of the hostile army. These were all partisan
warriors
,
and such were their characteristics. Let us now
return to the narration of those adventures, which
distinguish
the life of some, not unworthy to be ranked
honourably among them.
CHAPTER II.
Now, yield thee up thy chargedelay and die
I may not spare thee in a quest like this,
But strike even while I speak.
Aided
by his new recruits, Humphries brought his
prisoner to camp with little difficulty. The worthy
serjeant, it is true, did at first offer resistance; he
mouthed and struggled, as the bandages compressed
his mouth, and the ligatures restrained his arms; but
the timely application of hand and foot, which his
captors did not hesitate to employ to compel obedience,
not to speak of the threatening aspect of the dagger,
which the much roused lieutenant held more than
once to his throat, brought him to reason, and
counselled
that wholesome resignation to circumstances,
which, though not always easy and pleasant of
adoption
,
is, at least, on most occasions, well becoming
in him who has few alternatives. He was,
therefore
,
soon mounted, along with one of the troopers, on
horseback; and in a state of most commendable
quietness
,
he reached, after an hour's quick riding, the
encampment
at Bacon's bridge. There, well secured
with a stout rope, and watched by the guard assigned
for the other prisoners, close in the thick and knotty
wood, which girdled the swamp, we will at present
leave him.
Singleton had well concealed his little squadron in
the same shelter. Like a true partisan, he had
omitted
no precautions. His scouts were out in all
directions
men
that he could trustand his sentries
watched both sides of the river. The position which
he had chosen was one established by General
Moultrie
in the previous season. It had been vacated
when the brave old warrior was called to league his
troops with those of Lincoln, in defence of the city.
The intrenchments and barracks were in good order,
but Singleton studiously avoided their use; and, to
the thoughtless wayfarer passing by the little fort and
the clumsy blockhouse, nothing could possibly have
looked more pacific. The partisan, though
immediately
at hand, preferred a less ostentatious position;
and we find Singleton, accordingly, close clustering
with his troop in the deep wood that lay behind it.
Here, for a brief period at least, his lurking-place was
secure, and he only desired it for a few days longer.
Known to the enemy, he could not have held it, even
for a time so limited, but would have been compelled
to rapid flight, or a resort to the deeper shadows and
fastnesses of the swamp. At this point the river
ceased to be navigable even for the common poleboats
of the country; and this was another source of its
security. Filled up by crowding treesthe gloomy
cypresses striding boldly into its very bosomit slunk
away into shade and silence, winding and broken, after
a brief effort at a concentrated course, into numberless
little bayous and indentures, muddy creeks,
stagnating
ponds, miry holes, and a region, throughout, only
pregnable by desperation, and only loved by the fierce
and filthy reptile, the ominous bird, the subtle fox, and
venomous serpent. This region, immediately at hand,
promised a safe place of retreat, for a season, to the
adventurous partisan; and in its gloomy recesses he
well knew that, unless guided by a genuine
swamp-sucker
,
all Europe might vainly seek to find the little
force, so easily concealed, which he now
commanded
.
Humphries soon furnished his commander with all
the intelligence he had obtained at Dorchester. He
gave a succinct account of the affair of Mother Blonay,
and her visit to the villageof the movement of Huck
to assail him on the Stonoeand of the purpose of the
tory to proceed onward, by the indirect route already
mentioned, to join with Tarleton on the Catawba. The
latter particulars had been furnished the lieutenant by
Vol. II.B
the two troopers who had joined him. The whole
account determined Singleton to hurry his own
movement
to join with Marion. That part of the narrative
of Humphries relating to Mother Blonay, decided the
commander to keep Goggle still a prisoner, as one not
to be trusted. Giving orders, therefore, for his
continued
detention, he proceeded to put things in
readiness
for the movement of the squad, with nightfall, to
their old and better shelter on the little island in the
Cypress Swamp. This done, Singleton commanded
his horse in readiness, and bidding the boy Lance
Frampton in attendance, despatched him to prepare his
own. To Humphries he now gave charge of the
trooprepeated his orders to move with the dusk to
their old quartersand, having informed the lieutenant
of the true object of his own adventure, he set forth,
only attended by the boy Frampton, taking an upper
road leading towards the Santee. That object may as
well be told now as ever. Singleton had been for
some time awaiting intelligence of Marion's movement
to Nelson's ferry. A courier had been looked for
daily, since he had left his leader; and as, in these
suspicious times, every precaution in the conveyance
and receipt of intelligence was necessary, it
followed
that many difficulties lay in the way of its
transmission
.
Men met on the highways, to fear, to avoid,
and frequently to fight with one another. They
assumed
contrary characters in the presence of the
stranger, and the play at cross-purposes, even among
friends, was the frequent consequence of a
misunderstood
position.
There were signs and phrases agreed upon between
Marion and his trusted men, mysterious or unmeaning
to all besides, which Singleton was not permitted to
impart to others. This necessity prompted him forth,
if possible, to meet with the expected courier, bearing
him his ordershaving attached the younger
Frampton
to his person: he chose him as too young for
treason
,
and, indeed, he wanted no better companion to
accompany him on his ramble. Setting forth by
noonday
,
he kept boldly along the common Ashley river or
Dorchester road, as, winding in accordance with the
course of the stream, it carried him above and
completely
around the spot chosen for his camp in the
Cypress.
They saw but little, for some time, to attract them
in this ramble. They traversed the defile of thick
oaks, which form so large a part of the scenery of that
region; then into the same pine-land track they pushed
their way. Cheerless quite, bald of home and
habitation
,
they saw nothing throughout the melancholy
waste more imposing than the plodding negro, with
his staff in hand, and with white teeth peering through
his thick, flagging lips, in a sort of deferential smile,
at their approach. Sometimes, touched with the
apprehensions
of the time, he too would start away as
he beheld them, and they might see him, as they looked
backward, cautiously watching their progress from
behind the pine-tree, or the crumbling fence.
Occasionally
they came to a dwelling in ruins, or burnt
the cornfield scorched and blackened with the recent
fire, the fences overthrown, and the cows, almost wild,
having free possession, and staring wildly upon them
as they drew nigh.
And this is war! said Singleton, musingly. This
is warthe merciless, the devastating war! Oh, my
country, when wilt thou be free from invasionwhen
will thy people come back to these deserted dwellings
when will the corn flourish green along these stricken
and blasted fields, without danger from the trampling
horse, and the wanton and devouring fire? When
oh, when?
He spoke almost unconsciously, but was recalled to
himself, as, wondering at what he heard, the peering
eyes of Lance Frampton, as he rode up beside him,
perused keenly the unusually sad expression of his
countenance. Singleton noted his gaze, and, without
rebuking it, addressed him with a question concerning
his father, who had been missing from the troop ever
since the affair with Travis.
Lance, have you heard nothing of your father
since I last asked you about him?
Nothing, sir; nothing at all, since we left the
Cypress.
You saw him not, then, at our departure?
No, sir; but I heard him laugh long after I
missed him from the troop. He couldn't have been
far off, sir, when we came out of the swamp; though
I didn't see him then, and I didn't want to see him.
Why not, boy?your father, too!
Why, sir, father is strange sometimes, and then
we never talk to him or trouble him, and he don't want
people to see him then. We always know how he is
when he laughs, and then we go out of his way. We
know he is strange then, for he never laughs any other
time.
What do you mean by strangeis he dangerous?
Sometimes, sir, he plays dangerous with you.
But it's all in play, for he laughs, and doesn't look in
earnest; but he hurts people then. He once threw me
into the tree when he was so: but it wasn't in earnest
it is his fun, when he is strange.
And where do you think he isin the swamp?
Yes, sir; he loves to be in the swamp.
And how long, boy, is it since he became strange?
Oh, a very long time, sir; ever since I was a little
child. But he has been much stranger since mother's
death!
No wonder! no wonder! That was enough to
make him sothat cruel murder; but we will avenge
it, boywe will avenge it.
Yes, sir; that's what I want to do, as soon as
you'll let meas soon as I grow tall enough to cut a
man over the head.
The boy stopped and blushedhalf fearing that he
had said too much; but the kindled fire of his eye was
unshadowed, and there was a quiver of his lips, and an
increasing heave of his breast, that did not escape the
keen glance of Singleton. The latter was about to
speak, when suddenly the boy stopped him, bent
forward
upon his horse, and pointing with his finger to an
opening from the roadside, called the attention of his
commander in that direction.
I'm sure, sir, it's a mana white man; his back
was to us, sir; he's in there.
At the word, Singleton drove the spur into his steed,
and the boy followed him. In a moment, he was at
the designated spot, and there, sure enough, even as
his companion had said, in the little break of the
woods, on the hillock's side, a strange man stood
before
them.
The person thus surprised now evidently beheld
them for the first time. He had been tightening the
saddle-girth around his horse, that stood quietly
cropping
the grass at their approach; and his eyes were
turned over his shoulder, surveying the new-comers.
He hesitated, and his manner had in it something of
precipitation. This was the more evident to Singleton,
as, on their appearance, he began to whistle, and
obviously
assumed a degree of composure which he did
not feel. He had been taking his midday repast at the
spring, which trickled from the hillside below them;
and the remains of his meal, consisting of a bit of
dried venison, cold ham, and corn hoecake, were still
open upon the grass, lying on the buckskin wrapper
which contained them. The man was certainly a
traveller
,
and had ridden far; the condition of his horse
proved that; though his dress and appearance were
those of the plain farmers of the neighbourhood. A
coarse blue homespun coatee, with thin, whity-brown
pantaloons, loosely made, and a quaker hat, in the
riband of which a huge pipe was stuck ostentatiously,
formed his habit. But Singleton saw that the pipe had
never been smoked, and his inference was not
favourable
to the traveller, from this circumstance.
Throwing his bridle to Lance Frampton, the partisan
alighted, and approached the stranger, who turned to
meet him. There was quite a show of good-humour
in his countenance, as Singleton drew nigh, and yet
the latter saw his trepidation; and the anxious looks
B 2
which, more than once, he cast upon the stout animal
which had borne him, seemed to say how glad he
would have been to use him in flight, could he possibly
have thought to do so in safety.
Good-day, my friend, good-day. You have ridden
far, said Singleton, and your horse tells it. May I
ask what quarter you come from?
Oh yes, to be sure you may, stranger; there's no
harm that I can see in the question, only as it happens
to want an answer. It's no safe matter, now-a-days,
stranger, to tell one's starting and stopping, since, you
see, it mayn't altogether please them that hears.
There was a half disposition on the part of the
countryman to feel his way, and see how far he could
bully the new-comer, in this equivocal sort of speech.
But he was mistaken in the man before him, and though
he had spoken his evasive reply in a manner meant
to be conciliating while it remained unsatisfactory,
he was soon compelled to see that his questioner was
by no means to be trifled with.
Safe or not, my friend, said Singleton, gravely,
there are some questions that a man must answer,
whether he likes it or no: there is a school proverb
that you must remember, about the bird that can sing
and will not.
The man turned his tobacco in his jaws, and though
evidently annoyed and disquieted, replied
Why, yes, stranger, I reckon I know what you
mean, though I haint had much schooling; three
months one year, and three another, and then three
years without any, don't teach a body every kind of
larning. But the saying you point to I remember well
enough; many's the time I've heard it. `The bird
that wont sing must be made to sing.'
I see your memory may be relied upon for other
matters, said Singleton; and now, taking care not to
forget the proverb, you will please answer me a few
questions.
Well, stranger, I'm willing enough. I'm all over
good-natur, and never fail to git vexed with myself
afterward, when the devil drives me to be uncivil to
them that treats me well. Ax your question straight
off-hand, and Peet Larkin is the boy to answer, far as
his larning goes.
I am glad, Mr. Larkin, for your own sake, that
you have this temper. You will please to say, now,
where you are from.
Well, now, stranger, I'm only come from a little
aboveand as you say, I've had a tough ride of it;
but it's a good critter, this here nag of mine, and does
one's heart good to go on him. So, you see, when
I'm on him, I goes it. I hate mightily to creep,
terrapin
fashion, in a dogtrot; for you see, stranger, it's a
bad gait, and sickens a short man, though the horse
that travels stands it best of any.
Singleton had no disposition to interrupt the speaker,
though he saw that he meant to be evasive. He
watched his features attentively, while he spoke, and
when he had done, proceeded in his inquiries.
From above! but what part? I would know
precisely
,
Mr. Larkin.
Well, now, stranger, as I haint got no secrets, I
'spose I may as well tell you 'xactly as 'tis. I'm from
clear across the Santee; I live 'pon the Santee, or
thereabouts.
Indeed! and is it true, as we hear below, that the
wolves have grown troublesome in that quarter?
The wolves, stranger? Well, now, that can't be;
for, you see, I come from all about, and nobody that I
seed along the road, or in any settlement, made
complaint
.
I reckon you aint heard very particular right,
now.
It must be the owls, thenyes, it is the owls;
have you seen any of them on your way?
This question, urged with the utmost gravity by the
partisan, completed the fellow's astonishment.
Revolving
the huge lump of tobaccofor such it seemed
which from the commencement of the dialogue had
been going to and fro between his jaws, it was some
seconds before he could recover sufficiently from his
astonishment to reply.
Owls! God bless me, stranger, but that's a queer
question, anyhow. To be sure there's owls all along
the Santee; you may hear them in the swamp any
time o' night, and an ugly noise they makes all night
long, but nobody thinks o' minding them. They
troubles
nobody, and sometimes, when there's going to be
a death in the family, the white owls comes into the
bedroom, and they won't drive 'em out, for you see it's
no use; the sick body will die after that, whether they
drive the owl off or no.
Yes, yestrue; said Singleton musingly, while
watching the other's countenance with a circumspect
regard. He saw that the countryman was not the man
he expected, and he had other suspicions as to his
real character, the more particularly as he perceived
how disquieted the examination and restraint had made
him. After a moment's pause, he proceeded to put a
more direct inquiry.
Where do you live upon the Santee?
Well, now, stranger, I don't know if you'll know
the place when I tell you, seeing it's a little out of the
way of the settlement; but I live close upon the left
hand fork of the White Oak Branch, a leetle above the
road that runs to Williamsburg. I come down that
road when I crossed the Santee.
And where did you cross the Santee?
At Vance's; I 'spose you know where that is?
I do; but why did you not cross at Nelson's
why go out of your way to Vance's?
The countryman stammered, hesitated for a moment,
and while he replied, his eye sank beneath the
penetrating
glance of Singleton.
Why, stranger, to say truth, 'cause I feared to
come by Nelson's; I was afeard of the enemy?
And whom do you call the enemy?
Them that's not a friend to me and my friends;
them's my enemies, stranger, and I reckon them's your
enemies too.
Perhaps so; but I must first know who they are,
before I say. Speak.
The mass of tobacco performed a more rapid
revolution
before the man replied; and he then did so only
as he saw the hand of Singleton upon the pistol in his
belt.
Well, stranger, if I must, I must: so, by the enemy
I means the rebels; them that aint friendly to the king's
governmentthem's the enemy; and there was plenty
to spare of them at the nighest track; the river swamp
at Nelson's was chock full of Marion's men, and there
was no passing; so I took the road across, down by
Wright's Bluff, that lets you into the Vance's ferry
track, and
You stopped at Watson's?
[1]
[1]
At that time one of the chain of military posts which the enemy
had established throughout the country.
Singleton put the question affirmatively, and the
other looked surprised; the tobacco was about to be
revolved from the one jaw to its opposite, as had
been the case at almost every interval made between
his sentences, when, quick as lightning, and with a
grasp of steel, Singleton seized him by the throat.
The fellow strove to slip away, but never did finger
more tenaciously gripe the throat of an enemy. The
partisan was a man of immense strength, and the
stranger was short and small. His powers were far
inferior. He strove to struggle, and laboured, but in
vain, to speak. The fingers were too closely
compressed
,
and still maintaining his hold with more
tenacity than ever, the assailant bore him to earth, and
with his knee firmly upon his breast, in spite of every
effort for release by the man beneath him, he choked
him until his tongue hung out upon his cheek, and his
jaws were sufficiently distended to enable him to secure
the game for which he toiled so desperately.
Turning
the bearer of despatches, for the prisoner was such,
upon his side, the silver bullet which contained them
rolled forth upon the grass, and in a moment after
was secured by the ready hands of Lance Frampton.
CHAPTER III.
Ye blight the sense when ye do wound the heart
Reason is feeling's best and born ally,
And suffers with her kindred.
Stir notmove a foot, and you die!were the
brief words of Singleton, as, with foot upon his breast,
he kept the bearer of despatches prostrate upon the
earth. The man saw the peremptory look, the ready
pistol, and he doubted not that the words were sternly
earnest. His struggles ceased with the command, and
handing his cocked pistol to the attentive boy
Frampton
,
the partisan proceeded to examine the prize which
he had gained. The screw soon yielded up its trust,
and the intelligence was important. The courier
showed symptoms of disquiet, and the foot of his
conqueror
was pressed, in consequence, more firmly upon
his bosom.
Shoot him if he stirs, said Singleton to the boy, who
looked his readiness to obey the command. The former
then perused the cramped document which the billet
had contained. Its contents were valuable, and greatly
assisted our hero in his own progress. Though from
an enemy, it contained desirable intelligence, and taken
in connection with the verbal narrative which the
courier
had given of the presence of Marion's men on the
Santee, it at once determined Singleton to make an
early movement in that quarter. The despatch was
from Lord Rawdon, in command at Camden, to Earl
Cornwallis at Charlestown. It claimed the immediate
attendance of the commander-in-chief in Camden, to
quell discontents, and prepare for the enemy
announcing
the approach of Gates with a formidable army of
seven thousand men. This was the alleged force of
the continentals, an amount greatly exaggerated beyond
the truth, but at this time confidently believed and
insisted
upon by both parties in the state. The express
contained, in addition to this highly interesting matter,
the heads of other subjects not less interesting to the
partisan, and scarcely less important to the cause.
It described, in brief, numerous risings in every
quarter
;
the defection of the militia
en masse
, under Lyle,
who had carried them over to Sumter; the union of
Sumter with the Waxsaw whigs; and the affairs on the
Catawba, at Williams's and the Rocky Mount: in all of
which the Game Cock had handled the enemy
severely
.
The despatch betrayed great anxiety, and its
contents were of the most stimulating tendency to
Singleton. It now impressed upon him the necessity
of that early movement to join with Marion which he
had already contemplated.
You may rise, sir, said the partisan, moving his
heel from the breast of the courier, who had lain
quietly
enough but uncomfortably under it.
You may rise, but you are my prisonerno words,
but prepare to submit. See to your animalmake no
effort to fly, or I shoot you down on the instant.
The man rose tamely enough, but sullenly. After a
few moments he found his speech, which was now
more agreeable and less broken than when the bullet
was revolving to and fro in his jaws.
Well, now, captain, this is mighty hard, now, I do
think. You won't keep me, I reckon, seeing I'm no
fighting man, and haint got any weapons. I'm a
non-combatant
,
so I am, and I aint free to be taken
prisoner
.
It's agin the laws, I reckon.
Indeed! but we'll see. Mount, sir, and no talking.
Well, it's a tough business, and I do think, after all,
that it's only joking with me you areyou're two good
loyalists, now, I'm certain.
You mistake, sir, I'm an Americanone of
Marion's
men, and no traitor. To horse, and no more of
thisno trifling.
God help me, captain, but you're not in airnest,
sure? It's no small difficulty, now, this express, and
it's a matter to be well paid for; and if so be you are,
for certain, one of Marion's men, you mought let 'n
have a free pass up, for a smart chance of the guineas.
Afore God, captain, if you'll only clear the road you
shall have one half
The pistol was at his head.
Another word, scoundrel, and I send the bullet
through your scull. Mount, quicklyquickly!
With the back of his hand he smote the tory upon
his mouth as he spoke, and the fire of insulted
patriotism
flashed from his eye, with a threatening brightness
that silenced at once, and most effectually, all farther
solicitations from the bearer of despatches.
Reluctantly
,
but without farther pause, he got into saddle,
taking the place assigned him by his captor, between
himself and the boy. In this manner they took their
way to the Cypress Swamp, and it was not long before
they were, all three, lodged in its safe and deep
recesses
.
There we find our almost forgotten friends, the
gourmand
and good-natured Porgy, and the attenuated
naturalist
,
Doctor Oakenburger; the one about to engage in
his favourite vocation, and hurrying the evening meal,
the other sublimely employed in stuffing with moss the
skin of a monstrous coachwhip, which, to his great
delight, the morning before, he had been successful
enough to take with a crotch stick, and to kill without
bruising. Carefully skinned, and dried in the shade, the
rich colours and glossy glaze of the reptile had been
well preserved, and now, carefully filled out with the
soft and pliant moss, as it lay across the doctor's lap,
it wore, to the eye of Singleton, a very life-like
appearance
.
The two came forward to meet and make the
acquaintance of the partisan, whom before they had
not seen. Porgy was highly delighted, for, like most
fat men, he liked company, and preferred always the
presence of a number. There's no eating alone,
he would saygive me enough for a large table, and
enough round it: I can then enjoy myself. His
reception
of Singleton partook of this spirit.
Major Singleton, I rejoice to see you; just now
particularly
,
as our supper, such as it is, is almost at hand.
No great variety, sirnothing much to choose from
but what of that, sir. There's enough, and what there
is, is goodthe very best. Tom, thereour cook, sir
he will make the very best of itbroils ham the
best of any negro in the southern country, and his
hoecake
,
sir, is absolutely perfection. He does turn a
griddle with a dexterity that is remarkable. But you
shall seeyou shall see for yourself. Here, Tom!
And rolling up his sleeves, he took the subject of
his eulogy aside, and a moment after the latter was
seen piling his brands and adjusting a rude iron fabric
over the coals, while the corpulent Porgy, with the
most hearty good will for the labour, busily sliced off
sundry huge collops from the convenient shoulder of
bacon that hung suspended from a contiguous tree.
The labours of the gourmand were scarcely congenial
either with the mood of Singleton or the quiet
loveliness
of the scene. Evening was fast coming onall
the swamp was in a deep shadow, save where, like a
wandering but pure spirit, a rose-like effusion, the last
dying but lovely glance from the descending sun rested
flickeringly upon the top of one of the tallest pines
above them. A space between the trees, opening to
the heavens in one little spot alone, showed them a
sprinkling of fleecy white clouds, sleeping quietly
under the sky, their western edges partaking slightly
of the same last parting glance of the sinking orb.
A slight breeze stirred fitfully among the branches; and
the occasional chirp of the nimble sparrow, as it hopped
along on the edge of the island, was the only sound,
other than those made by the hissing fire, and the
occasional
orders of Porgy, which came to the ears of
Singleton. He threw himself upon the green bank,
under a tree, on the opposite side of which the boy
Lance had already placed himself, a little behind him.
Suddenly the boy started to his feet. The wild,
unearthly
laugh of his father, that eldritch scream which
chilled to the very bones of the hearer, was heard on
the skirts of the island. Looking to the quarter
Vol. II.C
whence the sound proceeded, they beheld his huge
figure peering from behind a treehis eyes staring
forth vacantly upon them, while his hands were
uplifted
to a stretching branch above him, which he
grasped firmly. He laughed once and again, and
Singleton
at length rose, beckoned and called to him.
But he gave no heed to the call, and when the latter
offered to approach him, the maniac moved away
rapidly
,
with another eldritch laugh, as if he was about to
fly. At this moment the boy came up in sight of his
father, and the wild man seemed to recognise his son.
He will come now, sir, said Lance to Major
Singleton
;
he will come now, sir: but we must not seem
to push or to watch him.
They fell back, accordingly, took their old places
along the bank, and awaited the result of their
experiment
;
and, as the boy had predicted, the maniac in a
few moments after was beside them. He came forward
with a bounding motion, as if now only accustomed
to an inordinate extent of action, corresponding to the
sleepless impulse and the fierce fever preying upon
his mind. Without a word, but with a perpetually
glancing movement of the eye, which seemed to take
in all objects around, he squatted down quietly beside
his son. He stared for an instant curiously into his
eyes, then extending his hand, his fingers wandered
unconsciously
in the long black hair of the boy. The
latter, all the time, with a proper caution, arising from
his previous intimacy with his father's habits, took
care neither to move nor speak. He sat patiently,
unmoved
,
while the fingers of the maniac played with
his hair, lifted curl after curl with affectionate
minuteness
,
and wound particular locks about his finger.
Then he stroked down, once or twice, the thick volumes
of hair together; and at length, laughing again more
wildly than ever, he withdrew his hand entirely, and
turning his face from the two, his eyes became fixed
with a strange intensity upon the extended form of the
tory whom Singleton had taken, and who now lay tied
beneath a tree at a little distance. The maniac slowly
rose and moved towards himwalked all around and
examined him in every particular; the prisoner all
the while, with no little anxiety, turning his glance
in every quarter, following the movement of the
observer
.
The fingers of the maniac were in a motion as
restlessnow grasping, and now withdrawn from, the
handle of the unsheathed knife that was stuck in the folds
of a thick red handkerchief, ragged and soiled, which
was strapped about his waist. At length, leaving the
object of his inspection, he approached Singleton, and,
with something more of coherence than usual, and a
singularly calm expression, he proposed an inquiry
about the person whose presence appeared so much
to trouble him.
He is not a red-coatnot a dragoon?
No; a countryman, but a prisoner. He is a bearer
of despatchesa non-combatant.
The reply of Singleton, which was immediately
made to the maniac, brought forward another party in
the person of Doctor Oakenburger, who nowhaving
first, with the utmost tenderness, hung his snake over a
limb above himjoined the group.
A prisoner, and yet a non-combatant, Major
Singleton
!
Sir, oblige me, and explain. Is that
possible
?have
I not heard imperfectly? I too, sir, am a
non-combatant, sir; that was understood, sir, when
Master Humphries first spoke to me in this behalf.
My engagements, sir, required no risk at my hands,
and promised me perfect safety.
Is he not safe enough? was the calm inquiry of
Singleton, as, with a smile, he pointed to the corded
courier, and thus answered the doctor's question. Just
at his ears, in the same moment, the maniac, who,
unperceived
by the doctor, had stolen close behind him,
now uttered one of his most appalling screams of
laughter
;
and the non-combatant did not seek to disguise
the apprehensions which prompted him to a hasty
retreat in the rear of Singleton. The partisan turned
to him, and changing his topic somewhat, inquired
You are the doctor, sir? Doctor
Oakenburger, sir; of an old German family of high
descent, and without stain of blood. They came over,
sir, with the Elector.
In a whisper, Singleton inquired if his skill could
reach the case of Frampton; but the suggestion was
productive of quite too much alarm in the mind of the
adventurer. He seemed nowise desirous of
martyrdom
in the prosecution of the healing art; and, when
he found his tongue, in reply to the demand of
Singleton
,
he gave his opinion in a half-unintelligible jargon,
that the case was confirmed and hopeless. The
savage
,
in the mean while, had drawn nigher to his son,
one of whose hands he had taken into his own. But
he said nothing all the while; and at length, having
made all arrangements for the evening repast, the
provident Porgy coming forward, announced things in
readiness, and bade them fall to. Singleton then
spoke to the maniac, and endeavoured to persuade him
to the log on which the victuals had been spread, and
around which the others had now gathered; but his
application was entirely unheeded.
He won't mind all you can say to him, major; we
know him, for he's been several times to eat with us;
that's the way with the creature. But put the meat
before him, and his understanding comes back in a
moment. He knows very well what to do with it.
Ah, Providence has wisely ordained, major, that we
shall lose the knowledge of what's good for the
stomach
the last of all. We can forget the loss of fortune,
sir, of the fine house, and goodly plate, and pleasant
tendancewe may even forget the quality and the
faces of our friends; and as for love, that gets out of
our clutches, we don't know how; but, major, I wont
believe that anybody ever yet lost their knowledge of
good living. Once gained, it holds its ground well;
it survives all other knowledge. The belly, major,
will always insist upon so much brains being preserved
in the head, as will maintain unimpaired its own
ascendency
.
As the gourmand had said, the meat was no sooner
placed before the maniac, than, seizing it ravenously in
his fingers, he tore and devoured it with a fury that
showed how long had been his previous abstinence.
His appetite was absolutely wolfish; and while he ate,
Singleton watched him with mingled emotions of pity
and disgust. His garments were in tatters about him,
torn by the thick wood in which he had ranged with
as little scruple as the wild beasts whom he now
resembled
.
His face had been scratched with briers,
and the blood had congealed along the seams upon his
cheek, unremoved and unregarded. His thick, black
hair was matted down upon his forehead, and was
deeply stained with the clayey ooze of the swamp
through which he had been crawling. His eyes
beneath
had a fiery restlessness, and glared even around
him with a baleful, comet-like light, which was full of
evil omen. When he had eaten, without a word he
dashed off from the place where he had been seated,
plunged into the creek, and the fainter and fainter
echoes of his wild laugh declared his rapid progress
away into the thick recesses of the neighbouring
cypress. Over these darkness now began to
consolidate
;
and at length, impatient of farther delay in a
purposed object, Singleton rose from his place, and
gave orders to Lance to get his own and the horse of
his superior in readiness.
Shall we ride to-night, sir? inquired the boy.
Instantly: I shall put you on a new duty to-night,
Lance, and hope that you will perform it well. Speed
now with the horses, for the dark gathers.
The bosom of the youth thrilled and throbbed with
a new emotion of pleasure, as he heard the promise,
and the feeling gave a degree of elasticity to his
movement, which enabled him to place the steed
before
his leader instantaneously.
Singleton sprung the pan of his pistols, renewed the
priming, gave several orders touching the prisoner,
and some parting directions; then leaping into saddle,
bade Lancelot find the track. Porgy waved a blazing
torch over the creek, giving them a brief light at
C 2
starting, and the two were soon plunging through the
gloomy pathway, if so, by any stretch of courtesy, it
may be called, and taking a direction which Singleton
thought most likely to give them a meeting with the now
approaching troop under the command of Humphries.
CHAPTER IV.
The game is lost, and needless to pursue,
Through such a waste, in such a night as this.
The
course of Singleton was now towards The
Oaks. He was about to pay a parting visit, and
to seek, if possible, to persuade his uncle to set forth
with him for the Santee, with whatever force might
have been procured by him from among his
neighbours
.
This was, indeed, his only opportunity. He
had arrested one courier, it is true; but others must
succeed in giving to Cornwallis the important
intelligence
which, for the present, he had staid. The
movement of Cornwallis towards Camden, in
compliance
with the necessity of the case, and Rawdon's
solicitations, would have the effect of breaking up
communication
throughout the intervening country, and
making any effort to pass it dangerous to the partisan.
This was a consideration which he necessarily
concluded
must influence Colonel Walton's conduct; and
the opportunity of passing at Nelson's, now filled with
Marion's men, was one not to be disregarded. His
hopes were, that his uncle would carry with him a
decent
number of sturdy fellows into the camp of the
continentals
.
Nor was this hope altogether premature.
Colonel Walton, although slow in taking up the cause
of his country, had, at last, set heartily about it. By
his earnestness and his industry, since his
determination
had been made to resume his arms, he strove to
appease his conscience, and do away with any reproach
that might have been due to his past forbearance. He
had made some progress with his recruits, and was
night and day indefatigable. He rode through his
neighbourhood among all sorts of people, and played
his game with skill and coolness. He knew that
Proctor watched him, and he was circumspect
accordingly
.
But, though cautious, he did not relax. In the
little interval which followed his resolve to come out,
and the moment under our view, he had secured some
twenty pledgespledges of stout, honest countrymen,
men who had been chafed by the insolence of their
oppression, borne down by wrongs, and impatient for
redress. He was now, even while Singleton rode
with his attendant towards the river, engaged in close
council with a little band at Johnson's house, on Cane
Acre, to whom he was successfully urging such
considerations
as did not fail, in the end, to effect the
object
he desired. Let us there leave him, for the present,
and return to the camp at Bacon's bridge.
With the close of day, Humphries made his
preparations
for moving to the Cypress in obedience to the
command of Singleton. The horses were saddled
quickly, the arms prepared, the surplus baggage put
upon pack-horses, upon which the prisoners were
mounted, and all appearance of a camp broken up in
that quarter. These last were placed under the
immediate
surveillance of Davis, who brought up the rear
of the troop. The custody of Hastings placed the
rivals in a novel sort of relationship to one another;
and the sturdy Goose Creeker did not feel less of his
bitterness of spirit because he was compelled to
suppress
its utterance. His old love for Bella Humphries
grew active with the feeling of jealousy, which the
presence of the serjeant necessarily provoked. He
really loved the girl, and his hate for the dragoon was,
in consequence, entirely without qualification. He
felt that he was getting angry, as, while arranging the
prisoners, his eye continually fell upon Hastings. But
he knew and respected the situation of the enemy too
much to give utterance to his feelings at large;
feelings
which, at the same time, were sufficiently evident
to the eye of the dragoon. He, on the other hand,
conscious of his danger, and apprehensive of
punishment
corresponding to the outrageous character of his
last offence, strove to be rather conciliating, and
addressed
some soothing and gracious speech to his rival,
as the latter approached him; but the other was not to
be soothed in this fashion. A glance of contempt,
mingled with hate, was the only response given to the
obsequious remark of Hastings; and in a few minutes
after, when he could do so unobserved, Davis came
back to where his prisoner stood, and in a low tone
thus addressed him
Look ye, Sergeant Hastings, there's no love lost
atween us, and it's no use for you to make sweet
speeches. You're in no fix to help yourself now; but
I've got a grudge agin you that must be satisfied, and
I'll be on the look-out, though it's agin orders, to work
a clear way for you out of this hobble, if so be you'll
only promise to give me satisfaction when I've done
so. Say the word now that you cross swords with me,
if I help you to a clear track, and here's my hand upon
it, that you shall have a fair fight and free passage.
Wellbut, Davis, my friend
No friend, if you please. I'm your deadly enemy,
and if so be I can, as God shall help me, I'll cut your
heart out of your hide, or there's no snakes.
Well, wellbut I've no weapon.
I'll bring you oneonly say the word, was the
pertinacious and quick reply. Finding there was no
escape, the sergeant readily enough closed with the
terms, and Davis then promised to seek him out in the
swamp, conduct him to a clear ground, and make the
terms of fight equal between them. This done, he
turned away from the prisoner with something more
of light-heartedness than usual, as he anticipated the
pleasure of that strife with his enemy which promised
to revenge him for so many wrongs.
The prisoners were now all mounted, Goggle along
with them, and so disposed as to ride between
alternate
files of the troopers. In this order they set forth
for the recesses of the swamp, and a route was chosen
by Humphries which enabled him to keep away from
all beaten roads; the necessity still existing, while in
the neighbourhood of a superior force, for the utmost
caution, as the objects of the partisan required
security
from observation even before any successes which
so small a party might obtain. It was not long before
they began to enter the swamp, and to meet with its
obstructions. The twilight gradually ceased to
glimmer
,
the trees crowded more closely, and the shades
stalking about them incessantly grew incorporated into
huge masses, from which the trees themselves were
scarce distinguishable. Then came the varieties of
the swamp; the black and stagnant puddle, the slimy
ooze, the decayed and prostrate tree, and the hanging
vine swinging across the path. The night came down
shortly after they had penetrated into the morass, and,
though a clear starlight evening, it was only now and
then that glimpses could be obtained of the pale and
melancholy watcher, suddenly peering down into the
opening of the trees overhead. A closer order of
march was now imposed upon the troop, as, carefully
leading the way, Humphries guided them through one
little creek, and along the banks of another. The earth
between the two parallel waters lay tolerably high,
and formed a defile, as it were, through which they
continued
to move with no other obstructions than such as
were presented by the occasional morass formed by
indentions of the creek, and the close trees, that
suffered
them to move only in single file. Once fairly in the
swamp, Humphries had a torch lighted and carried by
a trooper in front with himself. This serving
sufficiently
to pick the path, though yielding no assistance
to those who came after, they were compelled simply
to keep close, and follow the leader. The lieutenant
kept unrelaxing watch during all this period, and the
utmost order was observed during their progress. His
ear was keenly observant of every sound, though
deceived
by none of them. He was skilled in woodcraft,
and knew well how to decoy the bird, and to deceive
the reptile, by his various imitations. At this time,
however, he permitted himself no exercise of his
powers
in this respect; but, watchful in the highest degree,
he gave his orders briefly, in a low tone, and without
the employment of unnecessary words. At length the
defile narrowed, the undergrowth thickened about the
trees in luxuriant vegetation, and so dark was the
place that the figure of each individual horse could
only be made out by the rider immediately behind it.
To the instinct and better vision of the animals
themselves
the movement was in great part left; the trooper
and his prisoner alike only taking care not to fall far
behind the steed in advance. This being the case,
and heedful of his charge, while Davis was directed
closely to watch and bring up the rear, Humphries
stationed himself at the mouth of the defile, having
first led the way through which they were yet to pass.
There, with uplifted torch, he numbered one by one
the steeds of all that came through and passed before
him; and in this way, with a precaution which he
considered
the most complete that could be adopted,
confidently
thought that there could be no risk of losing
any of his prisoners. And, indeed, with the ordinary
prisoner, the man only skilled to fight bulldog fashion,
without ingenuity, and solely relying upon his teeth,
the precaution would have been enough. But Goggle
was not of this description. He had the gift, along
with Indian blood, of Indian subtlety. He had kept
his course quietly and patiently with the rest, and
there was no gloom, no dulness, no flagging of spirits
about him. All was coolness in his mood, and he
knew his ground. He had heard the orders of
Humphries
,
readily understood the route, and prepared to
avail himself of circumstances as they might occur in
his favour. There was a cry which the troops were
heard to utter successively, as they advanced through
a certain point of the defile, the meaning of which
he clearly enough understood. A ragged pine had
thrust an arm directly over the path, and so low as to
endanger the head of a tall man moving along too
erectly. The cry of each rider, therefore, as he passed
under it, was to his immediate follower
Stoop low!heads down!
Goggle heard this long before he reached it. He
coolly prepared himself, buttoned his jacket closely,
and freed his feet from his stirrups as he proceeded.
He did this without the slightest precipitation or
impatience
.
In order to accustom his horse to the relaxation
of the bit, so that his movement might not undergo any
change at the trying moment, he gradually yielded up
the bridle, until the animal failed entirely to feel its
restraints upon his mouth, then, dropping it altogether
as he heard the cry of his predecessor to stoop,
instead
of doing so, he threw his arms upward, caught
the overhanging branch firmly with both hands, and
with the activity of an ape lifted himself fairly out of
the saddle, and for a moment swung in air. The horse
passed from under him, and with his old habit
followed
the lead to which he had been accustomed.
The succeeding steed approached, Goggle gave the
cry, in the most measured language, and as he did so
he whirled himself over out of the trooper's way, upon
the top of the branch, where he sat with all a squirrel's
sense of security. Here he remained in quiet as the
troop proceeded. He knew the length of the defile,
and could see in the distance the glimmering of the
torch by which Humphries enumerated the troopers
as they came forth from the avenue; and as the rear
of the party with Davis was at hand, he felt secure
that all would have passed him some time before his
empty saddle would warn the lieutenant of his
departure
.
A moment after, the voice of Davis, as he
passed under the tree where the fugitive sat
chuckling
at his success, apprized him of the proper time to
commence his flight. The ground was free, and
dropping
from his perch, the fugitive crossed the path, and
took the water of the creek as soon as possible,
following
its course towards the river for a brief space, then
turning aside and shrouding himself, while still
keeping
his way, in a close-set forest of small saplings.
Here he had scarcely entered when the alarm was
given. The vigilant Humphries had discovered the
absence of the prisoner, as the untrammelled animal
came forth from the defile. A confused shouting, a
rush as of one or more in search, reached the ears of
the fugitive; but he was safe, and laughed at all
pursuit
.
The sound soon died away; and Goggle,
who had lain quiet while the confusion lasted, now
resumed his flight. Davis and one of the troopers
had dashed back when the alarm was given; but in
the thick darkness which shrouded the region, there
was no prospect of retaking the prisoner so long as
he kept silent. This was soon evident to Humphries,
and, sore and chagrined, he hurried on the progress of
the party, swearing vengeance against the tory, his
hostility to whom had now received an added and
doubly active stimulant. He reached the camp late
at night without farther accident, and without
meeting
with Singleton, as the latter had proposed. They
had taken different routes; and when the commander
emerged from the swamp, he took the road back to
the bridge, only accompanied by his youthful protege.
He reached the river just as the fugitive Goggle was
about to emerge from the swamp. The latter heard
at a distance the feet of the horse, and lay snug
beside
the road as they passed. The unobstructed
starlight
was now around them, and he was enabled to
distinguish their persons. He conjectured what would
be the course of Singleton, and he now beheld the
opportunity
of finding his reward with the British, and
of gaining his revenge upon one, at least, of his
American
enemies. Toil and fatigue were at once forgotten,
fear was discarded from his mind; and, now running,
now walking, with an Indian pertinacity of spirit, he
took the directest course leading to Dorchester.
CHAPTER V.
Her words are so much music, caught from heaven
When clouds are parting, and the rosy eve
Comes to her sway.
The
hour was late when Goggle reached the
village
.
The sentries were all set, and Proctor had
retired
for the night; but, aware of the value of his
intelligence, the fugitive did not scruple to disturb him.
He told his story at full, and had the satisfaction to
find that he told it to a willing ear. Proctor at once
proceeded to arm a party, and heading it himself,
prepared to surprise the rebel partisan in the quiet
dwelling to which Goggle had seen him pursuing his
way. The British colonel was the more willing to
move in this business now, than he otherwise might
have been, as he had been troubled with some doubt
whether the suspicious attitude of Colonel Walton had
not already called for his attention. He was glad of
an opportunity, therefore, of proving his alacrity in
the cause, so much of which had been intrusted to
him. We leave him, with a little troop of half a
score, getting into saddle, and about to move in the
direction of The Oaks. Goggle remained behind,
at the suggestion of Proctor, who needed not his
assistance
farther, and saw that his fatigued condition
craved for immediate rest.
Let us now return to Singleton and his attendant.
Having reached the neighbourhood of The Oaks, they
took the back track leading to the river, which carried
them immediately into the rear of the dwelling-house.
There, dismounting, and carefully concealing their
horses in the brush, Singleton placed his pistols in his
belt, and leaving the boy in charge of the animals, with
instructions to watch closely, proceeded to the mansion.
Vol. II.D
Lance Frampton, proud of the trust, promised his
commander to watch well, and approve himself a
worthy sentinel. In a few moments after, the partisan
was once more treading the well-known path, covered
with those grave guardians of a century, the spreading
and moss-bearded oaks, and on his way to the presence
of those well beloved beyond all, and dearer to him
than the lifeblood at his heart. It was not many
minutes before he was at the side of the frail and
attenuated
form of her, the sister and the playmate of
his boyhood; feeble to prostration, sustained by
pillows
,
and scarcely able to turn upon him those lovely
eyes, still bright, and brightening to the last, as if
there the reluctant soul had concentrated its
heavenward
fires; and even there, clinging to mortality,
evolved some of that divine light which it was so soon
to be mingled with for ever.
Dear, dear Emily! he exclaimed; sister, sweet
sister!and his lips were pressed to hers; and, though
he strove hard for their suppression, the tears
gathered
in his large dark eyes. Hers were the only
unclouded ones in the chamber. On one side sat his
cousin Kate, while his aunt moved around the couch
of the sufferer, duly administering to her wants. They
too were in tears, and had evidently, before this, been
weeping. It was a scene for tears; in which smiles
had been irreverent, and joy an unbecoming and most
impious intruder. Yet, though the dying girl wept not
herself, and though her eye had in it that glorious
effulgence
which is so peculiarly the attribute of the
victim to the deadly form of disease under which she
laboured, yet the brightness of her glance was no
rebuke to the tearfulness of theirs. It was a high and
holy brightness; a deep expression, full of divine
speech, and solemnizing even where it brightened
with an aspect not of the earth. The light might have
streamed from the altar, a halo from heaven around the
brow of its most endowed apostle.
She spoke to him of the commonest affairs of life;
yet she knew that death was busy at her heart. Whence
was this strength of mindthis confidence? Is there,
indeed, a moment before the hour of dissolution when
the mortal is vouchsafed communion, a close
communion
and converse with its God. It is, it must be so.
The dim confine, the heavy earth, cannot always be
around us. The soul must sometimes employ the
wings of a divine prescience, and shaking off human
care with human feeling, forget for a while the many
pains, along with the humble pleasures, of humanity,
and be only alive to the immortality of the future.
The dark mansions of the coming time, and the huge
and high barriers which control it, must then be thrown
aside; and faith and the pure spirit, in their whitened
vestments, already on, must be suffered to take a
momentary
survey of the world which is to be their own.
But the spirit had come back to earth, and now grew
conscious of its claims.
Dear, dear Robert! she replied, as she motioned
to be free from those caresses which he bestowed
upon her; and which, though studiously light and
gentle, were yet too much for a frame spiritualizing
so fast: you are come, Robert, and with no ill news.
You have no harshness on your brow, and the vein is
not swollen; and by this I know you have not been
engaged in any war and violence. Is it not so?
He did not undeceive her, and suppressed carefully
every allusion to his late adventures; spoke of
indifferent
things, and encouraged in her that idea of
the national peace, which, from a hope, had already
grown into a thought of her mind.
Oh, would that I could only hear of it, Robert,
ere I leave you! Could I know that you were safe,
all safe, before I diedyou, dear aunt, and you, sister,
my more than sisterand you, Robert, who have been
to me father and brother, and all, so long; would I
could know this, and I should die happyeven with
joy! But death will have its sting, I feel, in this.
I shall go to peaceI feel that; while all the strifes,
and all the cares, the wounds, and the dangers, will be
left for you!
Her eyes now filled, as her earthly sorrows were
renewed. Her brother strove to console her in the
usual commonplace.
Fear not for us, dear Emily; and let not our
afflictions
fill your mind. Be calm on that subject;
you have pains and sufferings enough of your own, my
dear sister, to keep you from desiring any share in
ours.
I have no sufferings now, Robert; I have long
ceased to have sufferings of my own. Have I not
long survived the hope of life? have I not long
laboured
to sustain myself against the coming and the
fear of death? God be praised! for I think I have
succeeded. These were my afflictions once, and they
are now over. Yet I have sorrows not my own, and
they are, that I must leave you to sorrowsgriefs of
an unnatural time, and horrors that come with the
disease
,
as it would seem, of nature. For war is her
diseaseher most pestilent disease. The sharp
sword, the torturing scourage, the degrading rope, the
pining and the piercing faminethese are the
horrible
accompaniments of war; and oh, brother, soldier
as you are, when I leave you to the dangers of these,
I carry with me all my human sorrows. I may die,
but my soul must bear along with it those thousand
fears which belong to my sympathies with you.
Ah, too considerate of us, so unworthy such
consideration
!
was the exclamation of Kate beside her.
Do not, dear Emily, oppress yourself by reflections
such as these. You leave us to no difficulties; for
though the country still be at war, yet our quarter is
free from its ravages; and though under hostile control,
it is still quiet, and not now a dangerous one. We
are all here at peace.
Why seek to deceive me, Kate, when but a glance
at Robert tells a different story? Look at the pistols
in his belt, and say why they are there, if war be not
around usif there be no occasion for strife, and if
he is not exposed to its dangers? You cannot
persuade
me out of my senses, though in this I am quite
willing that you should. Would that it could be so!
I would not believe these truths if I could help it.
And you need not, Emily, my sister; for though
there be war, and though I may be engaged in it, yet
the present prospects are, that it will soon be over, and
as we all wish itgiving us peace and freedom alike,
and securing honourable station for our country among
the nations of the earth. This last thought, my Emily,
ought to make you better satisfied with the risks our
people are compelled to run.
It does not, brother. I have not that vain ambition,
which, for the sake of a name, is content with the
bloodshed and the misery of mankind; and I hold the
doctrine hateful to one professing the Christian faith.
How it may be upheld, this warfare in which life is
taken as a worthless thing, and man's blood shed like
water, for any pretence, and with any object, by a
believer in the Savious, and the creed which he taught,
I can never understand.
You would not have us submit to wrong and
injustice
?
No; but the means employed for resistance should
be justly proportioned to the aggression. But, alas
for humanity! the glory and the glare of warfare, under
false notions of renown, are too often sufficient, not
only to conceal the bloodshed and the horror, but to
stimulate to undue vengeance, and to make resistance
premature, and turn the desire of justice into a passion
for revenge. Then, for the wrong done by one captain,
all the captains conspire to do greater wrongs; and the
blazing dwelling by midnight, the poor woman and her
naked children escaping from the flames to perish of
hunger, the gibbeted soldier on the nighest tree; and
the wanton murder of the shrieking babe, quieted in
its screams upon the bayonet of the yelling soldiers
these are the modes by which, repairing one wrong,
war does a thousand greater. Oh, when, calling things
by their right names, shall we discover that all the
glory of the warrior is the glory of brutality?
The picture which the enthusiastic girl had given
D 2
of the terrors of war, was too felicitously just, as it
had occurred in Carolina, to be denied by her auditors;
and as she had herself made the right distinction
between war as an absolute necessity, forced upon
a people in their defence, and pursued only so far as
adequately to obtain the mere object of justice, and
war as a means of national or individual notoriety,
there was no legitimate answer to her exhortation. A
momentary silence ensued, which was due to the
exhaustion
following her effort at speech. In a little
while she again addressed her brother
And how long, Robert, do you stay in our
neighbourhood
?
But a few days more, Emily: I linger now
somewhat
over my time; but my objects are various and
important.
And where then do you go?
Either to the Santee or the Peedee; wherever
there is a chance of finding Colonel Marion, to whose
troop I am attached.
And not so easy a matter, said Kate Walton,
if reports speak truly of your colonel. He is here,
there, and everywhere, and they say cannot often be
met with either by friend or foe, except when he
himself
pleases. What is it Colonel Tarleton calls him?
The Swamp Fox: and a good name, for certainly he
knows more of the navigation of the thick swamps of
the Santee and Peedee, than ever seaman of the broad
ocean. In a circuit of five miles he will misguide the
whole force of Tarleton for as many days; then, while
he looks for him in one quarter, Marion will be cutting
up his forages or the tories in another. He is fearless,
too, as well as skilful, and in the union of these
qualities
he is more than a match, with an equal force, for
any five of the captains they can send against him.
As the major spoke with that warm enthusiasm of
his commander, which distinguished the men generally
of Marion, an audible sigh from his sister recalled
him to his consideration, and he turned to her with
some observation on an unimportant subject. She did
not seem to heed what he said, but, after a moment's
pause, asked, rather abruptly, if he should move first
for the Santee.
I think so, was his reply; the probability is that
I shall there find my orders, if, indeed, I do not find
my commanding officers. I wait but to fulfil some
important duties, when I shall move direct in that
quarter.
And when, Robert, do you expect to return? was
the farther inquiry, put with considerable earnestness
of manner.
In three or four weeks, Emily; not before, and
probably not even then; for I may be ordered to join
the continentals, on Gates's arrival, and shall then have
a more limited range and exercise than now.
That will be too late, too late! murmured the
maiden with an expression of deep regret.
Too late for what, dear Emily? said the major,
quickly, in reply; but when he met her glance, and
saw the mournful utterance which it looked, he needed
no answer to his question. Never did eye more
explicitly
speak than then, and he turned his own away
to conceal its tears.
Too late to see me die, she murmured, as he
bent his head downward, concealing his face in the
folds of her encircling arms.
Ah, Robert! I leave you, but not lonely I hope
not altogether alone. Her eye rested upon the face of
Kate Walton, as she uttered the hope; and though her
brother saw not the look, yet the cheeks of the
conscious
Kate, so silently yet expressively appealed to,
were deeply crimsoned on the instant. She turned
away from the couch and looked through the window
opening upon the waters of the Ashley, which wound
at a little distance beyond them, stealing off, like a
creation of the fancy, under the close glance of the
observer
.
Her fingers played all the while with the
branches of the oak that rose immediately beside the
window.
Emily then intimated to her brother her increasing
debility, the necessity of her own repose and of his
departure
,
with a calmness which was perfect, and
painfully
appalling to him in consequence.
But come to me to-morrow, to-morrow night,
Robert
;
come earlyI would speak with you; I have
much to say to you, and I feel that I have but little
time to say it in. Fail me not, unless there be hazard,
and then heed not my desire. You must risk nothing,
Robert; your life is more valuable to me, strange to
say, as my own is leaving me. I know its value, as I
am now about to be taught its loss. But go now
and remember, to-morrow.
His grief and his farewell were alike voiceless.
He pressed her cold cheek with his lips at parting;
then, like one who had left behind him all his
consciousness
,
he descended with his beautiful cousin
from that sad but sacred apartment, where life still
lingered, neutralizing decay with its latent freshness,
but where immortality already seemed to have put
on some hues of that eternal morning, whose bloom
and whose freshness speak, not only for its lasting
existence
,
but for its holy purity.
CHAPTER VI.
I cannot list thy pleading, though thou plead'st
In music which I love. Forbear thy suit.
Her
father being absent, Kate did the honours of
the household, and we need not say how much
gratification
Major Singleton felt in being accompanied by
his sweet cousin to the lower apartments. He had
another reason for his satisfaction in this attendance,
as it afforded him an opportunity which he had much
desired. We have already seen him urging those
claims upon her closest regards which she continued
to evade. He now determined to press them; and,
handing her to the sofa with a degree of solemnity in
his manner which led her to conclude that his object
was any thing but what it really was, she willingly
took the seat to which he conducted her. Singleton
was no sentimentalist, but a man of sterling character,
and deep, true feeling: he was one of those who never
trifle; and the prompter at his heart, though taking the
name of that capricious mood which is always fair
game for the arch jest and playful satire, was yet
altogether
a more lofty and dignified sentiment. His love
was of his life a leading part: it made up his
existence
,
and imbodied in its own the forms of a thousand
strong obligations to society and man. It was now
prominent to his own view in the form of a sacred
dutya duty to others not less than to himself.
Perhaps
,
too, as he was something of an idealist, and
strove to believe in attributes which are not always
found profusely in the world, there may have been
something of the spiritualizing character of poetry
mixed up in his devotionsgiving dignity to a purpose
which is usually urged with timidity, but which, in the
present case, was treated with all the straightforward
singleness of aim which belongs to the man of mere
business.
Katharine, he said, after a brief pause, during
which his eyes gazed on her with a calm deep
earnestness
which at length sent the glance of hers downward
beneath themKate, my cousin, months have passed
since you were taught to know my feeling towards
you. Since I have known you, that feeling has been
hourly on the increase. I loved, the more I knew; and
though changes have come over us bothchanges of
fortune, of condition, of appearanceyet I have only
admired you the more with every change. You have
always seemed to me the onethe one onlywhom I
could truly love and cherish as a wife; and this thought,
my cousin, has not been because of your beauty, which,
though great, has never called forth, and shall never
call forth, so long as I think you what I think you now,
one single encomium from me.
She would have interrupted him, but he simply placed
his finger upon her arm, and proceeded.
Nay, fear not, and do not interrupt me. I know
you too well, and think of you too highly, to endeavour
now to fill your ears with praises of that beauty of
which neither of us can be utterly unconscious. I
shall speak of other qualities which have recommended
you to me, not in praise of them now, but only as, in
urging my pretensions to your hand, I would prove to
you that I have studied your character, and am so far
satisfied with the results as to be willing now to
adventure
all my affectionsand they are concentrated very
closely now, and will soon be more soin the offer
which I shall make you. I think now that I know your
character. I have seen its firmness, its masculine good
sense, and its unostentatious delicacy. Such a
character
will not be apt to misunderstand mine, and in this
lies one chief security of domestic bliss. Such, for a
long season, has been my thought, and I must now act
upon it, or never. I have reasons for desiring it now,
which your own reflections may not teach you, and
which you must know hereafter. Cousin, dear Kate,
forgive me if my speech be less than gentleif it
seem abrupt or harsh; I am not apt at professions;
and with you I would rather avoid that show of
sentiment
which I know makes up, most commonly, the
language
of the lover. To you I would rather that my
words should be of the most simple and least equivocal
character. To your good sense, not your weaknesses,
the proffer of my hand is now made. Let me hope
that your good sense will determine the question, which
I would not willingly submit to any other tribunal.
He took her hand, at the conclusion of his remarks,
and she suffered it to rest passively in his grasp. She
did not immediately answer, but appeared lost in
reflections
,
which were not, however, the less pleasing
because
they exhibited themselves in doubt and
indecision
.
Her eye, meanwhile, did not fall beneath the
searching gaze of his: its deep and beautiful blue met
his own unshrinkingly; nay, with something of a
sympathizing
fondness in its expression, which the tenor
of her uttered reply did not, however, confirm. The
pause of the moment over, she turned to her suitor.
Robert, you have but this moment come from the
chamber of sicknesssoon to be the chamber of death.
You cannot deceive yourself as to the condition of
Emily; she is sinking fast.
I know itI feel it, he answered, gloomily.
How can you know ithow can you feel it, Robert,
when you come from the presence of one already linked
as it were with heaven, and thus immediately after urge
to me so earthly a prayer? How can I, so filled as my
thoughts should be, and are, with considerations of gloom
and the grave, thus give ear to any less sanctified
consideration
.
Pardon me, dear cousin; but it seems to
me almost irreverent that we should discourse of any
other themes at this moment than those of sorrow.
At another time, and with an affliction less severe
than this, your rebuke would have been felt. But this
to me is no common affliction. It leaves me alone
unaccompanieddesolate in all the wide world of man.
You know our history. For years that girl has been
all to me: I had her to love; I was her brotherher
protectorher all; and upon her I expended a
thousand
strong feelings and warm affections which, when
she goes, must crowd back upon, and overwhelm me.
We must have something in life giving us the right to
lovesomething which we can make our own
exclusive
altar-place, which our loves and cares may hallow
to themselves, sacred from all intrusion, all rivalry, all
denial from another. While she livedwhile there
there was hope for herthere was always one to me
of whose sympathies, when others were cold or stern,
I could be certain. When she leaves me, Kate, I am
alone; there is but one to whom I may turn with
confidence
and trustbut one, and of that one I would
be secure in the proffer which I now make to you: it
is for you to say, and to say freely, with what hope.
Robert, you know well how I esteem you
Utter no professions, Katenot so coldly, at least
if you really have regard for me.
You mistakeyou do me injustice, cousinI
would not be cold or inconsiderate. I do esteem
you
Esteem!
Well, welllove you, then, if you like the word
better. He pressed her hand. I do love you, and
too well ever to be cold to your claims or unjust to your
merits. I have heard you with a degree of regard of
which I shall not speak; and I feel, deeply feel, the
high compliment which you have paid me, in the offer
of your hand. But let me ask of your reasonof
your own good senseif the present be the season for
engagements of this nature? I speak not now of the
condition of your sister, but of the country. What is
the hope of repose, of domestic felicity, at such a
period
,
when the strong arm of power, at its caprice,
invades every sanctuary?when the family mansion
of the wealthy planter shares the fate of the loghouse
of the squatter?and when a renewal of injury only
meets your application for redress? You will see that
this is no season for thoughts such as those belonging
to the offer which you make me.
It is, then, to the timeto the consummation, at
this periodof my proposal, and not to the proposal
itself, which you object? Do I understand you thus,
dear cousin?
Not exactly, Robert. I object to all at this season;
I object to a consideration of the proposal at this
moment
,
as unseemly and improper, for many reasons;
and I beg, therefore, that you would withdraw your
application
,
and not exact from me any answer now.
And why not answer for the future, Kate? Why
not say, conditionally, in answer, that when the
prospect
comes of peace for our country? I would not,
indeed, that we should marry now: I would only be
assured that I had in you, whatever may be the chances
of war or the vicissitudes of life, one to love me, and
one whom I could meet with an affection like her own.
I would have you even as an ark to me, shrining and
preserving my best affections, however the storms
raged and the billows rolled around us.
I will not deny to you, Robert, that were I disposed
to make at this moment a pledge of my heart to any,
I know not one to whom I would sooner make it than
to you. If my character has been your study, I too
have been somewhat observant of your own. I have
long regarded you as one to whom honour was dear,
and manliness habitualas one delicate and true in
feeling, gentle in deportment, and properly sensible of
that consideration of the claims of others, without which
no man can possibly be a gentleman. These I hold,
in addition to your acknowledged bravery and good
sense, to be your characteristics; and they are such as
all sensible women must esteem, and which in you, as
my cousin, and one I have been so long accustomed to
esteem, I must love. Is not this enough? Wherefore
press me to say that I will not, at this time, make
pledges of affection with any manthat I will not bind
myself or my affections for the futurethat in this
season of peril, owing as I do the duty of a child to
her parent, I will not, while he may need my
attendance
,
bind myself to other duties, which may be
inconsistent
with those which I owe to him? Such must be
my answer, Robert, to the proffer which you make
me.
Ah, Kate! your pledge would be every thing to me,
amid the danger of the war we wage.
Nothing! she replied quickly; nothing more
than I would be to you, Robert, even now, were those
dangers to come home to you. Were you wounded,
believe me, cousin, or brother, or lover, I should watch
by your bedside, bathe your head, bring you
refreshment
;
ay, dress your woundsI pledge it as a true
womanwith as little scruple as if you were even
now my wedded husband. Nay, shake not your head;
you know me not, Robert, if you doubt me in this. I
Vol. II.E
may not have the strength, but I have the heart, I am
sure, to do all this that I promise.
And wherefore not say more? Why, if you are
willing to perform such duties, will you not give the
right to claim them at your hands?
Urge me no more, Robert; but now I will not, I
cannot. Wait the due season: when the war is over;
when Carolina shall be free from hostile footsteps;
and when the land is cleansed of its pollution;come
to me then, if you hold this same temper, and then, if
there be no change in me, I shall give you my hand,
perfectly and all your own, as fully as I give it to you
this moment in sisterly regard. There, take it, and
leave me, for the hour is growing late.
He carried the extended fingers to his lips, and
without farther word was about to hurry from the
apartment, when he was arrested in his purpose by the
sudden appearance of his aunt bringing a message
from his sister, requiring to see him, if he had not
already departed. An unlooked-for change had come
over her, according to the old lady's representations;
she had grown sensibly weaker, and she thought her
incoherent and slightly wandering. With palpitating
heart and trembling footsteps, followed by the two
ladies, he again ascended the stairs leading to the
chamber of death; but remembering the reference of
Emily to his pistols, and how their presence had
disturbed
her, he took them from his belt and placed them
upon a table which stood fronting the gallery. The
next moment, he resumed his seat beside the
shadowy person of the maiden.
CHAPTER VII.
How the flame flickers in the lamp!now bright,
With a strange beautyand now, dim for ever.
And
two opposing and mighty principles were at
fearful strife in that chamber. Death was there with
power not to be withstood, and there life vainly
endeavoured
to combat him. Yet there were no shows
of terror or of violenceno exhibition of the torturing
pain, and of the spirit vainly resisting and striving to
escape. All was gentleness, even in the murmurs
which occasionally fell from the lips of the dying girl.
Her cheek was transparenther eye wore a
sublimated
light, as it quivered in its socket, and flickering
in changing directions, seemed in search of some
expected
presence. Her pale lips were parted, and
the even tops of the pearly teeth below were just
perceptible
.
The gauze of her drapery was scarcely
lifted by the heave of her bosom; and as her hand lay
partially upon it, you might even trace out the smallest
of her blue veins, like so many fibres, shining through
the delicate skin. She was dyingdying without
seeming pain; and well might her brother fancy, from
the pleasant smile upon her countenance, that the
whispering sound which reached his ears on entering
the apartment, had fallen from the sister angels already
busy around her.
He sat beside her, took her hand, pressed his lips
upon her forehead, and for a few seconds remained
without attracting her notice. Her eye at length
glanced wildly upon him, and the lips, which had
fallen apart, were reclosed as she recognised him. At
last a faint smile enlivened thema fond effulgence
filled her eyeshe laid one of her hands upon that
with which he had already clasped her own, and
murmured
something faintly which he could not
understand
.
It was a strong effort which her mind had
made to concentrate itself upon a single object, and
some minutes elapsed before it was quite successful.
At length she spake:Oh, Robert, I sent for you.
I'm so glad you were not yet gone, for I feel that I am
dying. I am not mistaken now. I know it to be
death. This darknessthese shades that come across
my eyes are its cloud, and it presses momently closer
and closer upon them. It is so; and I have been
afraidvery much afraid since you left me, that my
thoughts were crowding and confused. They were
strangely mixed up togethervery strangely; and
once I felt that they were escaping me; and then I
grew terrified. I would not lose my sensesI would
have them to the last; for I would speak to you and
to Kate, even with my parting breath. It is sweet to
die so; I could bear it then: but not to know, not to
say farewell, and pray for you in the moment of
parting
,
would be terrible indeedterrible, terrible!
Her eyes closed, and her hands were clasped, as
she concluded the sentence, while her lips separated,
and her voice was heard in whispers, as if in prayer.
When they were again opened, there was a wildness in
their expressiona misty gleaming, that completely
confirmed her fear. The mind was evidently
wandering
;
but the strong will, still pre-eminent, enabled her
to bring back the forgetting thoughts, and to bind them
to the spot. Her words now were in broken
murmurs
.
Not my will, not my will, but thine, Fatheryet
for himfor Robert, my poor brothercould it only
befor himfor Robert!
The name recalled her more vividly to him who sat
beside her, and her eyes were again fixed upon his
face.
Old mommeris she here, Robertwhere?
He shook his head negatively, but made no other
reply.
Be good to her for me; tell herah!
She closed her eyes, and a slight distortion of the
lips declared the pang which she felt at that moment,
and from which it was several minutes before she was
so far recovered as to be able to speak again. When
she did, it was with a sweet smile of patient
resignation
.
Strange that death cannot take his prey without
inflicting pain! I am willing to go with him. I offer
no resistance; yet he strikes and rends, the same as
if I did. Life struggles still, even when you desire it
not; but it does its dutyit holds on to its trust, and
I must not complain. But, dear Robert, forget not old
mommer. Give her all my things; and there is a new
frock which I have made for her myself. Kate will
give you the message that is to go along with it. And,
Robertthe gardentheah, how cloudy, cloudy
so very dark; and that is through sinsin
The lips continued to mutter, though the words grew
indistinct. The mind was again wanderingthe soul
was anxiously seeking to escape its earthly
tabernacle
;
but the flesh struggled obstinately to detain its
prisoner. Singleton on one side, and Kate upon the
other, bent speechlessly over the dying maiden. The
eyes of Kate were full of tears; but Singleton choked
with the grief to which tears could give no utterance.
She started while he lay in this position, and her head,
with unusual vigour, was lifted from the pillow; while
her eye, glancing with a strong light, looked down
upon him with a bewildered glance, as if terror and
astonishment prompted its expression. He was roused
less by her movement, of which, as his face was buried
in the pillow, he had been unconscious, than by the
words which followed it.
Oh, you are here? Well, take it; but it's a sin, and
you know that it is sin. There were but two, and they
both died; andyes, they both diedone in the
morning and the other in the evening, but all on the
same day, and that was God's blessing. It's
She shook her head, as she checked herself in her
E 2
wandering expressions, and, with a sad look, remarked
upon it
It is soI feel itI feel how uncertain my
thoughts are; they are continually going from me, or
putting on strange forms, and I only get them back
with an effort which is painful.
She raised her right hand as she concluded, gazed
upon it attentively, and then begged Kate to hand her
a mirror. She looked in it for a few moments, and
then put it away from her, with a melancholy but sweet
smile.
I shall not look in it again, I think. I do not wish
it; for it tells me how young I amhow very young
to die: but the less sorrow, the less sin! I have loved
you allyou, Robertyou, and you, Kateyou
dear auntforgive me all, if I have said a cross word,
or done any thing unkindly. Forgive mewill you
not?for I would not thinkingly have pained you.
Forgive you! ay, that we do, my child; if there
be any thing you have done needing forgiveness from
us, or anybody, which I believe not, I forgive you
from my soul, my blessed angelGod Almighty bless
and forgive you!
Her aunt was the only one about her who could
reply
;
she understood the speechless sorrow in the
faces of her brother and cousin, and the pressure of
her hand in theirs had a sufficient answer. This
pressure seemed to prompt a new feeling and desire;
and with an eye turned pleadingly to Kate, she strove
to carry her hand towards that of her brother.
Without
scruple, Kate freely extended it, and the hands of
the cousins were clasped above the form of the
sufferer
.
She nodded her head, and smiled in
approbation
.
At this moment a servant from below beckoned
Kate away, and she left the room. A sudden stira
commotion, rather louder than usual, and certainly not
desirable at such a place and hour, reached the ears
of Singleton; and while he was wondering, Kate
reappeared
.
Her face was full of alarm, and, hurriedly,
she informed Singleton of the approach of enemies.
Oh, Robert, you must fly! A troop is below from
the garrison, with Colonel Proctor at their head. They
are now moving rapidly down the avenue, and will
soon be here. Fly to the back balcony, while I keep
the door closed in front.
He bowed his head slightly in reply, but took no
other heed of her information; while, proceeding to do
as she had said, Kate descended to the hall below.
With head bent down upon the pillow, Singleton gave
way to that abstraction of soul which belonged to a
sorrow so trying as his own. He seemed utterly to
have forgotten the words of his cousin, and made no
movement, and showed no disposition to regard them.
Seeing this, his aunt now came towards him, and
endeavoured
to arouse him to a sense of his danger.
You waste time, Robert, that is precious. For
God's sake fly, my son! Fly, while the chance is
allowed
you.
I cannotI will not.
Why, Robert, why? It will soon be too late.
Why not do as Kate has advised you? Take the back
piazza, and delay no longer.
And leave her? was the melancholy reply, as he
gazed down with a look of self-abandonment upon the
scarce conscious girl before him.
What is itwhat is it, aunt? she cried, starting
up from the pillow, as the entreaties of the old lady,
rather loudly expressed, reached her senses, and
aroused them.
He is in dangerthe British are coming; and he
won't fly, though he knows they will hang him without
judge or jury.
Robert, Robert! said the girl, turning to him
quicklyall her thoughts coming back to their proper
activity. Delay not an instant, my dear brother.
Delay notdelay notbut fly.
Urge me not, Emily; there is little danger, and
I would much rather remain here with you.
Deceive me not, brotherI warn you, deceive
me not! she exclaimed, with a sterner tone of
expression
than heretofore. There is danger, and your
stay involves your safety. Do I not know the doom
which they hold for him whom they call rebeldo I
not? Leave me, and go at onceI imploreI
command
you.
I cannot
You must vex me notchafe me not, dearest
brother, in these moments which should be sacred to
peace. Do not imbitter my thoughts by uselessly
exposing
yourself to danger. Ha! they comethey
come! Fly, I command youflyfly from me, or I
will leave you in anger. Fly, fly!
He turned to press his lips to her forehead, but she
turned from him away.
Say that you will goyes? was her brief
sentence
.
I willI will!
She turned to him with affectionate fondness, gave
him her hand, and his lips were glued to her own.
God bless youGod bless you, and keep you safe.
Fly now, and delay not.
A noise from below of approaching feet, warned
him of the necessity of a quick flight; but as he was
about to leave the chamber, the little black girl who
attended upon it, informed him that a guard had been
posted at both the doors in the front and rear of the
dwelling. There was but one resource, and that was
suggested by his aunt. She pointed to the chamber
window, against which the shrouding branches of the
thick oak from below had lifted themselves, as with a
friendly offer of succour. He returned to the chamber
his lips were once more pressed to those of his
sister, who continued to urge his flight impatiently;
and tearing himself at length away, he was soon
descending
the tree, which fortunately stood on the side
of the dwelling, remote from either end, and hid in the
deepest shadow.
Look, look down, aunt, and say if he is safe, said
Emily, panting with the impatient effort. The old
lady gazed attentively, as the rustling of the tree
indicated
his progress down.
He is now at the bottom, my child. He is safe
down.
And he flies unseen?
No, my child, he stands at the bottom.
Oh, call to him to flybid him delay notdoes
he go?
Now he moves; he moves towards the big
walnut-tree
.
Oh heavens! he will be seen, if you can see him
so far. Say, dear aunt, where is he now?
He moves from tree to tree, my child. Be patient,
they see him not. Now I lose him, he goes behind
the kitchen. Now he moves along the fencehe is
over it, and in the shadow. They cannot see him
now, and he will soon be at the river. He is safe
he must be safe!
Thank God, thank Godmercy!What is that,
what is that?they have slain him, they have slain
him!
A sudden rush of feet, loud voices in dispute, and
the discharge of a pistol, were the sounds which had
so acted upon the senses of the dying girl. These
circumstances require an attention to the progress of
the party under Proctor, and their success in entering
the house before the doors could be closed against
them, according to the original design of Katharine.
Finding her purpose hopeless when she descended to
the hall, she met Colonel Proctor at the threshold.
His manner was studiously respectful; how could it be
otherwise, when met by the majestic form of a woman
like the one who stood before him?her figure erect
her high forehead seeming to expand with the
swelling
veins upon ither eye kindling with intensest
light, and the whole expression of her face that of
dignified rebuke.
Colonel Proctor chooses strange hours for doing
honour to my father's household; but when he learns
that the master of the house is from home, I trust that,
as a gentleman, he will forbear to trespass farther upon
the privacy of ladies. I doubt not that my father will
freely see him in any seasonable visit he may think
fit to make.
She stood directly before him in the passage-way,
and it was not so easy to pass by her. He had
previously
given orders to a couple of soldiers to secure
the back entrance; and feeling himself, accordingly,
perfectly secure in his hold upon his prey, having
himself the command of the front, there was no
necessity
for any precipitance calculated to diminish his
respectful deportment towards her who addressed him,
and whom he was so desirous to conciliate. Lifting
his cap, which for a moment after he held in his hand,
he replied
The hour is certainly an unseasonable one, Miss
Walton, and nothing but an imperative sense of duty
to my king and command could prompt me, in this
manner, to any trespass upon the privacy of those
whom I so much respect as the family of Colonel
Walton. It is my deep regret that any thing should
occur rendering such an assurance on my part
necessary
.
Mere compliment, Colonel Proctor, contrasts oddly
with the violation of that sacred privacy which should
be conceded to our sex, when unprotected by the
presence of any one of yours.
I knew not of your father's absence, Miss Walton,
returned the Englishman, quickly. Her reply was
instant.
And the knowledge of it now, sir, secures us, I
trust, from any farther intrusion?
The retort annoyed him, since his previous remark
led obviously to the inference which she had made
from it. There was a flush upon Proctor's cheek as
he replied, with an air of decision
I am sorry, Miss Walton, to say that it does not.
I know the unamiable light in which I must appear to
you from such a declaration, but I must be content to
rely for my justification on your own knowledge of
what is most becoming in a soldier. I must do my
duty.
You are imperative, Colonel Proctorbut I am
yet to know what part of your duty it is that brings
you to our poor abode at midnight.
The arrest, Miss Walton, of a rebela traitor to
his king and countrya disloyal citizen, who has been
skulking about the swamps, coming forth only to
murder, and who, I am informed on good authority, is
even now in this building.
The epithets conferred so freely upon her cousin,
awakened all the indignation of the high-spirited maid
her eye shot forth deeper and brighter fires, and the
curling hauteur of her lip looked a volume of contempt
upon the speaker. She suppressed much of this in
her language, and subdued the fever of her fierce
thought to something like a quiet expression of
unconcern
.
Your rebel has a name, Colonel Proctor?
He has, Miss Walton; regard for your family has
alone prevented me from giving it utterance.
Ha! indeedyou are considerate. But, sir, you
will please me not to constrain yourself too far. I
would know this brave rebel who gives you so much
annoyance. Thank God! there are some still in
Carolina, like myself, who owe no allegiance to the
king of England: who hate his rule as they despise
the slaves who obey it.
Colonel Proctor simply bowed as he replied
The rebel, Miss Walton, now supposed to be in
this house, is one Robert Singleton, one of Marion's
men, and ranking as a major in the army of rebellion.
You will suffer me, I hope, to proceed in searching for
him, since it is my duty, and one that I am resolute to
perform. Your language, Miss Walton, is such as to
render any scruples unnecessary; but I was a
gentleman
,
Miss Walton, before I became a soldier. As a
lady, I cannot be your enemy, whatever may be the
wrong which I may suffer at your hands.
The respectful, manly deportment of Colonel
Proctor
could not but have its full force upon a woman of
so much character as Katharine Walton. She replied
almost instantly, making at once a dignified
acknowledgment
of the undue severity of her speech, yet
insisting
upon the provocation which she had received.
Robert Singleton is my relative, my friend,
Colonel Proctorone whom I dearly love. You knew
much of this, if not all, yet your epithets were
unscrupulous
and unqualified in connection with his name.
I am a Southron, sir; one of a people not apt to suffer
wrong to their friends and kindred, without resenting
and resisting it; and though a woman, sira weak
womanI feel, sir, that I have the will and the spirit,
though I may lack the skill and the strength, to
endeavour
to do both.
It is a spirit which I honour, Miss Walton, and my
speech to you in reference to your relative, my own
sense of propriety has already taught me was highly
unbecoming. You will forgive me, if I rightly
understand
your nature, Miss Walton, much more readily
than I will forgive myself for the error. Meanwhile,
I trust that you will permit me to pursue this search,
since you have not assured me that its object is not
here.
I trust that Colonel Proctor, aware of my father's
absence, will leave us unmolested until his return.
I cannotI dare not, Miss Waltonmy duty
forbids
it.
Your duty gives you no command here, Colonel
Proctor, and your troops must be withdrawn, though I
call upon my father's slaves for that purpose.
Will they obey you, Miss Walton?
Ay, sir, to the last! I have but to say the words
and they will rush upon your bayonets.
I am wasting time, Miss Waltonpermit me to
pass onward.
And he advanced as he spoke. She stood resolutely
fixed in the spot where she had first encountered him,
and he saw that he would be compelled to employ
some gentle force to put her aside. Annoyed and
chagrined at the idea of any such necessity, he sought
by farther exhortation to gain his object, but she
refused
to hear him. At length, as a last resort, he
said
Miss Walton, I have no desire to press this matter.
Give me your word that the person I seek is not here,
and I withdraw my men instantly.
Withdraw your men, siryou keep them here at
your perilI give no assurances.
Finding his efforts unavailing, Proctor at once
advanced
,
and, resolute to put her aside and proceed in
his search, his hands were already extended for that
purpose, when, seeing his object, she hastily drew
back.
Touch me not, I pray you, if you please. If you
are resolute to intrude upon us, you do so at your own
risk.
And before he could pass she had withdrawn herself
from his presence, and hastily ascended the staircase.
Placing a guard at the entrance, he quickly followed
her, and as he entered the upper passage-way he found
her standing firmly in front of the door leading to
Emily's chamber.
Colonel Proctor, she said, solemnly, this is the
chamber of sicknesssoon to be the chamber of death!
I charge you not to approach it.
Miss Walton, I will do my duty, if you will allow
me, with as much forbearance as possible; but I must
do it.
At your peril, sir; and as he approached she
presented
one of the pistols of Singleton which she had
seized from a neighbouring table. The sight of it
only impelled the soldier in his forward progress.
Back, sir! I commandI implore you. I would
not use this weapon if I could avoid it; but I certainly
shall if you approach. Force me not to do so, I pray
you.
I cannot hesitateI cannot hear you; and with
the word he resolutely advanced. She thrust the
Vol. II.F
weapon forward, fixed its aim as nearly as possible
upon him, and with the single words
God forgive me, if I err in this, resolutely drew
the trigger.
In the next moment Proctor put her aside with the
utmost gentleness.
You are spared a crime, Miss Walton: the
spilling
of blood is not always grateful to man; what should
it be to woman?
He turned from her to the handle of the chamber
door, and she was too much stunned to seek to arrest
him farther. But, as he entered the apartment, he
started back in horror. The picture that met his sight
was too unexpectedtoo imposingtoo unlike any
thing he had ever looked upon or seen. He had seen
the field of battle, strewed with dead and wounded, but
the sublimer powers of death, in which he effects his
conquest without visible stroke or weapon, had never
met his eyes till now; and he gazed with something
like stupefaction upon his features, as they now rose
vividly before him.
There, rising from her couch, and partially erect
under the sudden convulsion, as well of physical pang
as of mental excitement, Emily Singleton met the
first glance of the intruder. Her face was ghastly
pale, but still how beautiful! her eye was glazing fast,
but still how expressive! and the look which she
addressed
to the intrudera look which seemed to
signify
that she understood his purposewas that of some
angry ghost rising from its shroud for the purposes of
solemn rebuke. A wan, spectral light from her eye,
seemed to fall in rays about the wasted cheek below
it; and the slight exhibition of her teeth, which the
lips, parting as in speech, had developed, contributed
still more strongly to the awful, spell-like expression
which her whole countenance wore to his eyes. She
murmured, but incoherentlyit might be an
imprecation
,
and so the Englishman thought it. Her arm was
slightly moved, and her fingers divided, as she strove
to lift them, but they sank back again into their places.
He could see no more, but rushed from the apartment.
Kate took her place beside her, and her hand adjusted
the pillows while supporting her. A sweet smile now
overspread her features, and her head sank upon one
shoulder. Gradually the glaze overspread her eyes, as
a cloud shutting in the blue skies, and she fell into the
sacred slumber.
Go up, go up, my blessed angel!the heavens are
opening for you!
These were the words of the aunt, while Kate lay
beside the lifeless girl immersed in all the silence of
the deepest wo. The spirit had gone for ever from the
trying and the troubling earth; the silver cord had
been loosedthe golden bowl was broken.
CHAPTER VIII.
The courage that looks up, though numbers press,
And takes a newer vigour from the storm.
Pushing
hastily from the chamber of death, Colonel
Proctor proceeded to the court below, where he
assembled
his men for the pursuit. Though profoundly
impressed with the solemn event which he had
witnessed
so
far different from any thing he had expected
to see in the apartmenthe was too good a soldier, and
too mindful of his duty, to lose time in those now idle
regrets at his own abruptness, which he yet properly
felt. A few brief words, directing his men upon
different
routes, and equally dividing them, and the party
dispersed in obedience to his commands. One of
them, consisting of four men, he himself led, and in
the very direction taken by the flying partisan.
Singleton knew his danger if taken, and at once, as
soon as he reached the horses, prepared for the most
rapid flight. He was weaponless, and there was no
other alternative for safety; he would most willingly
have stood his ground, for his was the spirit prompt
always to extricate itself from its difficulties by the
boldest daring. The strife with Proctor also promised
him a large degree of satisfaction, apart from that which
the employment itself might yield. It was with some
vexation, therefore, that, feeling for his pistols in his
belt, he remembered where he had left them. It was
too late to retrieve, and idle to lament the misfortune.
It was only in flight that it could be lessened; and he
took his measures accordingly.
Tighten your girth, Lance, and mount quickly;
we shall be pursued shortly, and I am without weapon
of any sort. I have left my pistols behind me.
Here are mine, sir; they are small, but they've
got a good charge, and new flints both.
Give me one of them, quickly now, and mount.
We must get into the main road, if we can, before
they come out of the avenue; so hasten, hasten but
hurry not; cool, boycool.
He tightened his own saddle-girth as he spoke;
took off the handkerchief that encircled his neck, and
thrust it into his pocket; then, seeing that the boy was
mounted and ready, he was soon in saddle himself.
Now pick the way, Lance; speak nothing, but
keep cool and silent: gently, gently at first; let us
send them as few sounds as possible.
The boy, with goodly promptitude, obeyed to
admiration
.
Starting with an easy, slow motion, they
emerged from the heavy oaks by the water's side,
ascended
the rising ground, and skirted a long, low fence
which girdled one corner of the estate, and led directly
to the main road. The track was simply a negro
footpath
;
but the evening was sufficiently clear to enable
them to trace it out perfectly and keep it with little
trouble.
We shall escape them; a few hundred yards more
will give us a fine start, boy, and that is all I care for.
How far is it now to the main track?
Not far, sir; just ahead. I think I see the
opening
in the trees. We shall soon be in it. Ha! did
you hear a noise, sirnow?
Yes: they are in saddle; they are after us. Push
on, push on; we have little time to waste.
Yes, sir, that they are; and if I'm not very much
mistaken, they are after us from two sidesdown on
our own trail, and coming out from the avenue. You
hear, sir? somebody cried out from the quarter of the
road, and we hear the horses' feet from the river, at
the same time.
More reason for speed, far more, boy; we shall
have to trust entirely to that. Here is the main road,
and they will soon see us on it. You know your
horse, Lanceyou are not afraid of him?
Afraid of him! no, sir, that I'm not; never was
afraid of any horse yet.
Then go ahead; strike in your rowel, and spare
not. There's no danger in front of you, so drive on.
This little dialogue was all over in a few moments.
The boy put spurs to his animal as soon as the main
road was entered, and, with an easy mastery of his
own steed, Singleton kept his place close alongside of
him. The road was a heavy sand, over which they
sped for the few minutes succeeding their first entrance
upon it; but soon they got upon a tough, pine land
ridge, upon which the beating of their hoofs might
clearly be distinguished at some distance by a heedful
ear; and it was not long, accordingly, before a loud
shout from their pursuers announced their discovery.
We could turn down here, sir, into the woods; and
there's a sort of wagon track somewhere about here,
I think I could find, sir, leads to the Stonoe. That
would lose them, certain, from our trail, said the boy.
No matter, no matter, keep on as you are; if they
come no nigher we are safe.
But I think they gain on us, sir; shall I go faster?
My nag can do much more.
No, keep his strength; they don't gain much now,
and we shall find it more usefulWhat is that?
A sounda rushing motion in the woods they had
F 2
but recently left, warned them of new pursuers: the
crackling of the dried sticks under feet was distinctly
heard, as the enemy moved over the same ground with
more haste and less caution than had been observed
by them.
Ha, we have them there, have we! and they will
soon be on the road. They hear us, and know our
route. Push on, boy, a little, but not much faster; a
breath more of speed only, is all we wantso, so.
The coolness with which Singleton spoke and acted
took from the flight most of the terrors which it
otherwise
might have occasioned in the mind of the boy.
His figure grew more and more upright with the
feeling
of confidence, as it swelled in his bosom; he began
to imagine the events of a struggle; he began to fancy
the features of the collision; and, with all its
disadvantages
,
to hope for the strife. There was much of
the same mood at work in the mind of his leader; and
his chagrin may not be expressed, when, under its
stimulus, he reflected upon his want of his weapons.
There was an air of vexatious indifference, a sort of
reckless hardihood in his demeanour, which, looking
occasionally behind him, the boy could not avoid
perceiving
.
Singleton caught the movement once or
twice; and, at length, in sharper tones than usual,
addressed
him
Why do you look around, sir? are you afraid?
No, siroh no!I don't think I amthat is to
saybut I never tried.
Tried what?
To fight with men, sir, and to shoot them; and I
don't know, sir, whether I should be afraid or not.
Singleton smiled; the feeling of the boy rebuked
his own, as it was boyish also.
Go on, sir; look not behind again, unless you
would have your own shoulders frighten you. And
you may urge your nag a little faster; those fellows
are now out of the bush, and in the heavy sand;
you will soon hear them on the ridge, and then they
will have the same clear track with ourselves; go on,
now, and to keep you from looking behind you more
frequently than is needful, remember that I am
between
you and danger. Touch your nag; let him feel
the thorn, and be lively.
The boy felt mortified that Singleton should think
that he looked round from apprehension; and thought
how happy he should be, to show him that he was not
afraid; but, without a word, he did as he was directed
stuck the spur quickly into the yet unbreathed
animal
,
which bounded away under the first impulsion with
a far more generous movement.
As the partisan had said, the pursuers were soon
upon the pine-land track, over which they had
themselves
passed but recently. Proctor led them with an
earnestness which arose, not less from his own
estimate
of the value of the game, than from a personal
feeling, if not interest, which he seemed to entertain in
his arrest. As he entered the little negro trail
running
by the fence, he heard the shout of the party
from the avenue below; and, as this seemed to say
that the fugitive was within reach, a new impetus was
given to his exertion. By dint of hard riding he soon
got up with the party which led off the pursuit; and
the spur was not spared in order to diminish the
vantage
ground which the partisan already had, in the
space thrown between them. The composure and
coolness of the flight tended to this object not less
than the speed of the pursuers; and it was with no
small satisfaction that Proctor was now enabled to
distinguish
the regularly recurring tread of the flying
horses. He readily imagined that Singleton would
put his animal to its fullest speed, and so thinking, he
did not doubt that a little more effort must result in
their overhauling him; believing this, he shouted
encouragingly
,
and cried out to his men, while bending
forward with all speed in the chase himself
Five guineas to the man who first lays hands on
the rebel! so to it, menhe cannot now escape us.
We gain on them at every leap, and their horses will
soon be breathed. Heed not the boy, but see that the
other is secure at all hazardsalive if you can, but
dead if he resist you: we must have him, dead or
alive; and the reward is the same. Onon!
A cheera hearty cheer, and a driving of the
spur, and the lash freely applied to the warming flanks
of the horses, followed this speech. They dashed
headlong through the thicket; they wound about the
obtrusive pine-tree, standing in the way, with all the
adroitness of an Indian pony; and soon were upon the
broad trace over which Singleton and the boy were
riding. Their horses' feet were heard, but they
themselves
remained unseen. The thick shadow of the
forest lay over the road ahead, and under its friendly
shelter the two fugitives were then speeding, with a
pace somewhat quickened in obedience to the
necessity
.
The boy wondered at Singleton's coolness as
their pursuers drew more nigh. But he ceased to
wonder when he heard the lash which the riders
behind
them were applying to their steeds. He
remembered
that their own had not been forced, and he felt
more assured.
Now, boynow is the time; they are drawing
nigher, and we may as well leave them for a while.
Bend to it, and keep beside me.
The boy did as he was bdden, and the difference was
soon perceptible; the noble animals sprang off with
all the elasticity of freshness, while those of their
pursuers, which had been ridden rapidly to The
Oaks, and then as rapidly after them, failed, in spite
of the repeated urging of their riders, to increase their
speed a second. Gradually, the sounds grew less and
less distinct upon their ears, and were nearly lost,
when all on a sudden, and quite unexpectedly, the steed
of Singleton stumbling along the ground, precipitated
his rider clear over his head. The boy instantly
gathered up his reins, and leaped from his animal
beside him.
Oh, sir! you are hurt! I'm afraid you are hurt!
was his passionate exclamation, as he approached
the partisan.
A little, Lancea little; but I'm afraid Sorrel is
hurt a great deal more. He moves with difficulty.
Singleton rose with some effort from the ground.
He had been slightly stunned and somewhat bruised
by the fall; but not so much as to incapacitate him
from movement. He approached his horse, which had
also risen to his feet, and now remained trembling upon
the spot where he had fallen. Singleton took the
bridle in hand, and led him off a few paces. This
was sufficient to satisfy him that the animal was too
much lamed to yield him much if any service in the
flight that night. The danger was pressing, as in the
brief space of the event recorded, the pursuing party
had regained the ground, and something more, which,
in the increased speed of the partisan, they had
previously
lost. Singleton at once adopted his decision.
Lance, you must mount instantly and fly; I'll
take the bush and try to get into safe cover. There's
no time to waste, so at once about it. To horse, boy;
why do you stand?
Why, sir, it's you that's wanted in camp, not me.
I can hide in the bush just as well as you, sir; I'm
not afraid!
Go to, my poor boy; go to, and be not foolish; do
as you're told and no trifling. Know you not that if
they take you they'll hang you to the tree as a rebel?
But, sir, they will hang you tooI know that; and
I'm smallI can hide better in the bush than you.
Vex me not, but do as I have told you. Mount at
once and fly, or I shoot you down on the spot. Go.
I shall save myself.
The boy obeyed reluctantly, and it was high time
that he should. He had barely time to remount, which
he did with a sad, slow step, when he heard the voices
of the pursuers, who, in all this while, had failed to
hear the tread of the fugitives. The boy fled quickly
on his way, and leaving the lamed horse in the road,
not having time to remove him, the partisan plunged
into the thick woods alongside, just in season to
avoid the immediate observation of the pursuers.
They came up to the spot, and though his horse, with
a native instinct, hobbled forward feebly, as it were to
escape them, they quickly surrounded him, and,
perceiving
his condition, at once conjectured that the rider
was in the adjoining cover. The voice of Proctor was
at once heard in the promptest order
Dismount, fellowsdismount, and search the wood
he must be close at hand, and cannot escape us if
you look well. The woods are thin and open. Five
guineas, you know, dead or alive, to the man that first
takes him.
Ah! there's a chance, then, for a choice of death,
at least, said Singleton to himself, bitterly, as,
standing
immediately beside the road, he heard the
sanguinary
order. His hands fingered his belt,
unconsciously
,
where the pistols had been placed, and he
cursed the thoughtlessness which had brought him off
from the dwelling without having first secured them.
But he made up his mind to resist at all hazards,
weaponless
or not, if once encountered. He had his hope
of escape, however, and one that did not seem so very
unreasonable. Instead of rushing off into the woods,
where, from the lack of undergrowth, he might have
been discovered readily, he clung to the luxuriant
brush, the product of a vigorous sun acting freely upon
it, that skirted the road. The troopers dismounted,
all but Proctor himself, and another, who seemed a
corporal, and was addressed as such. Supposing, very
naturally, that the fugitive would seek to imbower
himself as far in the woods as possible, they scattered
themselves over too large a surface; and the cries and
the clamour of the search gradually receded from the
highway. Proctor, meanwhile, accompanied by the
single trooper who had been left with him, alternated
to and fro over the road; and as he moved down the
path, a new prospect of escape was suggested to the
active mind of the partisan. The horses of the
troopers were fastened to the swinging boughs of a
tree only a few paces distant. Could he reach them
unheard? He looked out, and waited until the forms of
Proctor and the corporal grew more indistinct upon the
road, then cautiously keeping in the ditch skirting the
track, and still behind the bush, he approached the
tree. The horses looked up as he drew nigh; and
with a careful glance he strove to single out a stout
animal before he emerged from cover. He did so
one a few yards distant pleased him best, and he
anxiously awaited until the two riders, who were now
returning, should again wander away from the spot, to
rush out and secure him. In the mean while the hunt
of the troopers continued in the wood. The dancing
shadows in the starlight occasionally deceived them
into hopes of the fugitivesometimes the persons of
one another; and on these occasions their hurras and
encouraging shouts were prodigious. Proctor passed
close beside the tree as he came up, in the rear of
which Singleton had sheltered himself. He was
chafed at the delay, and shouted to his men as
laggards
,
repeating the reward offered, and in his tone and
language alike clearly evincing his own earnestness in
the desire which he expressed.
He must be there, Corporal Turnerhe could not
have gone far, sirbut a moment before he was
mounted, and we heard both horses distinctly. This
beast is Singleton's, for so the fellow Blonay described
hima bright sorrel, with long tail, and a white blaze
on his right shoulder. This is the animal.
It is, sirthe very nag; and, as you say, sir, he
cannot have gone far into the bush, if he went in at all;
but may he not, sir, have gone double with the boy on
the other horse?
The devil!yesI did not think of that; and if
so, we have lost him. Damnation!it must be so.
And in his chagrin Proctor resumed his sauntering
ride to and fro along the high-road, followed by the
corporal at a little distance. How impatiently, yet
cautiously, did the partisan look forth from the bush,
watching their movements! Satisfied at length with
the distance thrown between them, and impelled the
more readily by the increasing and approaching
clamour
from the wood, he resolutely advanced from his
cover, and with a most marvellous composure undid the
loop of the bridle from the bough, and led out the steed
which his eye had already chosen. It was a
broad-chested
,
strong-shouldered, and well-built animal, that,
under ordinary circumstances, would have been
admirably
well calculated both for flight and burden. But
he had been hardly ridden that night, and there was no
erectness in his head and necknothing elastic in his
treadas Singleton led him out from the group. But
there was no time to be lost in lamenting this.
Besides
,
his condition was that of all the rest, and the
prospect of the escape now was quite as good as that
of the pursuit. In an instant more he was mounted
the head of his animal turned up the road, and, with a
single glance behind him to note the distance of his
enemy, he plied the spur, and once more resumed his
flight.
What is that? cried Proctor to the corporal.
Ha! it must be the rebel; and, by Heaven! upon one
of our own horses. Rideride, sirafter him with
me, and he shall not escape us yetmy horse is too
good for any he could get from that pack, and I can
soon overhaul him. Sound, sir, for the men to saddle
and followsound, sir, and follow.
His orders were given with a rapidity almost
emulating
his horse's speed. Vexation at being so foiled,
anger at the object, and a sense of his duty, alike
stimulated
the Briton to the most hearty endeavours. His
steed went over the ground like an arrow, while the
corporal wound his bugle, calling up the wandering
troops dispersed about the wood. His animal failed
entirely to keep up with that of his commander, and
Proctor had the satisfaction to perceive that he gained
upon the fugitive. Singleton was soon conscious of
this fact, and seeing that there was but one enemy, he
began to calculate the necessity of a conflict at all
hazards, almost without a weapon and trusting only to a
proper management of his steed to foil and overthrow
that of his pursuer. He was a good horseman, and
knew most of the arts by which this might be
achieved. These calculations became momently more
and more necessary. The closer tramp of the pursuing
steed was now sharply in his ears, and he had already
meditated the sudden turn upon him as soon as he
should reach the top of that slight elevation of land to
which he was fast speeding. This would give him an
advantage in descending upon the uptoiling charger.
With this purpose, he gathered up the reins with a firm
but not a close grasp upon the animal, as his object
was not by any means to restrain him; he placed his
feet firmly in the stirrups, which he threw close under
the belly of the steed, wrapping his legs, as it were,
around him; then, crouching forward upon the saddle,
he awaited the proper moment for the contemplated
evolution. The pursuer came on with a reckless,
unrestrainable
motion, and had already begun to move
along the elevation, when he drew the curb so
suddenly
upon his horse's mouth as almost to throw him
back upon his haunches. The rush of a troop in front
was in his ears, with the cry of many voices. The
partisan also looked forward, and wondered, dreading
to find himself between two enemies; but the next
moment reassured him, as he heard the voice of the
boy Lance Frampton, who was evidently in advance
of the new-comers.
Here they are! here they are, Colonel Walton!
They have killed the major! show 'em no quarter!
cut 'em downcut 'em down! There's not many of
them.
Back, boy! keep from the track!to the rear,
to the rear! cried the individual in command, while
waving his sword and advancing towards Singleton.
The partisan cried out to his uncle in the next
moment
Ha! a friend in need, good uncle! I shall
remember
the proverb. And, without a word farther, he
wheeled in with the advancing troop, which consisted of
the little party of volunteers pledged to go out with
Walton. Proctor was near enough to hear the
diaIogue
Vol. II.G
and to understand the danger. It was now his
turn to fly, and he delayed not in the endeavour. But
the troop of Walton, comparatively fresh, for they had
just started forth from their place of assemblage near
the Cross Roads when they met with Lance, was down
upon him in an instant. Proctor bravely threw himself
forward upon the first trooper that approached him, and
his sword flashed back defiance upon them, while his
voice shouted encouragingly, as if it could have been
heard, to his men, who were now approaching, though
not yet in sight. They certainly could not have come
up in time to save him, had Walton pressed the assault;
but that gentleman disdained the advantages which
were in his grasp.
Forbear, Colonel Proctor, he said, mildly and
respectfully, as he rode up in front of his enemy. We
purpose you no harm at this moment. You are free
to return to your troop. When we meet, sir, again in
strife, there will be no surprise on either side, and our
several positions will then be understood.
Colonel Walton, replied the Briton, I bitterly
regret to see you thusespousing a cause so
indefensible
and hopeless.
Neither indefensible nor hopeless, sir, as you shall
see in time. But there is no need of comment here.
I forbear all the advantages of the present moment, as
I am unwilling that you should think I have played the
hypocrite to deceive you thus to your ruin. You have
forborne, sir, heretofore, in your treatment of my house
your intentions have been friendly: permit me, sir,
to requite them as I do now. You are at liberty.
Farewell, sir. The terms of our meeting,
henceforward
,
must accord with those existing between my
country and yourspeace or war! peace or war!
Farewell, sir.
Proctor, chagrined at his disappointment, was
nevertheless
highly touched with the courtesy of his new
enemy. In a few brief words he uttered his
acknowledgments
,
and turned back to meet his troop, with a
bitter spirit, sore on many accounts. His present hope
of Katharine was evidently at an end; and feeling
towards
her as he did, how painful was the new position
in which he stood to her father! The subject
distressed
him; and he strove by a motion as rapid as
that of the pursuit to escape from thoughts too little
calculated
to yield him satisfaction to win him to their
indulgence. The parties were separated; the one on
its way back to the garrison, the other, somewhat more
imposing from its new acquisition of force, speeding
boldly for the Cypress Swamp.
CHAPTER IX.
I take the hand of my fierce enemy
In a true pledgea pledge of earnest faith
I fain would seal in bloodhis blood or mine.
While
the events which we have just recorded had
been going on in one quarter, others not less imposing,
though perhaps less important to the partisans, had
taken place in the swamp. There, as we remember,
Humphries, after the escape of Goggle, had bestowed
his men in safety. Deeply mortified by that
occurrence
,
the lieutenant had been more than usually
careful
of his remaining prisoners, as well as of his
appointments
of the camp. The fires had been well
lighted, the several watches duly set, and all
preparations
were in even progress for the quiet passage of
the night. To John Davis much of these matters had
been given in charge, and, in their proper execution,
he approved himself the same trusty soldier that we
have elsewhere found him. The prisoners were put
entirely and particularly under his direction; and
having
placed them separately, each securely tied, in the
little bark huts which were scattered about the island,
through the co-operation and continued presence of the
sentries closely set around them, their custody was
quite as complete as, under existing circumstances, it
could possibly have been made. Such, among others,
was the condition of the luckless Hastings. His hut
was isolated from the rest, and stood, on the very edge
of the island, upon a slight elevation. Tied, hand and
foot, with cords too stout for his strength, he lay upon
a pile of rushes in the corner of his cabin, musing,
doubtless, like most of his fellows who have
experienced
a sudden reverse, upon the vexatious instability
of fortune. Nor did his musings prompt him at all
times to that due resignation which a proper course of
reflection, in such a case, would be most usually apt
to occasion. He suffered himself to be too much
disquieted
by his thinking; and, at such moments, seeking
to elevate himself from his prostrate condition, he
would lose his balance, and roll away from his place,
like a ball under some foreign compulsion. A few
feeble efforts at release, resulting always in the same
way, taught him at last to remain in quiet, though, had
he known the fate of Sergeant Clough, upon whose
bed of death he now lay at length, his reflections, most
probably, would have been far less satisfactory than he
now found them.
Even now they were far from agreeable. The
sergeant
chewed but the cud of bitter fancy; the sweet
was all denied him in his dungeon of bark. He could
not misunderstand or mistake the dangers of his
position
.
He was the prisoner of the man he had striven
to wrong in the tenderest part; he beheld the authority
which that man exercised over those around him; he
well knew the summary character of the times, which
sanctioned so frequently the short shrift and certain
cord; and, considering himself reserved for some such
fearful mode of exit, as the meditative vengeance of
Humphries might best determine, he bitterly denounced
his own evil fortune, which had thus suffered him to
be entrapped. He writhed about among his rushes, as
these thoughts came more vividly to his mind; and
despair of escape at length brought him a certain
degree
of composure, if not of resignation. He drew up
his knees, turned his face to the dark wall, and strove
to forget his predicament in the kindly arms of sleep.
Yet there was hope for him at handhope of a
change of condition; and any change was full of
promise to Hastings. The hope which had been
partially
held out to him by Davis, before conducting him
to the swamp, was now about to be realized. The
watches had all been set, Humphries himself had
retired
;
and, apart from the sentries, but a single trooper
was visible upon the island, in the centre of which, by
a blazing fire, he stood, with one foot of his horse over
his knee, from the quick of which he was striving hard,
with hook and hammer, to extract a pebble. From his
couch of pine brush, under the dark shadow of a tree,
Davis looked forth, momently and anxious, upon the
horseman. At length he proved successful. The horse
was led away to the end of the island, and, after a
little while, the trooper himself had disappeared.
With the exception of the sentries, all of his own
placing, the partisans had each taken the shelter of his
greenwood tree. Some were pillowed here, some
there, in little clusters of two or three, their heads
upon their saddles, their hands clutching fast rifle or
broadsword, and the bridle hanging above, ready for
sudden employment. Sometimes, a solitary trooper
stretched himself, unaccompanied, under a remoter
shelter, and enjoyed to himself those solacing slumbers
which it is always so pleasant to share.
With the perfect quiet of all things around him,
Davis rose from his own place of repose. He
cautiously
surveyed the course he proposed to take, and
stealing carefully from the inclining shadow of one
tree to that of another, he approached unobserved the
hut of Sergeant Hastings. The sentinel was prompt.
Ho!standthe word!
Continental Congress! It's a big word, Ralph
Mason, and hard to come at, the more so when it's a
quick sentry like you, that doesn't give a body time to
look it up. But that aint much of a fault, any how, in
a soldier. Better too quick than too slow, and the
G 2
good sentry is more to the troop than the good horse,
though the one may carry him off when the tories are
too thick to be troubled. You can go now, Ralph;
go to my straw, and you can lie down till I come to
wake you up. I'm to ax the prisoner here some
questions
.
Glad of this relief, the sentinel made his
acknowledgments
to his superior, and did not hesitate to avail
himself of the proposed luxury. Taking his place for
a moment, to and fro before the door of the hut, the
Goose Creeker employed the time between the
departure
of the sentinel, and his probable attainment of the
bed of rushes to which he had assigned him, in the
meditation of that plan which his mind had partially
conceived, while escorting his prisoners to the swamp,
and of which he had given a brief hint to Hastings
himself,a plan which promised him that satisfaction
for his previous injuries at the hands of Hastings,
which his excited feelings, if not a high sense of
honour
,
had long insisted upon as necessary to his
comfort
.
The present time seemed a fitting one for his
purpose; and the opportunity which it offered, as it
might not occur again, was quite too good to be lost.
Having properly deliberated, he put aside the bush
which hung partially across the entrance, and at once
passed into the hut of the prisoner. Hastings was not
asleep, and started hastily at the intrusion. His worst
fears grew active, as he saw the figure of one before
him, whom, in the dimness of the place, he could not
distinguish. He could only think of Humphries, and
his breathing was thick and rapid, as he anticipated,
each moment, some fearful doom at the hands of the
avenger. His tones were hurried, as he demanded
Who's there?speak!what would you?
Don't be scared, Sargeant Hastings; its me, John
Davishim they call Prickly Ash, of Goose Creek.
Mayhap you remember sich a person. I'm that man.
Hastings rather freely avowed his recollection.
Well, I'm mighty glad you're not asleep, as I
didn't want to put hands on you for any business but
one, and that's the one I come to see you about now.
You're sure, now, Sargeant Hastings, you're wide
awake, and able to talk about business.
The reply was in the gentlest and most conciliatory
language. The tones were singularly musical indeed,
for a throat so harsh as that which Davis formerly
knew in possession of the same person; and the
sigh-like
utterance which told the partisan that he was all
attention, contrasted oddly, in the thoughts of Davis,
with those notes which he had been taught hitherto to
hear from the same quarter.
Well, if you're wide awake, Sargeant Hastings,
I've some talk for you, you'll maybe be glad enough
to hear, for it consarns both you and me a little.
Any thing, Mister Davisany thing you have to
say, I shall be happy, very happy, to listen to.
Very good, said the other; that's very good,
and I'm mighty glad to see you've got your mind made
up to what's to come; and so, since you're ready to
hear, I'm cocked and primed to speak, and the sooner
I begin the better. Now, Sargeant Hastings, mind
what I say, and dont let any of my words go into one ear
and out of another. They're all words that cost
something
,
and something's to be paid for them in the end.
I give you this warning, as it aint fair to take a man
unawares.
Hastings promised due heedfulness, and the other
proceeded as follows:
You see, then, Sargeant Hastings, you're not in
garrison now; you're not at the Royal George, nor in
any of them places where I used to see you, with the
red-coats, and them lickspittles the tories, all about
you, ready to back you agin their own countryman,
whether you're right or wrong. You're turned now,
as I may say, on the flat of your back, like a
yellow-belly
cooter, and nobody here to set you right but me,
and me your enemy.
Hastings sullenly and sadly assented to the truth of
this picture, in a groan which he accompanied by a
twisting motion that turned his face completely away
from the speaker.
You needn't turn your back, Sargeant Hastings;
it's no part of a gentleman to do so: but jist listen
a bit to the God's truth, and you'll larn a little civility,
if so be its in your skin to larn any thing that's good.
You see, now, the game goes agin youthe cards is
shuffled, and trumps is changed hands. You're in as
bad a fix, now, as if you was at old sledge, and all
seven up was scored down agin you. You're not cock
of the walk any longer; you aint where you can draw
sword agin a man that's got none, and have a gang of
chaps to look on, and not ax for fair play. There's
some chance now for a small man, and I reckon you
feel the difference.
A sullen response from Hastings, who, though
irritated
greatly, thought it the wiser policy not to appear
so, acknowledged the correctness of what his
companion
had said.
But don't think, the other proceededdon't
think, Sargeant Hastings, that I come to crow over you
in your misfortunes. No! dang it, I'm not the lad to
take advantage of any man in his troubles, even though
I despise him as I despise you. I'm for fair play all
the world over, and that's the reason why I come to
you now.
What would you have, Mister Davis? inquired
the sergeant, with something of his old dignity of
manner.
Well, that's a civil question enough, and desarves
a civil answer. You ax me what I will have; I'll tell
you after a bit; but there's something, you see, that's
like a sort of history, and, if you'll listen, I'll take
leave to put that afore it.
Go on, Mister Davis, I shall be glad to hear you.
Well, I don't know that for certain; but we'll see
how glad you are as we git on in the business. What
I've got to say won't take long, though I must begin at
the beginning, or you mightn't so well understand it.
It's now going on nine or ten years since old Dick
Humphriesthat's the father of Bellafirst came into
our parts, and made 'quaintance with our people.
Bella was a little girl at that time; but from that time
I took to her, and she sort-a took to me. The more
we know'd, the more we liked one another. I can say
for myself, I never liked anybody half so well as I
liked her. Well, everybody said it was a match, and
Bella seemed willing enough till the war broke out,
and you came into our parts, with your red coats, and
flashy buttons, and topknots; and then everything was
at odds and ends, and there was no living with the gal
at all. Her head got turned with your flummery, and
a plain lad like myself stood no chance.
Well, but, Mister Davis, that was no fault of mine,
if the girl was foolish.
Look you,no ill words about the gal; 'cause,
dang it, if I stand it. She may be foolish, but you
haven't any right yet, that I can see, to call her so; and
it's the more shame if you do, seeing that it's all on
your account that she is so.
I mean no harmno offence, Mister Davis.
Well, well, I aint taking any harm and any offence
at that. I only want to 'mind you to keep a civil tongue
in your head when you talk of Bella; for, though she
shies me off, and I stand no chance with her, and the
game's all clear done a-tween us, I won't hear anything
said to her disparagement; and it will be mighty
ridiculous
for you if you say it. I'm trying to speak to
you civilly, and without getting in a passionand its
not so easyfor you're my prisoner, you see; and it's
not the part of a gentleman to say ugly things to a
man that can't help himself; but it's in the way of
what I've got to tell you, and you'll be good-natured
and excuse it, if I sometimes hit upon a part of you
that sounds like a rascal, and don't stop to pick what
words I shall say it in. But that's neither here nor
there; and I may as well go on with what I was
saying
.
Bella took a liking to you, and to your coat and
buttonsmonstrous little else, Sargeant Hastings, now,
I tell you, for the gal has sense enough to see that
you're not the properest looking chap, nor the finest, nor
the best-natured, that comes into these parts. But it was
the showy buttons and the red clothesthe big feather,
andI don't want to say it, Sargeant Hastings, 'cause,
as I said before, you're my prisoner, and it's not
genteel
to say ugly things to one's prisoner; but my
mother
always trained me to have an ambition for truth,
and a man's not a gentleman if he doesn't speak it;
so that's the reason, you see, that makes me tell you
that it was partly because you were so flashy, and so
impudent, and had such a big way about you, that took
in the poor gal at first, and that takes in so many that
ought to know better. It was your impudence, you
see, sargeantthat was it; and, as sure as there's
snakes, she'll get tired of you, you can't reckon how
fast, if she once gets you for a husband.
But that she'll never do, Mister Davis;oh, no,
leave me alone for that. I'm no fool, I can tell you;
I've seen too much of the world to be caught blindfold.
Why, what! won't you marry herand the gal
that loves you too? The astonishment of Davis was
conspicuous in his emphasis.
Marry her, indeed! No, I thank ye! I never
thought of that, was the contemptuous reply of the
prisoner.
Now, dang it, Sargeant Hastings, but I do despise
you more than a polecat. You're a poor, mean skunk,
and a dirty varmint, that's only fit for killing; and I've
the heart to do it now, on the spot, I tell you; but I
won't, for you're my prisoner.
The indignation of Davis was kept down with
difficulty
;
and Hastings, lacking entirely that delicacy
which should have taught him that the considerations
of his rival in what he had said had been singularly
unselfish, only made the matter worse by undertaking
to assure him that his determination had been made,
the better to open the way for himself in the renewal
of his addresses. This assurance neither deceived
nor satisfied the lieutenant; and his words, though cool,
were bitter, and solemnly urged.
You're a shoat, a mean shoat, Sargeant Hastings;
and if I had nothing else to hate you for, I should hate you
mighty long and heartily for that. But it's no use
talking
;
and the sooner we stop the better. Now, can you
guess what I came to you for to-night?
I cannotnowhat?
To set you free; cut your ropes; put you on a
clear track, and mount you on a nag that'll take you
into Dorchester in a short hour and a half, free riding.
I told you I would do it. I will keep my word.
Indeed! Do I hear you, Mister Davis? my dear
friend
No friend, I thank youno friend, but a bitter
enemy, that won't do nothing for you without the pay.
I will do all this for you, as I have said, but there's
something I ax in return.
What! speak! ay! What price? name your
reward
,
sir, and
I willonly be quiet and keep a civil tongue in
your head while I tell you. You've put the flat of
your sword to my shoulder, Sargeant Hastings, when I
had none to lift up agin you; that's to be paid for.
You've come between me and the gal I had a liking
for, ever since I was a boy; that's to be paid for. You
tried to git her to like you, and then you laugh at her
liking; and that's to be paid for too. Now, can you
reckon up what'll best pay for these matters?
The sergeant was silent; the other continued
I'll tell you. A fair fight, as you promised mea
fair fight with broadswords, in a clear track, and no
witnesses but them there bright stars, and the round
moon that'll soon be rising up to give us enough light
to do our business.
I'm willing, Mister Davis; but I've no sword, and
I'm tied here, as you see.
Never be a bit afraid. I'll come in an hour, and
I'll cut your cords. I'll carry you out to the skirts of
the swamp, where the clear moon will look down upon
us. I'll hitch a stout horse to the hanging bough; and
it shall stand in sight waiting for you, the moment you
get clear from me. I'll give you a pick of a pair of
swords, which shall lie flat upon the earth before you;
and you shall then give me satisfaction for all them there
matters that I tell ye of. You're a bigger man than
me; you're used to the broadsword: I can handle it
too, though I does it rough and tumble, and had no
schooling in the weapon; and you shall have as fair
play as ever you had in all your born days before.
And that's the offer I make you. Only say the word,
and I'll go to the spotcarry out the horsecarry out
the swords, and send the sentries off from the track I
shall take you.
The proposition took Hastings by surprise. He
was no coward; but under existing circumstances, he
would rather have avoided the encounter in the novel
shape which it now put on. Yet, as he reflected, he
grew more and more satisfied with the plan. He had
manifestly all the advantages of strength, and personal
knowledge and practice of the weapon; and his
apprehensions
of Humphries were too great not to desire
to escape at all hazards from his clutches. Guilt
made a coward of him, as he thought of Bella's
brother
,
and as he remembered how completely he had
been unmasked before him. In a few moments he had
determined upon his answer, and the Goose Creeker
rejoiced to find it in the affirmative.
It's a bargain, then, said Davisyou swear to
it?
I do: I will go with you. Get all things ready,
as you have said, and I will fight you whenever you
please.
Well, now, that's what I like; and I'm glad to find
you're so much a man, after all. Keep quiet while
I'm gone, and when the horse is clear upon the skirt,
I'll come to you and set you loose; all you have to do
is to follownobody will see us; but you must be shy
how you speak. Only follow, that's all.
Saying these words, Davis departed from the hut.
As he emerged from its entrance, he heard the wild
laugh of the maniac Frampton, as he bounded away
from the immediate neighbourhood. He was too much
absorbed, however, in the affair before him, to give
much heed to an interruption so slight, and hurrying
away, without farther hinderance, proceeded to the
execution
of the devised plan. This plan had all been
heard by the watchful ears of the maniac. Crawling
to the hut of Hastings, as once before he had done,
when differently occupied, he was about to lift the
birch cover from the rear, probably with the same
murderous
intent which he had before put into execution,
when the approach and entrance of Davis had
compelled
him to be quiet. Concealed in the edges of the
hut, and well covered by its shadow, he had lain close
and heard every syllable of the preceding dialogue.
A strange purpose took possession of his unsettled
mind while he listened; and when Davis left the hovel,
he ran off howling and laughing with the fancied
accomplishment
before his eyes, of that new scheme,
which, with all that instability which marks the
diseased
intellect, had now so suddenly superseded the
original object which he had in view. Hastings,
meanwhile
,
with as much philosophy as he was master of,
strove to season his thoughts for the events which
were at hand.
CHAPTER X.
Such the wild purpose of degenerate man,
Vex'd by injustice into greater wrong
For many sins must ever spring from one.
The
prospect of his revenge before him, Davis
hurried
away with the view to its accomplishment. The
rough countryman had too deeply embarked his
feelings
in the frail vessel which his more audacious and
imposing rival had, to his eyes, so completely
carried
away, not to desire this object at all the hazards
Vol. II.K
which he was about to incur. He was violating his
duty, and about to risk his life for this object; yet he
did not regret the risks, so that he could be sure of the
strife which they brought him. For this strife,
regardless
of all inequality of strength and skill, he was
burningly anxious; and, under the exciting impulse of
his desire, he sped across the narrow point of the
island, making his way to the spot where the horses
were all in shelter. To remove one of them, without
disturbing the sleepers, required no little caution; and
the extreme slowness of movement which this
necessity
imposed upon him was a subject of some
annoyance
to the partisan. Before he reached the place,
he came rather suddenly upon the spot where Porgy,
with rifle in hand, had been stationed to do the duty of
a sentinel. The gourmand was in a state of
abstraction
the
butt of his rifle rested upon the ground, and
his fixed and settled gaze was quite different from the
habitual expression of his eyes. He started, as the
footstep of Davis reached his ears, and was evidently
disquieted by the interruption. His demand was
querulously
quick and loud
Who goes there?
The answer was given by the partisan; and the
tones of Porgy's voice changed instantly to those of
pleasant recognition.
Ah, Prickly Ash! my good fellow, you are just
in time to do me, and yourself, and the whole camp,
an eminent piece of service. But speak low, my dear
fellow, speak low, and make as little noise as
possible
.
What now, Porgy? was the question of Davis,
wondering at the anxiety of the speaker. What do
you see?
See!what do I not see? oh, blessed Jupiter! what
do I not see! and he threw out his tongue as he
spoke, rolled up his eyeballs till nothing but the whites
were perceptible, and letting the muzzle of his rifle
rest upon the hollow of his arm, rubbed his hands
together
with an air of delight which was perfectly
irresistible
.
Davis began to doubt his sanity, when the
other recovered himself.
What do I not see, my boy?look for yourself
herecome beside mefollow my fingerseeto the
little pond just beyond that old cypresssee the log
half rolled into the pondlook at the end of the log,
there, just where the starlight falls upon itlook and
see, and understand why it is that I rejoice. Look,
my boy, but speak notmake no noise, lest you disturb
the comely creaturesthe fascinating daintiesthe
dearhushhush. Stopping himself in the utterance
of his own raptures, which were growing rather louder
than prudence called for, he guided the eye of Davis
to the designated spot, and at once conveyed to the
mind of his companion a sufficient reason for all his
transports. A little bayou from the creek stretched
away for some twenty yards beyond it, and there, on a
fallen tree which was thrust half into the water, and
up from which they had crawled, lay three fine
terrapins
,
basking quietly in the starlight; their glossy
backs yet trickling with the water, and giving back a
glistening light to the scattering rays which fell
through the opening of the trees upon them.
That's a sight, John Davis, to lift a man from a
sick-bed. That's a sight to make him whole and
happy again. Look how quietly they lie; that
farthest
oneI would he were nigheris a superb fellow,
fat as butter, and sticking full of eggs. There's soup
enough in the three for a regiment; andhere, my
good fellow, take the rifle, and do the watch, while I
circumvent the enemy. You shall see me come upon
them like an Indian. I will only throw off this outer
and most unnecessary covering, and put on the
character
of a social grunter. Ah, the hog is a noble
animal
what
would we do without him? It's almost a
sin to mock himbut in making mock turtle, John
Davis, the offence is excusable: a good dinner, I say,
will sanctify a dozen sins, and here goes for one.
Forcing the weapon into the hands of Davis, the
corpulent sentinel, with a degree of earnestness and
elasticity which greatly belied his personal
appearance
,
soon threw off his coat and vest, and prepared
to undertake the conquest of the three unconscious
terrapins
that were taking their nightly nap so
pleasantly
above their oozy dwelling-place. Crawling upon
hands and knees, while Davis looked on and watched
for him, he made his way over the tussock, and soon
reached the log, on the end of which his threatened
victims were reposing. Here he commenced that
independent
and occasional grunt which marks the
progress
usually of the aristocratic hog, going where he
pleases, and grumbling as he goes. His imitation was
excellent; and Porgy was an adept at imitation: but
he had scruples at its exercise, as unbecoming in a
gentleman, unless where the object in view, like the
present, promoted the prospects and the pleasures of a
dinner. At the first sound, the largest of the three
terrapins
betrayed a degree of wakefulness, duly
commensurate
with the importance and safety of the bulk
of which he had the charge. He thrust out his long
neck and bullet head from his glossy shell, and, like an
old soldier, appeared to listen. His eye took in the
forms of his sleeping companions only, and he saw no
cause of danger in the dark, unruffled water of the pond
below him. A second grunt from the supposed hog
reassured the suspicious terrapin; and, familiar with
the animal whose part, so far, Porgy had so well
enacted
,
he drew in his circumspect countenance, and
prepared to knit up once more his unravelled slumbers.
In the mean while the persevering gourmand continued
to make his way; and, striding the very tree, at length,
which the game occupied, on hands and feet, he began
to adopt that mode of conveyance entitled in the
southwest
cooning the log, which is so frequently
practised
in that region, where a fallen tree, made slippery
by driving rains, is usually the only substitute which
the traveller finds for the solid bridge, or the less stable
canoe.
Davis now watched his progress with some anxiety.
But, though himself anxious, Porgy felt too deeply the
value of his victims to risk their loss by any
precipitation
.
He moved along at a snail's pace, and
whenever
the huge tree would vibrate beneath his
prodigious
weight, the cautious trapper would pause in his
journey, and send forth as good a grunt as ever echoed
in Westphalian forests. The poor terrapins were
completely
taken in by the imitation, and lay there
enjoying
those insidious slumbers, which were now to be their
ruin. Nigher and nigher came the enemy. A few
feet only separated the parties, and, with an extended
hand, Porgy could have easily turned over the one
which was nighest. But the eyes of the gourmand
had singled out the most remote of that sweet
company
.
He had taken in at a glance its entire
dimensions
,
and already, in his mind, estimated, not only the
quantity of rich reeking soup which could be made
out of it, but the very number of eggs which it
contained
.
Nothing short, therefore, of this particular
prize would have satisfied him; and, thus extravagant
in his desires, he scarcely deigned a glance to the
others. At length he sat squat almost alongside of
the twothe third, as they lay close together, being
almost in his grasp, he had actually put out his
hands for its seizure, when the long neck of his
victim
was again thrust forth, and, with arms still
extended
,
Porgy remained for a while quiet. Again the
terrapin drew in its suspicious head, and the hands
descended
with a clutch from which there was no
escaping
.
One after another the victims were turned upon
their backs; and, with a triumphant chuckle, the
captor
carried off his prey, one by one, to the solid
tussock
.
I cannot talk to you for an hour, Prickly, my
boynot for an hourhere's food for thought in all
that time. Food for thought did I say! Ay, for how
much thoughtI am thoughtful. The body craves food,
indeed, only that the mind may think, and half our
earthly cares are for this material. It is falsehood
and folly to speak of eating as an animal necessity,
the love of which is vulgarly designated an animal
H 2
appetite. It is not so with me. The mere feast is
nothing to the pleasure of its preparationits
attainment
.
Am I not willingdo I not love to share it with
all? What is it prompts me in the pursuit of game like
this? That love of ingenuity, of adventure, which is
man's true nature, which is continually changing its
forms and features, and exhibiting itself in aspects
perpetually
new, and continually adventuring in new
provinces
.
Our nature is never so legitimately employed,
my dear Prickly, as when it is inventing, contriving,
multiplying images and offices, the purposes and
pleasures
of which are to keep us from stagnation. Now I
shall give you all a surprise to-morrow. I shall dress
all these terrapins differently. You shall have enough
of the old steaks and the soup to satisfy; but there
shall be some experiments. I thought of one as I
approached the log, and when the cunning of that big
fellow there nearly discovered me. The grunt saved
me, and with the grunt came the idea of a new dish, as
it were, like lightning, to my mind. That terrapin, I said
to myself, shall be compounded with hog, in memory
of this event. There shall be a union of forces
between
them, and you shall see the glorious dish that
I shall make of it. But, where do you go?
Returning the rifle to its owner, whose prizes lay
on their backs at his feet, Davis was now hurrying
away upon the business which this incident had so
far suspended. He replied by telling Porgy that he
was bent for the skirts of the swamp, and should
probably
be gone all night.
But not longer, my dear fellowdon't think of
staying longerI would not you should miss mess
home to-morrow for the world. There's too much at
stake, quite, and I beg that you will think of it. A
dinner once lost is never recovered. The stomach
loses a day, and regrets are not only idle to recall it,
but substract largely from the appetite the day ensuing.
Tears can only fall from a member that lacks teeth;
the mouth, now, is never seen weeping. It is the eye
only; and, as it lacks tongue, teeth, and taste alike,
by Jupiter, it seems to me that tears should be its
proper business. The mouth has no sorrows.
Davis hurried away from the doughty and
good-natured
speaker, who would willingly have detained
him all night; and successfully detaching his own horse
from the rest of the group, he carefully chose two
stout weapons, and carried them off with all secrecy,
and without farther interruption, to the spot which he
had determined upon for the place of meeting.
It was a quiet spot, and well calculated for a mortal
struggle. The area was sufficiently large for that,
and the trees completely encircled it. The ground
itself was a sandhill, such as, in that neighbourhood,
will sometimes rise suddenly out from a swamp, and
drink up the still trickling waters of a streamlet running
beside it. The starlight gave a sufficiently strong
light for the combat, and the moon was now about to
rise. Davis surveyed the ground in silence, and with
something of grave reflection crowding upon his mind
as he did so. His desire for revenge had made him
almost entirely unmindful of the possible results to
himself of the contemplated struggle; and now that
he looked upon the sands, so soon, as he thought, to
soak up the blood of himself or his enemy, or both,
his reflections were neither so calm nor so pleasant
as he could have wished them. Not that he feared
death; but its idea is one of terrible contemplation.
We should always esteem the danger, however boldly
we may advance to meet it.
But the die was cast, and no useful result could
possibly arise from his reflections now, as it was out
of the question to suppose that his determination
could be changed. That was forbidden by the general
sense of society in the quarter in which he lived; and
striving heartily to dismiss all consideration from his
mind, save that which told him of the injuries he was
to avenge, he fastened to a neighbouring tree the horse
which was destined for the survivor, and plunging
back into the swamp, took his way towards the place
where the partisans lay sheltered.
The time which he had lost in the watch for Porgy,
and in the removal of the horse and weapons to the
place of appointment, had not, however, been left
unemployed
by others. Suffering a brief half-hour to
elapse, with that method which is at periods the
feature
of most forms of madness, the maniac Frampton
emerged from the swamp, and came to the hut where
Hastings was imprisoned. The prisoner looked up
as the huge form darkened the imperfect light at the
entrance, and wondered at the increased size of his
enemy.
Come, said the maniaccome!
But I am tied hand and foot, Master Davis, and
can't budge a peg, unless you cut the cords, was the
reply. Without a word, the maniac did as he was
required
.
He separated the cords with his knife, which
he straight restored to his belt, while the freed
sergeant
,
stiff and sore from his fatiguing constraints,
rose slowly, and stretched himself painfully in the air.
A dd hard bed I've had of it, Master Davis, and
my limbs work as if they wanted greasing. A sup of
Jamaica now were not bad.
Come! cried the maniac, impatiently.
Half wondering at the sullenness and unsociability
of one whom he was about to indulge with a fight after
his own desire, Hastings, nevertheless, thought it
prudent
to forbear farther speech while such was the
mood of his companion, and simply obeying his
command
,
followed him forth from the hut. Madness is
fond of schemes, else it is most probable that
Frampton
would have used his knife upon Hastings,
summarily
,
as he had already done upon Clough. But
the lingering reason still strives at authority even in
the head of the insane man; and though disordered,
weakened, and deprived of some one or more of its
auxiliaries, it still seeks, by a method of its own, to
establish its supremacy. It still plans, contrives, and
creates; and the cunning of the madman is a singular
feature of his sometime disorder. It was so with the
individual before us. He had taken his way, in the
first instance, to the hut of the prisoner, intending for
him the same fate as that which befell Clough in the
same situation. The approach of Davis had made
him pause. In that pause, he heard the proposed plan
of the Goose Creeker to his enemy, and the quick
imagination of the maniac readily adopted it as his
own. He had watched, accordingly, till the partisan
had gone to effect his preparations, and had then
chosen his time, as we have seen, to complete for
him what he had so well begun. We have seen how
far he has succeeded. Still unknown by the prisoner
for he avoided all unnecessary speech, and the dim
obscurity of the place did not allow of his detection
the maniac led the way at once through the creek,
taking a route different from that which would have
been pursued by Davis.
Come! he cried impatiently to Hastings, as the
latter floundered slowly and with difficulty through the
mire and water. Come!
The sergeant did his best to keep up with his
conductor
,
but he found it no easy matter. Familiar with
the swampsa wild dweller in their depths
Frampton
strode away almost as easily as if upon the solid
land. He picked no pathhe availed himself of no
friendly log, offering sure footing and an unimpeded path
through the slough; but dashing in, through bad and good
alike, he led the luckless sergeant over a territory the
worst he had ever in his life travelled. Occasionally,
the maniac would pause, as the other lingered behind,
to utter the expressive monosyllableCome! a
thrilling, half-suppressed sound, which, from his lips,
had a singularly imposing accent in the ears of his
victim. The fatigue of his progress made the
apprehensions
of Hastings exceedingly active; and as
occasional
glimpses of starlight came through the trees,
giving him a more distinct view of his conductor, he
could not avoid a feeling of disquietude, as he remarked
a singular expansion which had taken place in his size.
He half wished the adventure had not been
undertaken
;
but then again he thought of Humphries. The
thought gave him new energy to pursue his way, and
he toiled on with most praiseworthy perseverance,
until he came to a broad, high tussocka solemn
looking
place, closely imbowered with the hugest pines,
and almost insulated by the long miry pond which
half encircled it. His conductor had already gone
through it, and stood on the edge of the tussock, as it
were, in waiting for his advance. The prospect gave
additional disquiet to the sergeant. Surely, thought
he, he will give a body time to rest a while; he will
not be for the fight off-hand.
Come! cried his enemy to him across the pond,
and, with something like desperation, Hastings plunged
into it. The mire closed oozingly around him,
almost
to his middle, and he toiled through it, unable to
lift his legs free from its embrace, by the sheer
onward
pressure of his body. Drenched and dripping,
he arose upon the bank, and stood before the man who
had conducted him. A terrible laugha shrill
demoniac
screechfilled his ears, and he shivered as he
heard it with unmitigated terror.
Whowhat are you? he cried to the maniac.
Where is Davis?
He waits for you, was the response of the
madman
Come!
Oh, you are to conduct me to him, is it? said the
other, somewhat more reassured; but he told me he
would come himself.
Come! and, like a fierce spirit of wrath, the
maniac
waved his arms forward to the deep recesses of
the woods that lay dark and dense before them.
Awed by the action, and more so by the terrible sound
of that voice which was deep-toned like an organ, the
sergeant went forward without hesitation. They
entered
the thick wood, passed through the intervening
foliage, which continued dense and thick for some
thirty paces, and then suddenly opened upon a space,
and into a degree of light that almost dazzled the
prisoner
.
The tussock, in this part, was bald almost like
the door-prairie; indeed, it was the door-prairie,
though on too small a scale to warrant the application
of the term familiarly. The deep vault of heaven,
clear, blue, and perfectly unclouded, was flowered with
its profuse myriads, and the bright eyes looked down
upon the two as if they had no dread of crime, and
had never been the silent watchers of human suffering.
The moon, too, had sent up in the east a faint glory,
the harbinger of her own coming, which spread itself
afar like a transparent colour, clearly distinguishable
from the starlight immediately around, which it now
began to supersede. The wild man paused, looked
briefly upon the rich assemblage above him, turned
back to beckon his companion, and once more, with a
waving hand, led the way over the prairie. In a few
moments they had gained a treea huge cypress
which stood on the opposite side of the tussockand
there the maniac paused. Acquiring confidence as he
came up, Hastings approached his conductor, and was
about to speak to him, when, with a finger upon his
lips, he silenced the forthcoming speech by a look,
while he pointed to his feet. The sergeant gazed
down upon the spot, and started back with something
like astonishment, if not terror, in his countenance.
They stood before a new-made gravethe clay freshly
piled above it, and the whole appearance of the spot
indicating a recent burial. The maniac did not heed
the expression of the sergeant's face; but after a
moment
,
seemingly of deliberation, he prostrated himself
before the grave. Much wondering at what he saw,
Hastings
awaited in silence the farther progress of the scene.
Nor did he wait long. The maniac prayedand such
a prayersuch an appeal to a spirit supposed to be
then wandering by, and hearing him, was never before
uttered. Incoherent sometimes, and utterly wild, it
was nevertheless full of those touches of sublimated
human feeling which characterize the holiest aspirations
of love, and which, while they warm and kindle, purify
at the same time, and nobly elevate. His prayer was
to his departed wife. He prayed her forgiveness for
a thousand unkindnesses,a thousand instances of
neglectof querulous rebukeof positive injustice,
with which he bitterly reproached himself. Then
followed
a tender and really exquisite description of the
humble and secret pleasures which they had known
together. The joys of their childhood and youth, and
the enumeration of many little incidents of domestic
occurrence, of which he now reminded the hovering
spirit. Tears poured from him freely as he repeated
them, and for a few moments the wild man was
absolutely
softened into calm; but the change was terrific
which described her cruel murder; how, stricken down
by the brutal soldiery, she lay trampled upon the floor,
dying at last in torture, with her infant, yet unborn,
adding
its prayer to that of its mother for the vengeance
to which he had devoted himself. This brought him
to the point when the trial must come on with his
victim
.
He started to his feet, and rushed madly towards
Hastings. The sergeant, to whom the latter part of
the prayer had taught his danger, prepared to fly in
terror. But the swift foot of the maniac was after
him, and his strong arm hurled him backward to the
grave, over which he reeled and fell, heavily and
overborne. He cried out aloud in his desperation, as
he beheld the maniac bounding towards him. He cried
aloud, and the echoes only replied; and a white owl
that hooted from the cypress over the grave, moaned
mockingly to his cry. The fierce executioner seized
him with a grasp which defied and disdained all
resistance
.
He dragged him to the gravehe stretched
him out upon it, placed his knee upon his breast, and
with that dreadful screech, which well accompanied his
movements, he drew the already bared knife from the
belt which contained it.
Mercy! mercy! implored the sergeant, while his
shout of terror, a voice beyond his own, rang wildly
through the swamp and forest, craving mercy, and
craving it in vain.
You showed her none!none! You struck her
downyour foot was upon her, and she died under it.
Comecome!
The maniac was impatient for his prey, and he
yelled scornfully at the impotent struggles of his victim.
At that moment a loud voice was heard calling to them
from the swamp. The wild man, with all the caprice
of insanity, sprang to his feet as he heard it; and
seizing that moment of release, the sergeant also rising
rushed away to the wood in the direction of the voice.
The maniac looked at the fugitive scornfully, and for
a brief space did not offer to pursue; but the delay
was only momentary. In another instant, Hastings
heard the bounding tramp of the heavy feethe heard
the ominous screech of his enemy, speaking death to
his imagination; and a fresh speed came to him from his
renewed terrors. He shouted ever, as he flew, to the
approaching person, and had the satisfaction to find
that his cry was responded to by the voice nearer at
hand. He now entered the little wood which separated
him from the mire, through which he had groped his
way before with so much difficulty. The wretch
prayed as he ranprobably for the first time in his
lifeand the cold sweat trickled over his face as he
uttered his first fervent appeal to his God. The prayer
was unheardcertainly unheeded. The maniac was
upon him, and the first bound which the fugitive made
into the mire of the swamp, was precipitated by the
hand of the avenger. Rushing into the mud after him,
the maniac grappled with him there. Though hopeless
of his own strength in the contest with one so far
superior
,
and only desirous of saving himself unhurt until
Davisfor it was he who now approached them
should come up to his relief, Hastings presented a stout
front, and resolutely engaged in the conflict. He shouted
all the while the struggle was going on, and his shouts
were chorused by the dreadful yells of his murderer.
Come to me quickly, John Davisquickly
quicklyfor God's sake, come!come!
Come! come! cried the murderer, in mockery;
and the sound of his victim's voice died away in a
hoarse gurgle, as the strong arm of the maniac thrust
the head of the pleader down, deep into the mire, where
Vol. II.I
he held it so long as the body continued to show signs
of life above. Davis came up at this moment.
Where is the prisoner, Frampton?where is
Hastings?
Ho! ho! ho! See you notsee you not?he is
herelook! And he pointed him to the legs of the
victim, still jerking convulsively above the mire.
Great God! man, pull him outpull him out, for
Heaven's sake, Frampton! And, as he spoke, the
Goose Creeker, horrified by what he saw, bounded
into the mire himself for the extrication of the dying
man. But, at his approach, the wild savage thrust the
wretch still more deeply into the ooze, until it was
evident, from the quiet of the body, long before Davis
could extricate him, that all life had departed.
Why have you done this, man? cried the aroused
and disappointed partisan to the murderer; but the
maniac only replied by another of his terrible screeches,
as, bounding out of the mire, he took his way back to
the grave where his wife lay buried. The feelings of
Davis were melancholy and reproachful enough, as he
returned to the encampment.
CHAPTER XI.
Oh, thought may tread that lonely wild,
And carving on each tree,
May dream that some, who once have smil'd,
Will still be there to see:
The bark o'er former names hath grown,
Yet there is one remains, alone,
Whose freshness cannot flee
A spirit memory comes by night,
To make its fading traces bright.
Even
as the pilgrim, bound upon some long travel,
pauses by the wayside to plant a flower, or utter a
devout prayer upon the spot once sacred to some sweet
affection, and not yet entirely forgotten; so, stranger,
if you be a solitaryone, who, with a spirit that can
roam with nature, and find her forest-home at all times
acceptable, strays apart from the crowding city, and
the noisy abodes of menI will pray that you be
persuaded
to turn aside with me, in this our journey
together
,
and look, before we shall have gone too far to
return to them, upon these old-time tombs of
Dorchester
.
Sweet is their silencemay their repose be
sacred. They yield us a quiet rest, as they testify to
that of their inmates. We leave the thoroughfare, and
the woods girdle us thickly. The streets of the village,
mirthful and busy once, are overgrown with triumphant
cedarsthey crowd fitly upon these old trophies of
the sleepless conqueror. They shroudthey seem to
sanctify the spot; and you shall ramble over the ruins
and contemplate the few memorials which remain,
without dread of the thoughtless jeer, or the heartless
laugh of irreverent curiosity. Living man disturbs
not often this sainted neighbourhood. The place, in
his mind, is desolate enough. Not so, I think, in ours.
We shall gather something for thought from these
mansions of decay, where death shall carry the lamp
for life, and bring us to all his most secret places.
How much more solid than ours were the tastes of
our ancestors! how earnest did they seem in all their
labours! They were less selfish than their children,
and seem to have built almost entirely for us. Their
vaults how thick and huge, how cumbrous, how
timedefying
!
The narrow mind calls it vanity to bestow
so much pains on a human monument; but the moral
is the stronger, when we know that, however worthy in
the sight of his kindred was the object of this care, he
was still the victim of the unrelaxing death. The
thick massive tomb seems also well conceived to
illustrate
those impassable barriers of destiny which shut
the living man entirely out from him who has already
shaken off the coil and care of mortality. And, when
the tomb is rent asunder, as is the one before us, may
we not infer the ascent of the triumphant spirit,
throwing
aside all the idle restraints, even of the affection
that would keep it for ever to itself, and rising, on the
transparent wings of an eternal morning, to the fair and
wooing mansions of eternal bliss?
And there is the old church, like a thoughtful matron,
sitting in quiet contemplation among her children.
Their graves are all around her; but she, deserted by
those she taught and cherished, without even the
tongue to deplore themdumb, as it were, with her
excess of woshe still sits, a monument like
themselves
,
not only of their worship, but of the faith which
she taught. It is a graceful ruin, that will awaken all
your veneration, if the gnawing cares of gain, and the
world's baser collision, have not kept it too long
inactive
.
It stands up, like some old warrior, gray with
many winters, scarred and buffeted with conflicting
storms and strifes, but still uprightstill erect. The
high altar, the sacred ornaments, the rich pews, like
the people who honoured and occupied them, are torn
away and gone. Decay and rude hands have dealt
with them, as death has dealt with the worshippers.
The walls and roof are but little hurt. The tower has
been stricken and shattered, but still more hallowed by
the lightning which has done it. Some white owls
are in quiet posession of it, but as they are innocent,
and seem in venerable keeping with the place, the
gentle spirit will hold them sacred from harm; and
may no profane hand drive them away. Here, to the
right of the church, is a goodly cluster of tombs, fringed
in, thickly, by the pine and cedar. The cattle stray
here at noonday for the shady quiet, not less than for
the rank grass which the spot affords. They are not
the least gentle of its visiters. Rude hands, in some
cases, have torn away and broken up, in sinful
wantonness
,
the thick marble slabs which covered the
vaults, and recorded the history of their indwellers.
This was a double wronga wrong to those of whom
they told, and not loss a wrong to those who read, and
who might have won useful knowledge from a lesson at
the grave. Here, now, is the bone of an arma
slender
boneperhaps that of a woman. It lies before us,
unconscious of its exposure. We will disturb it no
fartherenough, if what we have seen shall have the
effect of persuading us to regard with less complacency
the vigour, and the power, and the beauty in our own.
Pass on. Here we may muse for hours, and our
thoughts shall be as various as the records we have
about us. Some of these tombs belong to history.
Here lies one of a man who was killed and scalped at
Goose Creek, in the war of the Yemassees, when those
brave savages came down in 1715. This stone tells us
of another who died at Eutaw in the Revolution, and who
was brought here for burial, at his own request. The
spot was sacred even then. You, who can find
sermons
in stones, and good in every thing, shall be at no
loss for matters of thought in the huge volumes of time
which death has here bound up togethertheir leaves
closely written upon, and every page full of a sweet
though sad morality. But, if you will descend with
me to the bottom of this little hill, inclining from the
burial-ground towards the Ashley, which steals in and
out below us, I will take you to one monument, now
sacred in our narrativeone monument, the history
of which is more familiar to our regards than all the
gravestones can possibly make it. The hill descends
gradually here, and the young pines crowd upon it
thickly. You see a little runlet of water that trickles
down its sides. The traveller, who knows where to
seek it, draws in from the roadside and drinks of it
freely, though he well knows that it finds its source
from the dwellings of the dead. At the foot of the
hill you behold a little enclosurea neat paling fence,
once white, but now sadly wanting repair. It is in
better condition, however, than most of those around
it. The seclusion of the spot tends somewhat to its
protection. This is the Walton Burial-place. The
old barony has given it many tenants. Here, now, is
a solid slab, twelve feet in length, that covers a
generation
.
A long inscription tells us of grandsire, son,
grandsonof their wives and childrenhow they were
I 2
worthy and beloved in life, and how they were
regretted in death. There are others at the side of
thisa goodly range, each having testament and
memorial
names
of many, of whom, as we know nothing,
with all the elastic indifference which is the
characteristic
of man, we can care but little. Not so,
however
,
with the slender shaft to which I now take you.
Here is a little hillocktread not upon itwhich
should be sacred to us. An infant cedar, when the
grave was fresh, plucked up by the roots from the
neighbouring woods, was planted at its foot. It has
taken a strong hold, and has grown into a beautiful
tree, which throws a pleasant and solemn shadow over
it. The headstone has but two letters that are now
visible
E. S.
Stoop with me, and a knife will help us to discern the
rest
born 7th May, 1763; died 21st June, 1780.
There are but two words belowbut twoand they
testify to the true affection of a brother
My Sister.
This is allall the story, save what our narrative has
given, of that sweet angel, whom, as Emily Singleton,
we knew on earth, whatever her accepted name may be
in heaven. Shall we not add our tribute to this sweet
and simple memorial?
THE GRAVE OF EMILY.
I.
'Tis a lowly grave, but it suits her best,
Since it breathes of fragrance, and speaks of rest;
And meet for her, is its calm repose,
Whose life was so stormy and sad to its close.
II.
'Tis a shady dell where they've laid her form,
And the hill gathers round it, to break the storm;
While, above her head, the bending trees
Arrest the wing of each ruder breeze.
III.
A trickling stream, as it winds below,
Has a music of peace in its quiet flow;
And the buds, that are always in bloom above,
Tell of some minist'ring spirit's love.
IV.
It is sweet to think, that when all is o'er,
And life's fever'd pulses shall fret no more,
There still shall be some, with a gentle regret,
Who will not forsake, and who cannot forget.
V.
Some kindlier heart, all untainted by earth,
That has kept its sweet bloom, from its bud and its birth,
Whose tears for the sorrows of youth shall be shed,
And whose pray'r shall still rise for the early dead.
CHAPTER XII.
If there be trial and a strife to come,
Let us embrace it, with a goodly joy;
Not linger to behold it, with wild stare,
A sad presentment of the coward heart.
But
, though we turn aside from the highway to
plant or to pluck the flower, we may not linger there
idly, or long. The business of life calls for speed
not less than repose; and the play of existence, for it
is little else, vibrates with more or less rapidity,
according
to the circumstances of its proper employment.
To fly heedlessly and for ever, and to stagnate and
rust, are alike evil; and the swift race-horse may not
always be trained to his highest pitch of speed,
without
suffering in consequence. Having lingered for
a while, and mused over sacred memories, let us
content
ourselves with casting our tribute-flower upon the
grave of the beautiful, and hurry away upon our own
necessities; striving, if not to forget, at least not
improvidently
to remember.
The hot chase over, which Proctor had urged after
Singleton, the latter, accompanied by his uncle, now
fairly
out
, returned quickly to the shelter of the
swamp. There they arrived late in the night, and
proceeded at once to those slumbers which were
imperatively
called for by their late fatigue. With early
morning, however, Colonel Walton aroused his little
troop and prepared to depart. Unincumbered as he was
with baggage or prisoners, he determined to proceed
instantly on his way to North Carolina, where he
hoped to encounter the advancing continentals. He
proposed to unite his men, as they were quite too few
for a distinct command, with some one of the corps
most needing them in the incomplete squadrons of the
southern army. His own services he proposed to
volunteer
to Gates, whom he knew in Virginia, and
between
whom and himself there had been an intimacy
prior to the commencement of the war. He did not
doubt, with these recollections in his mind, to obtain
an honourable appointment from his hands. The squad
of Singleton was not able to move with so much
rapidity. It had baggage, provisions, and prisoners
to carry; and, more than all, a tolerable supply of
powder
and buckshot for Marion, which Humphries, through
cautious management, had made out to procure in
Dorchester. The preparations for Walton's departure,
however, aroused the rest; and the troopers generally
turned out to take leave of their friends and past
comrades
.
Among those who rose early that morning
from their slumbers, though with a motive widely
different
from the rest, was the corpulent Porgy, whose
whole dream by night had been a mixed vision of
terrapin. He saw it in all shapes before his delighted
imagination. First came a picture of the sluggish
water, the protruding log, and, at its extremity,
precisely
as he had really seen them some hours before,
the three unconscious and sleeping victims. Nothing
could be more distinct and rational. One by one he
felt himself again securing them; and there they lay
at his feet, their yellow bellies turned upward in the
moonlight, while their feet paddled about ineffectually
on either side; and their long necks were thrust forth
in manifest dissatisfaction, as they strove to regain a
more upright, or, to speak more to the card, a less
unnatural position. Then came the dismemberment;
the breaking into their houses, the dragging forth of
the rich contentsthe crowding eggs and the choice
collops of luxurious swamp-fed meat. Various were
the dishes prepared by his fancy out of the mass
before
him; and he awakened at daylight, soberly bent
to put some of his sleeping fancies to the test of
actual experiment. The proposed departure of
Colonel
Walton and his party aroused his indignation: he
grew eloquent to Humphries on the subject.
To go off at an hour so unseasonable, and from
such a feast as we shall have by noonit's barbarous.
I don't believe itI don't believe a word of it, Bill.
But I tell you, Porgy, it is so. The colonel has set
the boys to put the nags in fix for a start, and him and
the major only talk now over some message to Marion
and General Gates, which the colonel's to carry.
He's heard nothing then of the terrapin, you
think? He'd scarcely go if he knew. I'll see and tell
him at once. I know him well enough.
Terrapin, indeed, Porgy! how you talk! Why,
man, he don't care for all the terrapin in the swamp.
Then no good can come of him; he's an infidel.
I would not march with him for the world. Don't
believe in terrapin! a man ought to believe in all
that's good; and there's nothing so good as terrapin.
Soup, stew, or hash, all the same; it's a dish among a
thousand. Nature herself shows the value which she
sets upon it, when she shelters it in such walls, and
builds around it such a fortification as thissee now
to that fellow, there. He held on to his back, would
you believe it, Humphriesconfound him! for half an
hour after I had been working at him! First, his
headI got it out with difficulty with my knife and a
stick sharpened for the purpose; and when I had
hewn it offyou see it there, and there it will gasp
and jerk long after we've done eating the bodyI
went to work upon the shell. Nothing but the hatchet
took it off, after all; and see what a gash I gave my
fingers while working upon it; but the game was
worth it, and the value of the meat is always in
proportion
to the toil which it gives us to get at itso
with an oysterso with a crabso with a shrimp
so, indeed, with all the dainties of which human
appetite
if
appetite may be considered merely human,
which I doubtis properly conscious.
Well, that's trueall the tough things to come at
are mighty sweet; but it does seem to me, Porgy,
that you make too much of your belly; you spoil it,
and it will grow so impudent after a while, that there
will be no living with it.
There's no living without it, my dear fellow; and
that's reason enough for taking care of it. The belly
is a great member, my frienda very great member.
We should not speak of it irreverently; its claims are
peculiar; it is the source of satisfaction in numberless
ways; and, I am convinced, however people may talk
about the brain, that it's a poor business after all, in
the way of thinking, in comparison with the belly. A
great deal may be said in favour of the belly; but
why need I say it? it is enough to name it, and its
importance
is understood at once by all people; and if
Colonel Walton be the gentleman I think him, he will
find a sufficient reason for delaying his journey until
noon, as soon as he hears of this terrapin. Go to him,
Billgo to him, old fellow; give him particulars, and
let him see what he loses by going. Stay; take the
upper crust of one of them with youthis fine one,
for example; and if that doesn't bring him to his
senses, I give him up. Go now, my dear fellow; be
quick about it, or you lose him, and he the soup.
Never was man more in earnest than Porgy; and
Humphries, who loved to hear him talk upon his
favourite
topic, told him how utterly impossible it was
for Walton to remain; assured him that he had already
intimated the terrapin, and the various forms in which
it was to be provided, by the highly ingenious
gourmand
;
and even went so far as to repeat, verbatim, as
it were, certain regrets of the departing colonel at the
necessity which deprived him of the new luxury.
Ay, that was it. I would have had his opinion of
the dish, for he knows what good living is. There's
a pleasure, Humphries, in having a man of taste
and nice sensibilities about us. Our affectionsour
humanities, if I may so call themare then
properly
exercised; but it is throwing pearl to swine to
put a good dish before such a creature as that
skeleton
,
OakenburgDoctor Oakenburg, as the dd
fellow presumes to call himself. He is a monstera
fellow of most perverted taste, and of no more soul
than a skiou, or the wriggling lizard that he resembles.
Only yesterday, we had a nice tit-bitan exquisite
morselonly a tastea marsh-hen, that I shot
myself
,
and fricasseed after a fashion of my own. I tried
my best to persuade the wretch to try itonly to try
itand would you believe it, he not only refused, but
absolutely, at the moment, drew a bottle of some vile
root decoction from his pocket, and just as I was about
to enjoy my own little delicacy, he thrust the horrible
stuff into his lantern jaws, and swallowed a draught of
it that might have strangled a cormorant. It nearly
made me sick to see him, and with difficulty could I
keep myself from being angry. I told him how
ungentlemanly
had been his conduct, taking his physic
where decent people were enjoying an intellectual
repast
for
so I consider dinnerand I think he felt
the force of the rebuke, for he turned away instantly,
though still the beast was in him. In a minute
after, he was dandling his dd coachwhip, that he
loves like a bedfellow. It is strange, very strange,
and makes me sometimes doubtful how to believe in
human nature. It is such a monstrous contradiction
between tastes and capacities.
How long Porgy would have gone on after this
fashion, may not well be said; but the trooper was
called away from hearing him, by his commanding
officer. In the mean while, Tom, the black cook,
made his appearance, after repeated demands had
been urged by the gourmand for his presence. The
negro came, rubbing his eyes, half asleep still, and
monstrous stupid.
Tom, my boy! said Porgy.
Ki! Mass Porgy; you no lub sleep you' sef,
da's no reason he no good for udder people. Nigger
lub sleep, Mass Porgy; an' 'taint 'spectful to git up
'fore de sun.
No matter, boyno matteropen your eyes, Tom,
you black rascal, and look at your brethren. See
here, King Coalfor you're black enough to be one of
his relationssee here what we've got to go upon,
my boy. Get down to the creek, and give your face
a brief introduction to the water, then come back and
be made happy.
Dah berry fine cooter, for trueberry fine cooter,
Mass Porgywhay you bin nab 'em?
Where do you think, boy, but on the old cypress
log, running into yonder pond. That was their home;
and there they came out last night to nap it.
Fortunately
,
I slept not on my post, and I stole a march upon
'em. I caught 'em all asleep; and that's a warning to
you, Tom, never to go to sleep on the end of a log.
Heh! wha' den, Mass Porgynobody guine eat
nigger eben if dey catch 'em. Tom berry hard wittle
for buckrah.
Make good cooter soup, Tom, nevertheless. Who
could tell the difference? Those long black slips of
the meat in terrapin-soup, look monstrous like negro
toes and fingers; and the Irish soldiers in garrison
wouldn't know the one from t'other. Tom, Tom, if
they catch you sleeping!
Oh, Mass Porgy, I wish you leff off talking 'bout
sich tings. You make my skin crawl like yellow
belly snake.
Well, well; get your pot, old boy, and see that
you let nobody meddle with our doings. Get me a
couple of deep gourds, that I may mix up the
ingredients
comfortably. I am going to make a new stew,
and you shall have your share of it, Tom, that you may
keep your eyes open to catch terrapin all night for
ever after.
Berry well; mind, Mass Porgy, I guine 'member
dis what you tell me.
You shall have your sharebut go now and get
ready: and mind, Tom, the two calabashesand,
Tom!
Sa!
Be sure and get some herbs, dry sage, thyme,
mint; and if you can, take up a few onionsand,
Tom!
Sa!
Say nothing to that dd fellow Oakenburgdo
you hear, sir?
Enty I yerry, mossa; but it's no use; de doctor
lub snake better more nor cooter.
Away!
The negro was gone upon his mission, and
throwing
himself at length upon the grass, the eyes of Porgy
alternated between the rising sun and the empty shells
of his terrapins.
How they glitter! he said to himself: what a
beautiful polish they would admit of! It's surprising
they have never been used for the purposes of manly
ornament. In battle, burnished well, and fitted to
the dress in front, just over humanity's most
conspicuous
dwelling-place, they would turn off many a
bullet from that sacred, but too susceptible, region.
And, as he mused, he grappled one of the shells, the
largest of the three, and turning himself upon his back,
lay at length, while fitting the shell closely to the
designated spot. In this pleasant experiment, he was
surprised by Singleton.
Vol. II.K
A strange idea that, Mr. Porgy, said the
commander
;
but the shield is rather small for the part
to be protected. Your figure in that neighbourhood
might demand the shelter of a turtle shell rather than
that of a terrapin. It has gone somewhat beyond such
restraints as that.
A truth, Major Singletona truth, sir, cried the
other, respectfully rising from the earth, and saluting
his superior with the finished grace of a gentleman;
but I am a modest man, sir, and a stale proverb, sir,
helps me to my answer:Half a loaf is said to be
better than no bread, and half a shelter, in the same
spirit, is certainly better than none. An illustration
meant for the interior may not inaptly serve the
exterior
of one's body. The force of this shell, sir,
though inadequate to the protection of all this region,
which, as you say, has gone somewhat beyond proper
restraints, may yet protect the most assailable part.
Take care of what we can, sir, is a wholesome rule,
letting what can take care of the rest.
You are a philosopher, Mr. Porgy; and I am
glad to believe so, as we shall leave you but little time
after the conclusion of the repast, for which, I
perceive
,
you have made some extraordinary preparations.
We shall start, sir, for the Santee, with the decline of
the sun this afternoon; and will accordingly disturb
some of those pleasant contemplations which usually
follow the feast.
The gourmand looked somewhat blank, as he
replied
But, major, do I understand you? are we to break
up camp here, for good and all?
For the present, certainly, we shall. We move, bag
and baggage, this afternoon, and push for Nelson's ferry
as fast as we can. Our retreat here is now sufficiently
known to make it unsafe to delay in it much longer,
and we shall soon be wanted for vigorous service on
the frontier.
This is a goodly place, major; better could scarce
be chosen for secrecy, and other no less positive
advantages
.
Fresh provisions are more abundant here
than in Dorchester, and I am convinced that these
ponds will yield us cat, quite as lively as the
farfamed
ones of Edisto. I need not point you more
particularly to the commodity just before us.
These are attractions, Mr. Porgy; but as we go
next to the Santee, the difference will not be so very
greatcertainly not so great as to be insisted upon.
The Santee is rich in numberless varieties of fish and
fowl, and my own eyes have feasted upon terrapin of
much greater dimensions, and much larger numbers
than the Cypress yields.
And of all varieties, major? the brown and yellow
not to speak of the alligator terrapin, whose flavour,
though unpopular with the vulgar, is decidedly superior
to that of any other? You speak knowingly, major?
I do. I know all the region, and have lived in the
swamp for weeks at a time. The islands of the
swamp there are much larger than here; and there
are vast lakes in its depths, where fish are taken at
all hours in the day with the utmost ease. You will
see Colonel Marion, himself, frequently catching his
own breakfast.
I like thata commander should always be
heedful
of his example. That's a brave mana fine fellow
I like him, majorthat commander of ours; and
now that you have enlightened me, sir, on the virtues
of the Santee, and our able colonel, I must own that my
reluctance to depart is considerably lessened. At late
noon, you said?
At late noon.
I thank you, Major Singleton, for this timely
notice. With your leave, sir, I will proceed to these
preparations for dinner, which are rather precipitated
by this movement. That rascally head there, major,
kicking away the gasping head of one of the
terrapins
as he spoke, seems to understand the subject
of our conversationof mine at leastand opens its
jaws every instant, as if it hoped some one of us would
fill them.
Talking all the while, he waddled away with his
gourds of turtle, and Singleton beheld him, a moment
after, busy with Tom, the negro, in earnest preparations
for the feast.
The partisan commander had his word for all in
the swampa word of kind remark and pleasant
encouragement
.
There were none unnoticed by him in
some way or other. The trooper trimming the thick
hair from his horse's heels, and paring down his hoof,
received his countenance, and heard, and replied to,
his friendly observation, most usually upon the subject
of his particular lobour at that moment. The group
huddled up beneath the treesome mending their
bridles, some trimming the mould edges of their
bullets
,
and some, more homely still in their industry,
repairing wide rents in coat or breechesand there
were not a few busy at such laboursall, in turn,
received his consideration. To all, the same
information
was conveyedthe same degree of confidence,
seemingly, with nothing withheld, was duly given;
and the friendly bearing of the captain towards his
men, was rather that of an equal than of a superior.
Yet there was no familiarity between the parties. A
certain calm, equable temper of reserve, on his side,
invariably
restrained obtrusiveness. He smiled, but
never laughed with them. He stood, when he spoke
to them; and always rose for that purpose, if he had
previously been sitting. His was that due
consideration
of man, as an animal, that never permitted him to
assume any position which might expose him to the
free embraces of those over whom he had command.
Yet, his gentleness of speech, his grace of
deportment
,
his pleasant manner, were all proverbial among
his men. He smiled now, as he spoke to them, though
his heart was, at the moment, even bleeding inly.
He knew not yet the extent of his loss, but he well
knew the extent of the loss which he had to fear. It
was owing partly to a desire to escape from these
thoughts that he lingered so long among his troop.
Singleton, at length, having himself gone the rounds,
looked at all the things, and spoken with all the men
in his camp, now retired to a small oak under which
he usually rested. He threw himself down upon the
dry moss that formed his couch, and gave himself up
to thoughtful musing, not only about his affections,
but about his duties. While he lay thus, he did not
perceive that Lance Frampton had placed himself
quietly upon the other side of the tree. The boy at
length attracted his attention.
What's the matter, Lance? he inquired kindly,
as he saw that there was something like emotion in
the boy's countenance.
Oh, sir, it's not me that any thing's the matter with;
but it's you.
With me! why, what do you mean, boy?
Why, sir, you talked and groaned so in your sleep
this morning. I woke before daylight, and I heard
you, and it so frightened me!
Frightened, boy! you must not be frightened at any
thinga soldier is not to be frightened. But what did
I say?
Why, sir, you quarrelled with somebody; and you
cursed
Cursed! You must be wrong, Lance, said the
major, gravely; I never cursenever.
I know, sirI know you don't curse when you're
awake, but you did this morning when you were
asleep. I was sure 'twas you; because when I got up
and looked round the tree, the moon was shining right
upon your face, and so I went to the end of the branch
and broke it thereyou will see it hanging, so as to
make it fall between you and the moonlight; and after
that your face was shaded. But you cursed, and
gnashed your teeth together, and looked as if you were
fighting somebody in your sleep.
Indeed! and Singleton mused gravely for a few
moments after hearing this narrative: he looked to
the extremity of the branch, where the boy, by
breaking
the bush, without separating it from the tree, had
screened his sleeping eyes from the injurious effects
K 2
of the glaring moon. This instance of gentle devotion
found its way to the heart of Singleton, and his tones
were kinder than ever to his youthful proteg.
I am sorry that I cursed, Lance; I try not to do
so: I am more sorry that you should hear me curse.
You must endeavour to forget that you heard it, in
kindness to me, and in duty to yourself. Never allow
yourself, as long as you live, to commit so great a
folly; and remember always the advice that I now
give you, when you look at this little dirk. Stay
place it there, with the leather, close upon the left
sidelet the point go out in front somewhat, while
the handle inclines under the crotch of the left arm.
Take care of it: it has saved my life once, and may
save yours: but use it only when it is necessary for
such a purpose.
CHAPTER XIII.
The hour at hand, the foeman near,
The biting brand, the steely spear,
The spirit vex'd and warm,
And these are all the freeman wants,
Who, for the struggle, pines and pants,
And never knew alarm.
Then let the foeman come and feel
How dread the blow his hand can deal,
When freedom nerves his arm.
Tom
, take that back to the major; he wants a new
supply by this time, I reckon, and if he does not, he
ought to.
The calabash of Porgy was empty as he gave this
order. The desire to replenish it, stimulated his
politeness
,
and taught him to recollect his neighbours.
Tom did as he was ordered; and the gourmand,
meanwhile
,
picked his teeth with a straw, and waited
impatiently
for the return of his messenger with the residue
of the dish. He had succeeded, as he thought to
admiration
,
in compounding it; and he was complacency
itself, even to Doctor Oakenburg, whom he regarded
with no favour in general. The doctor, however, had
much conciliated him by taking some of the hash on
trial; and this concession saved him otherwise from
much severe animadversion; although the forbearance
of Porgy was bitterly tried when he beheld the hash
scarcely touched before the naturalist, who was at the
same time industriously employed upon certain bits of
fried eel, to which he gave a manifest preference.
Porgy, Oakenburg, Wilkins, and one other, surrounded
the same log. The other troopers were squatting in
similar groups over the island; and Singleton, with
Lance, Humphries, and Davis, were all under
their old tree, at a distance from the rest. The latter
had made his peace with Singleton, to whom he had
told honestly the whole story of the last night's
adventure
with Sergeant Hastings, and of his murder by the
maniac Frampton. He had done wrong, acknowledged
honestly his error, and it called for no particular
eloquence
or argument, under these circumstances, to
procure
his pardon from Singleton. The four persons
named, formed the mess that day together; and, if
not to Singleton, the new supply from Porgy's table
was acceptable to more than one of the party. When
the dish was returned to Porgy, his proceeding was
exquisitely true to propriety: loving the commodity as
he did, and particularly anxious to renew his attack
upon it, he yet omitted none of his customary
politeness
.
There, Tom, that will do: put it down nowit
will stand alone. Did the major help himself?
He no take any more, Mass Porgy; he hab
'noughso he tell me: but Mass Homphry, him take
some, and Mass Dabis, he help hese'f too.
Humph! The major took none, you say? Strange!
Did he look sick, Tom?
No, sa. He talk berry well.
Strange! Pardon me, Mr. Wilkinspardon me;
shall I have the pleasure to lay this in your calabash?
only a spoonful, sir; you can't refusedo you no
hurt. Doctor Oakenburg, let me beg you, sir, not to
defile your lips with that fry any longer: don't think
of eel, sir, I implore you, when you can get terrapin.
I thank you, Master PorgyI thank you very
much; but, as you will see, I have not yet consumed
that which you have already given me.
And why the dl don't you? My dear sir, it's
shocking that you should waste time so imprudently.
To delay a pleasure is to destroy a pleasure, provided
the pleasure is ready to your hands. And then, sir,
the appetite grows vitiated, and the taste dreadfully
equivocal after eating fry. The finest delicacy in the
world will suffer from such contact. Let me beg you,
then, throw it aside. Here, Tom, take Oakenburg's
calabash therethrow the fry to the dog, and wash the
gourd clean, boy, when you have done so. Be quick,
now, old fellow.
Nay, nay, Master Porgy, was Oakenburg's reply,
resisting the negro; I am pleased with this eel, which
is considerately done to my liking. It is a dish I
particularly
affect.
Porgy compressed his lips, and looked on him
gravely and sternly, while spooning some of the hash
into his own calabash, and muttering all the while.
Stand back, Tom, and don't bother me. A man
prefer the dd gaunt eel to terrapin! Doctor
Oakenburg
,
where do you expect to go when you die? I
ask the question from a beliefrather staggered, I
must confess, by recent circumstancesthat you really
have something of a soul left. You once had,
doubtless
.
The manner in which the question was put, not less
than the question itself, seemed to startle the naturalist
not a little. His answer was broken and confused.
Really, I must confess I don't know, Mr. Porgy;
but I trust in some place of perfect security.
That may all be, sir; and could I have the
appropriation
of your person, I should doom you to be thrust
into an eelskin. One thing be assured of, wherever
you do goif there be any thing like justice meted
out to you hereafter, you will have scant fare and dd
bad living. Prefer eel to terrapin! Tom!
Sa!
Bring me a calabash of water, and hand the jug.
Prefer eel to terrapin! Mr. Wilkins you have not
finished? come, sir, it isn't every day that happiness
comes into camp and begs one to help himself. It
isn't always we catch terrapin like these, and sit down
to such a compound. No more? Well, I too have
done, this little morsel excepted. These eggs are fine
what a flavour, and how rich! Tom, take it away
now.
Ki, Mass Porgy, you no leff any egg.
No eggs! cried the gourmand; why, what the
deuse do you call that, and that, and that? stirring
them over with the spoon as he spoke. Bless me, I
did not think there were half so many. Stop, Tom, I
will but take a couple more, and thentherethat will
doyou may take the rest.
The negro hurried away with his prize, dreading
that Porgy would make new discoveries; while that
worthy, seasoning his calabash of water with a
moderate
dash of Jamaica from the jug beside him,
concluded
the repast to which he had annexed so much
importance.
So much is secure of life! he exclaimed, when
he had done; I am satisfiedI have lived to-day,
and nothing can deprive me of the 22d June, in the
year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred and
eighty, enjoyed in the Cypress Swamp. The day is
completed: it should always close with the dinner
hour. It is then securewe cannot be deprived of it:
it is recorded in the history of hopes realized, and of
feelings properly felt. And, hark! the major seems
to think with me, since the tin-horn rumbles up for a
start. Wilkinsold fellowif you'll give me a
helping
hand in putting the tackle upon my nag, you'll
serve me much more seasonably than I can well
mention
.
Tom, boy, hurry there, and don't forget to
unsling
that ham-bone: needn't mind the calabashes; we
can get them along the road. You're not going to carry
that snake, Doctor Oakenburg, are you? Great
Heavens
!
what a reptile taste that fellow has! Ha, Lance,
boy, is that you? You've horse and all ready. Well,
you can lend me a hand then in bringing up these
mattersthere, that belt, boy, which lies on the log.
A ligature about the waist strengthens one greatly in a
long journey. Ah, Humphries, you're in a hurry, I
see.
Thus, with a word to everybody, Porgy commenced
his preparation for the journey upon which Humphries
now came among them to urge a decent degree of
speed. In an hour, and all were readythe partisans
and their prisoners, not forgetting the negro Tom and
his dog, a mean looking cur significantly called Slink.
And never was there a more appropriate epithet; he
was a shamefaced, creeping creature, all skin and
bone, smeared over with the smoke of the ashes in
which he lay every night, with a habit probably
borrowed from his sable owner; and such was the
meanness of his spirit, that having from immemorial
time neglected the due elevation of his tail, he now
seemed to have lost all sense, and, indeed, all capacity
for the achievement. The unfortunate pendent
member
hung continually down between his legs, and
seemed every day to grow more and more despicably
fond of earth.
Sending out his scouts in advance, Singleton led his
cavalcade out of the swamp. Aiming to make the
Nelson's ferry road as soon as possible, he struck
directly across the country under the guidance of
Humphries and Davis, both of whom knew well, and
availed themselves on this journey of all the
neighbourhood
roads. They travelled but slowly, however,
and had made no great progress in their course, when
night came down upon them. With the approach of
darkness, Singleton ordered a halt, and an
encampment
was formed in a thick wood to which they in
clined, out of sight and hearing from the road. Here,
without building fires, they took a brief rest until the
moon rose, when the troop was aroused, and again set
forth on its upward journey. With the dawn of day,
they found themselves, according to the estimate of
Davis, within a few miles only of the ferry road. A
little more precaution was necessary now. The
scouts were doubled, and the troop entered the road an
hour or so after sunrise, without meeting with any
interruption or object worthy their attention. In this
manner they proceeded for some hours, seeing no
human being; and the whole route marked only by
the devastating proofs of war, which were thick on
every side of them. The broken fences, the shattered
or half-consumed dwelling, the unplanted and
unploughed
fields, all in desertion, spoke fearfully for its
attributes and presence. But, suddenly, the scouts
were met towards noon by a countryman, his wife, and
two children, flying from a foe. It was difficult to
convince them that they had not fallen in with another;
and they told their story, accordingly, in fear and
trembling. They told of a tory named Amos Gaskens,
a notorious wretch before the war, who had raised a
party and had been devastating the neighbouring country
throughout St. Stephens and St. Johns, Berkley.
[2]
[2]
History has deemed this monster of sufficient importance to
record
many of his deeds. He was, for some time, the dread of this
section of country.
His
numbers were increasing, and he stopped at no
excesses
.
On most of the plantations through which he
had gone, every house was burned to the ground, the
stock wantonly shot, the people plundered, and either
murdered, forced to follow their captors, or compelled
to fly to places of resort and refuge the most wild and
deplorable. The little family they had encountered
had been thus dispossessed; and they had only saved
their lives by a timely notice, which a friend among
the tories had given them of their approach. They
insisted that Gaskens could not be many miles off,
and would certainly meet them before noon, as he was
on his way to Charlestown with his prisoners and for
his reward.
Singleton determined to prepare for him a warm
reception, and having ascertained that the force under
Gaskens fully doubled his own, he laid his plans to
neutralize this superiority by the employment of the
usual cunning of the partisan. According to the
account
of the flying countryman, there was a beautiful
little spring some three miles higher, not more than a
stone's throw from the roadside; this was the only
good drinking water for some distance, and, as it was
well known to wayfarers, it was concluded that
Gaskens
would make use of it as a place of rest and
refreshment
.
Here, Singleton determined to place his
ambuscade; and as it was necessary to reach it some
time in advance of his enemy, he pushed his horse
forward at a quicker pace, and commanded his troop
to follow closely. They reached the spot in time, and
gliding out of the road, were soon in possession of the
desired station.
The spring was one of those quiet waters that trickle
along the hollow which they have formed, and with
so gentle a murmur, that, though but a brief distance
from the road, no passing ear, however acute, could
possibly
have detected its prattling invitation. The water
was cool and refreshing; the overhanging trees gave
it a pleasant and fitting shelter, which scarcely
rendered
necessary the small wooden shed which had
been built above it by some one of the considerate
dwellers in the neighbourhood. War, in its violence,
however destructive else, had spared, with a becoming
reverence, the fountain and the little roof above it.
The whole spot was exceedingly pretty; wild vines
and florid grapes clustered over it; a little clump of
wild-flowers grew just at its porch; while a fine large
oak, standing on the brow of the little hill at the
bottom
of which the fountain had its source, took the
entire area into its sheltering embrace. The wild
jessamine, and the thousand flaunting blossoms of the
southern forests, grew profusely about the place; and
in that hour of general repose in Carolina during the
summer monthsthe hour of noonwhen all nature
is languid; when the bird hushes his fitful note, or only
Starts into voice a moment, and is still;
when man and beast, reptile and insect, alike, seek for
the shade and pant drowsily beneath its shelterthis
little hollow of the woods, and the clear stream
swelling
over the little basin around which its
dwelling-place
had been formed, and trickling away in a
prattling
murmur that discoursed twin harmonies to the
sluggish breeze that shook at intervals the tree above
it, seemed eminently a scene chosen for gentle spirits,
and a purpose grateful to the softest delicacies of
humanity
.
Yet was its sacred and sweet repose about to
be invaded. War had prepared his weapon and lay
waiting in the shade.
Singleton now proceeded to his preparations for the
due reception of Gaskens and his tories. The
troopers
and the prisoners were at once dismounted; the
latter, with the horses, were escorted to a sufficient
distance in the wood, beyond the reach of the strife,
and where they could convey no intimation by their
voices to the approaching enemy. Here a guard was
put over them, with instructions to cut down the first
individual who should show the slightest symptom of
a disposition to cry out or to fly. A command,
otherwise
so sanguinary, was necessary, however, in the
circumstances. This done, Singleton despatched his
scouts, headed by Humphries, whose adroitness he
well knew, on the road leading to the enemy; they
were to bring him intelligence without suffering
themselves
to be seen. he next proceeded to his own
immediate
disposition of force for the hot controversy,
and approved himself a good disciple of the Swamp
Fox in the arrangement. The ambush was formed on
two sides of the spring, the men being so placed as
to possess the advantages of the cross-fire without being
themselves exposed to the slightest danger from their
mutual weapons. All approach to the waters was
thus commanded, and Singleton, trusting to the
advantages
Vol. II.L
obtained from the surprise and the first fire,
instructed
his men to follow him in the charge which he
contemplated making, immediately after the discharge
of their pieces. In the way of exhortation he had
but few words; he resembled Marion in that respect,
also: but those words were highly stimulating
Men, I have the utmost confidence in you; you
are no cowards, and I am sure will do your duty. I
do not call upon you to destroy men, but monsters;
not countrymen, but those who have no countrywho
have only known their country, to rend her bowels and
prey upon her vitals. You will only spare them when
they are downwhen they cry, enough. There must
be no `Tarleton's Quarter,' mind you; the soldier
that strikes a man who has once submitted, shall be
hung up immediately after; for though they be brutes
and monsters now, yet even the brute has a claim
upon man's mercy when he has once submitted to be
tamed. Go, now, men, each to his place, and wait
the signal; I will give it at the proper moment
myself
.
It shall be but one word, and when you hear me
say, `now!' let each rifle have its mark in an armed
tory. Shoot none that have not weapons in their
handsremember that; and when you sally out, as
you will, immediately after the discharge and while
they are in confusion, let the same rule be observed.
Strike none that have not armsnone that do not offer
us resistance. Enough, now; the brave soldier needs
no long exhortation. The soldier who fights his
country's battles has her voice at his heart, pleading
for her rescue and relief. Remember the burnt
dwellings
of your countrytheir murdered and maltreated
inhabitantstheir desolate fieldstheir starving
children
and
then strike home. Your country is worth
fighting for, and he who dies in the cause of his
country
,
dies in the cause of man: he will not be forgotten.
Go, and remember the word.
There was no shout, no hurra, but eyes were bent
upon the ground, lips knit closely in solemn
determination
;
and Singleton saw at a glance that his men
were to be relied on.
They will do, he muttered to himself, as, seeing
them all properly sheltered, he threw himself at the
foot of a tree, a little removed from the rest, and only
accompanied by the boy Lance Frampton. We have
seen the increasing intimacy between the lad and his
commander; an intimacy encouraged by the latter, and
earnestly insisted upon by the boy. He studiously
kept near the person of the partisan, listened to every
word he uttered, watched every movement, and
carefully
analyzed, so far as his immature capacities would
admit, every feeling and thought of his superior.
From this earnest and close contemplation of the one
object, the boy grew to be exclusive in his regards,
and slighted every other. Singleton became one and
the same with his mind's ideal, and a lively
imagination
,
and warm sensibilities, identified his captain, in
his thought, with his only notion of a genuine hero.
The more he studied him, the more complete was the
resemblance. The lofty, symmetrical, strong person
the high but easy carriagethe grace of movement
and attitudethe studious delicacy of speech, mingled,
at the same time, with that simple adherence to
propriety
,
which describes genuine manliness, were all
attributes of Singleton, and all obvious enough to his
admirer.
How I wish I was like him! said the boy to
himself
,
as he looked where Singleton's form lay before
him under the tree. If I was only sure that I could
fight like him, and not feel afraid, when the time
comes! Oh! how I wish it was over!
Had the words been uttered loud enough to be
heard by the partisan, the mood of the boy would have
been better understood by his commander than it was,
when the latter heard the deep sigh which followed
them. Singleton turned to look upon him, as he heard
it, and could not avoid being struck with the manifest
dejection in every feature of his countenance. He
thought it might arise from the loneliness of his
situation
,
his recent loss of a tender mother, and the
distressing
condition of his father, of whom they had
seen nothing since their departure from the swamp.
True, the brother of Lance was along with them, but
there was little sympathy between the two. The
elder youth was dull and unobservant, while the other
was thoughtful and acute. They had little intercourse
beyond an occasional word of question and reply; and
even then, the intimacy and relationship seemed
imperfect
.
These things might, and must necessarily
produce in the boy's mind a sufficient feeling of his
desolation, and hence, in Singleton's thought, his
depression
seemed natural enough. But when the sigh
was repeated, and the face, even under the partisan's
glance, wore the same expression, he could not help
addressing him on the subject
Why, how now, boywhat's the matter? Cheer
up, cheer up, and get ready to do something like a
man. Know you not we're on the eve of battle?
Oh, sir, I can't cheer up, was the
half-inarticulate
reply, as the emotion of the boy vividly increased,
and a tear was seen to gather in his eyes. So much
emotion was unusual in one whose mood was that of
elastic enthusiasm; and the pallid cheek and
downcast
look stimulated anew the anxiety of the partisan.
He repeated his question curiously, and at the same
time arising from his place of rest, he came round to
where the boy had now also arisen.
What's the matter with you, boywhat troubles
youare you sick?
Oh, no, sirno, sirI'm not sickI'm very well
but, sir
But what?
Only, sir, I've never been in a battle beforenever
to fight with men, sir.
Well! And what of that, boywhat mean you?
Speak!
The brow of Singleton darkened slightly, as he
witnessed
the trepidation of his companion. The frown,
when the boy beheld it, had the natural effect of
contributing
to the increase of his confusion.
Oh, sir, only that I'm so afraid
Afraid, boy! exclaimed Singleton, sternly,
interrupting
the speakerafraid! Then get you back to
the horsesget away at once from sight, and let not
the men look upon youbegoneaway!
The cheek of the boy glowed like crimson, his eye
flashed a fire-like indignation, his head was erect on
the instant, and his whole figure rose with an
expression
of pride and firmness, which showed the partisan
that he had done him injustice. The change was
quite as unexpected as it was pleasant to Singleton;
and he looked accordingly, as he listened to the reply
of the boy, whose speech was now unbroken.
No, siryou wrong meI'm not afraid of the
enemythat's not it, sir. I'm not afraid to fight, sir;
but
But what, Lanceof what then are you afraid?
Oh, sir, I'm afraid I shan't fight as I want to fight.
I'm afraid, sir, I won't have the heart to shoot a man,
though I know he will shoot me if he can. It's so
strange, sir, to shoot at a true-and-true manso very
strange, sir, that I'm afraid I'll tremble when the time
comes, and not shoot till it's too late.
And what thenhow would you help that, boy?
You must make up your mind to do it, or keep out of
the way.
Why, sir, if I could only see you all the timeif
I could only hear you speak to me in particular, and
tell me by name when to shoot, I think, sir, I could do
it then well enough; but to shoot at a manI'm so
afraid I'd tremble, and wait too long, unless you'd be
so good as to tell me when.
Singleton smiled thoughtfully, as he listened to the
confused workings of a good mind, finding itself in a
novel position, ignorant of the true standard for its
guidance, and referring to another on which it was most
accustomed, or at least most willing, to depend. The
L 2
boy laboured under one of those doubts which so
commonly
beset and annoy the ambitious nature, solicitous
of doing greatly, with an ideal of achievement, drawn
before the sight by the imagination, and making a
picture
too imposing for the quiet contemplation. He
was troubled, as even the highest courage and boldest
genius will sometimes become, with enfeebling doubts
of his own capacity, even to do tolerably what he
desires to do well. He trembled to believe that he
should fall short of that measure of achievement which
his mind had made his standard, and at which he
aimed. Fortunately for him, Singleton was
sufficiently
aware of the distinction between doubts and
misgivings so honourable and so natural, and those
which spring from imbecile purpose and an originally
shrinking spirit. He spoke to the boy kindly,
assured
him of his confidence, encouraged him to a
better reliance upon his own powers; and, knowing
well that nothing so soon brings out the naturally
sturdy spirit as the quantity of pressure and
provocation
upon it, he rather strove to impress upon him a
higher notion of the severity and trial of the conflict
now before him. In proportion to the quantity of
labour required at his hands, did his spirit rise to
overcome
it; and Singleton, after a few moments'
conversation
with him, had the satisfaction to see his
countenance brighten up, while his eye flashed
enthusiasm
,
and his soul grew earnest for the strife.
You shall have a place under my own eye: and
mark me, Lance, that eye will be upon you. I will
give you a distinct duty to perform, and trust that it
will be done well.
I'll try, sir, was the modest answer, though his
doubts of his own capacity were sensibly decreasing.
The time was at hand, however, which was to bring
his courage into exercise and trial, and to put to the
test that strength of mind which he had been so
disposed
to underrate. One of the scouts charged with
the intelligence by Humphries now came in, bringing
tidings of the tories. They were computed to amount
to eighty men; but of this the scouts could not be
certain
,
as, in obedience to the orders of his commander,
Humphries had not ventured so nigh as to expose
himself
.
He computed the prisoners in their charge, men,
women, and children, to be quite as numerous.
Singleton
,
on the receipt of this intelligence, looked closely
to the preparations which he had made for their
reception
,
saw that his men were all in their places,
and went the rounds, addressing them individually in
encouragement and exhortation. This done, he took
the young beginner, Lance Frampton, aside, and
leading
him to the shelter of a thick bush at the head of
the little hillock, he bade him keep that position in
which he placed him, throughout all the events of the
contest. This position commanded a view of the whole
scene likely to be the theatre of conflict. The
partisan
bade him survey it closely.
There is the spring, boytherein short rifle
distance. How far do you call it?
Thirty yards, sir.
Are you a sure shot at that distance?
Dead sure, sir; and he raised the rifle to his eye,
which Singleton handed him.
Your hand trembles, boy.
Yes, sir; but I'm not afraid; I'm only anxious to
begin.
Keep cool; there's no hurry, but time enough.
Throw off your jacketgive me your rifle. There
now roll up your sleeve, and go down to the spring
plunge your arms up to their pits into the cool water
a dozen times, until I call you. Go.
The boy went; and before he returned, Humphries
rode in with accounts of the near approximation of
Gaskens and his tories. Singleton called up his pupil
from the spring, and continued his directions.
Take your place here, by the end of the log;
don't mind your jacketbetter off than on. Our men
you see ranged on either side of you. They can see
you as easily as you can see them. This sentence
was emphatically uttered, while the piercing glance of
Singleton was riveted upon the now unfaltering
countenance
of the boy. Below you is the spring, and
in that shade the tories will most probably come to a
halt. They will scarcely put their prisoners under
cover, for fear they should escape; and they will be
likely to remain at the opening there to your left
there, just by those tallow bushes. Now, observe: I
am about to trust to you to commence the affair.
Upon you, and your rifle shot, I depend greatly. Don't
raise it yet: let it rest in the hollow of your arm until
you are ready to pull trigger, which you will do the
moment you hear me say, `now!' I will not be far
from you, and will say it sufficiently loud for you to
hear. The moment you hear me, lift your piece, and
be sure to shoot the man, whoever he may be, that
may happen to stand upon the rise of the hill, just
above the spring, and under the great oak that hangs
over it. It is most probable that it will be Gaskens
himself, the captain of the tories. But no matter who
he is, shoot him: aim for the man that stands on the
hillock, and you must hit an enemy. You will have
but a single fire, as our men will follow your lead, and
in the next moment we shall charge. When you see
us do so, slip round by the tallow bushes, and cut loose
the ropes that tie the prisoners. These are your
duties; and remember, boy, I shall see all your
movements
.
I shall look to you, and you only, until the
affair
commences. Be in no hurry, but keep cool:
wait for the word, and don't even lift your rifle until
you hear me utter it. Remember, you have a duty to
perform to yourself and country, in whose cause your
life to-day begins.
The boy put his hand upon his heart, bowed his
head, and made no other reply; but his eye glistened
with pride; and as the partisan moved away, he
grapsed his rifle, threw his right foot back a pace, as
if to feel his position, then, sinking quietly behind the
bush, prepared himself as firmly for the contest as if
he had been a veteran of sixty.
CHAPTER XIV.
And war shall have its victims, and grim death
Grow surfeit with his prey. The signal soon,
That marks the feast prepared, their ears shall note
A sound of terrorand the banquet spread,
Shall call the anxious appetite that sees
And gloats upon its garbage from afar.
Silence
, and a deep anxiety, hung, like a spell, above
the ambuscading party. The woods lay at rest, and
the waters of the fountain trickled quietly, as if Peace
lay sleeping in their neighbourhood, and Security
watched over her. So well had Singleton made his
arrangements, and so cautiously had his plans been
executed, that no necessity existed for bustle or
confusion
.
Each trooper had his duty as carefully
assigned
him as the boy Frampton; and all of them,
taking a likeness from their gallant leader, lay at quiet
in the close shadow of the thicket, silent as the grave,
and only awaiting the signal which was to fill its
unfolding
jaws.
They waited not long before the advance of the
tories appeared in sight; then came the prisonersa
melancholy troopmen, women, and children;and
then the main body of the marauders, under Gaskens,
bringing up the rear. In all, there were probably a
hundred persons; an oddly assorted, and most
miscellaneous
collection, with nothing uniform in their
equipment
.
They were not British, but tories; though here
and there the gaudy red coat, probably a tribute of the
battle-field, was ostentatiously worn by an individual,
upon whom, no doubt, it conferred its own character,
and some of that authority which certainly would have
been possessed by its owner were he a Briton. The
present troop of bandittifor, as yet, they could be
styled by no other more proper epithetwas one of
the many by which the country was overrun in every
direction. Banding together in small squads, the
dissolute
and the wicked among the citizens, native and
adopted, thus availed themselves of the distractions
of the war to revenge themselves upon old enemies,
destroy
the property they could not appropriate, and, with
the sword and the rope, punish the more honest, or the
more quiet, for that pacific forbearance which they
themselves
were so little disposed to manifest. In every
section of the province these risings were continually
going on. In one night, ten, twenty, thirty, or more,
would collect together, and by a sudden and
impetuous
movement, anticipating all preparation, would rush
with fire and sword upon their whig neighbours, whose
first knowledge of the incursion would be the brand
in the blazing barn, or the bullet driven through the
crashing pane. They shot down, in this manner, even
as he sat with his little circle at the family fireside,
the stout yeoman who might have defended or avenged
them. The arm of the law was staid by invasion,
and the sanction of the invaders was necessarily given,
under all circumstances, to the party which claimed
to fight in their behalf. The tory became the British
ally, and the whig his victim accordingly; and to such
a degree were the atrocities of these wretches
carried
,
that men were dragged from the arms of their
wives at midnight, and suffered for their love of
country
in the sight of wife and children, by dying in the
rope, and from their own roof-trees. Of this
character
was the body of tories, under Amos Gaskens,
now rapidly approaching the place of ambush. They
had formed themselves on the Williamsburgh line,
chiefly the desperadoes and outcasts from that quarter,
and had chosen among themselves an appropriate leader
in Gaskens, of whom we are told by the historian, that
even before the war he had been notorious for his petty
larcenies. From this quarter they had passed into St.
Johns, Berkley, marking their progress, throughout,
with all manner of havoc, and stopping at no atrocity.
Such employment was not less grateful to themselves
than to their new masters, to whom they thought it
likely, and indeed knew, that it must commend them.
Gaskens aimed more highly, indeed, than his
neighbours
.
He had already been honoured with a British
captaincyhe desired a still loftier commission; and
the recklessness of his deeds was intended still farther
to approve him in the sight of those from whom he
hoped to receive it. If the atrocities of Tarleton
resulted
in his promotion and honour, why not like
atrocities
in Amos Gaskens? Reason might well ask, why
not? since, in cruelty, they were fair parallels for one
another.
The prisoners brought with Gaskens were chiefly
taken from the parish of St. Johns, Berkley. One
family, consisting of a man named Griffin, his wife,
and daughter, a tall, good-looking girl, about seventeen,
were closely watched, apart from the rest of the
captives
,
by a guard especially assigned for that purpose.
The taking of this man had cost the tory two of his
best soldiers, and he had himself been wounded in the
arm by a stroke from Griffin's sabre. Griffin had
fought desperately against his captors; and an old
grudge between himself and Gaskens had stimulated
them both, the one to desire his taking, the other to
resist, even unto death, the effort of his enemy. The
result, so far, has been shown. Griffin tried to escape
at the approach of the tory, but the back track to the
neighbouring swamp had been intercepted by Gaskens,
who knew the route, and three of his men who went
there in advance to watch it; while the main body of
the troop pressed forward to the cottage. It was there
that the flying man encountered them, and the fight was
desperately waged before they conquered him. This
did not happen until two of his dastardly assailants had
fallen beneath his good sword and vigorous arm. He
pressed Gaskens himself backward, and would have
escaped, but for the aid of other tories coming on him
from behind. Though not seriously wounded in the
fray, he had been much chopped and mangled. A large
seam appeared upon his thigh, and there were two slight
gashes over his cheek, not so deep as ugly.
Conquered
at last, his hands were bound, and, with his
family, he was made to attend his captors on foot.
The manful resistance which he had offered to his
enemy, instead of securing him respect, exposed him
only to the most torturing irritations in his progress
with them. Before his eyes, they hurled the brand
into his little cottage, and he saw the fierce flames in
full mastery over his only home, long before they had
left the enclosure. In spite of his wounds and
injuries
,
the sturdy fellow maintained a stout heart, and
showed no sign of despondency; but bearing himself
as boldly as if he were not the victim but the victor,
he defied the base spirit of his conqueror, and with an
eye that spoke all the feeling of the fiercest hatred,
he looked the defiance which, at that time, he had no
better mode of manifesting. Nor was the feeling of
Gaskens towards his prisoner a jot less malignantly
hostile than that of Griffin. There was an old story
between themsuch a story as is common to the
strifes of a wild and but partially settled
neighbourhood
.
They had been neighboursthat is to say,
they dwelt on contiguous plantationsbut never friends.
For many years they lived in the same district,
seeing
each other frequently, but without intercourse.
This was entirely owing to Griffin, who disliked
Gaskens
,
and studiously withheld himself from all
intimacy
with him. Griffin was an industrious farmer
Gaskens the overseer for the Postell estate. Griffin
was a sober, quiet man, who had been long married,
and found his chief enjoyment in the bosom of his
family. Gaskens loved the race-turf and the cockpit,
and his soul was full of their associations. It is the
instinct of vice to hate the form of virtue, or that habit
which so nearly resembles her, as to desire no
exciting
indulgences, no forced stimulants, no unwonted
and equivocal enjoyments. Griffin partook of none
of those pleasures which were all-in-all to Gaskens,
and the other hated him accordingly. But there were
yet other causes for this hostility, in the positive
rejection
of his proffered intimacy, which Griffin had
unscrupulously given. Though but a small farmer,
with means exceedingly moderate, the sense of
self-respect
,
which industry brought with it to his mind,
taught him to scorn and to avoid the base outrider,
and the dishonest overseer of the neighbouring
plantation
.
Words, more than once, of an unfriendly
temper
,
had subsequently fallen between them, but not
with any serious rupture following. Gaskens, finally,
removed to another plantation farther off, and all
acquaintance
ceased between them. There he pursued
his old courses; and at length, left without employ,
as he had lost the confidence of all those whom
he had served heretofore in his capacity of overseer,
he had become the regular attendant of the tavern.
The arrival of the British forces, the siege and the
surrender of Charlestown, with the invasion of the
state by foreign mercenaries, presented him with a
new field for action; and, with thousands of others,
to whom all considerations were as nothingweighed
against the love of low indulgence, unrestrained power,
and a profligate lust for plunderhe did not scruple to
adopt the cause which was strongest, and most likely to
procure those objects for which his appetite most craved.
He became a furious loyalist, mustered his party, and
became the assessor of his neighbours' estates. The
fortune which threw into his hands the person of
Griffin revived the old grudge; and the stout defence
made by his prisoner, determined him upon a measure
but too often adopted in that saturnalia of crime, the
tory warfare in Carolina, to excite much attention or
provoke many scruples in the party employing it.
With a spiteful malignity which belongs to the vulgar
mind, he had ridden along by the side of his captive;
and finding, as he rode, that the presence of his wife
and daughter was a consolation still, he ordered them
to the rear with the other prisoners, not permitting
them to approach, or even to speak with him. As he
Vol. II.M
rode along by him, he taunted him with the low
remark
and the insolent sneer at his present fortune,
compared with his own, and with the past. The
wounded man, with his hands tied behind him, could
only demonstrate his scorn by an occasional sentence
from his lips, while his eye, gleaming with the
collected
vengeance of his heart, spoke well what the
other might expect, were they only permitted a fair
field and equal footing for contest.
Yes, you dd rebel, you see what's come of your
obstinacy and insolence. You fly in the face of the
king and refuse to obey his laws; and now you have
your pay. By Gd, but it does my heart good to see
you in this pickle.
Coward! if I could lay hands on you but for two
minutesonly two minutes, Amos Gaskensand by
the Eternal, chopped up as I am, you should never have
it in your power to say again to an honest man what
you have said to me.
Two minutes, do you say? said the othertwo
minutes? You shall have two minutes, Griffintwo
minutes, as you ask; but they shall be for prayer, and
not for fighting. I remember you of old, and you shall
pay off to-day a long score that's been running up
against you. You remember when I was overseer to
John Postell, and you gave me to know you didn't
want to see me at your house, though that was a
loghouse
like my own? I wasn't good enough for you,
nor for yours, eh? What do you say now?
The same. I hold you worse now than I did then.
And then I didn't despise you because you was poor,
for, as you say, I was poor myself; but because I
thought you a rascal, and since then I know'd it. You
are worse now.
Talk onI give you leave, you dd rebeland
that's a mercy you don't deserve; but I have you in
my power, and it won't be long you'll have to talk. I
wonder what your pride comes to now, when I, Amos
Gaskens, who wasn't good enough for you and your
daughter, have only to say the word, and it's all dicky
with both of you. You yourselfyou can't stir a hand
but at my orders; and look therethat's your wife and
daughterand what can you do for 'em, if I only gives
the word to the boys to do their likes to them?
Villain!monster! cried the prisoner, vainly
struggling with his bonds. But he writhed in them in
vain. The tyrant looked down upon him from his
horse with a grin of delight which completed the fury
of the victim, until he rushed, though with a fruitless
vengeance, against the sides of the animal, idly
expending
his strength in an innoxious and purposeless
effort against his persecutor. A blow from the back
of his sabre drove him back, while, as he reeled among
the troop, a shriek and a rush from the wife and
daughter in the rear, at the same moment, announced
their consciousness of the proceeding.
Two minutes you shall have, my boytwo minutes,
as you asked for them, said Gaskens to the prisoner,
as they now approached the spring.
Two minutes for what? he inquired.
For prayerand quite long enough for one that's
passed so good a life as you, was the sneering reply.
What mean you? was the farther inquiry of the
prisoner.
He pointed to the huge oak that surmounted the
spring, and at the same moment a corporal approached
with a rope, the running noose of which, as this agent
was frequently in requisition, was already made, and
now swung ostentatiously in his hands.
Great God! Amos Gaskens, wretch as you are,
you do not mean to do this murder?
May I be totally dd if I do not. You shall hang
to that tree in two minutes after I say the word, or
there are no snakes.
You dare not, ruffian. I claim to be a prisoner
of warI appeal to the troop.
Appeal and be dd. My troop know better than
to disobey the orders of a lawful officer in commission
of his majesty; and as for your being a prisoner of
war, that's a lie. You are a murderer, and I have
proof enough of it. But that's neither here nor there.
I will answer for all I have done to the commander of
the Dorchester post, and if you can make him hear
your voice at this distance, you have a better pipe than
my rope has touched yetthat's all. So, to your
prayers, while I take a sup of this water. Here, boy,
hold the bridle.
The wretch descended, and the boy reined up the
steed, while the former moved onward to the spring.
The corporal approached the doomed victim, and was
about to pass the loop over his head; but he resisted
by every effort in his power.
Great God!but this is not in earnest? Hear
me, Amos Gaskenshear me, man! Monster! are
you not ashamed to sport in this way with the
feelings
of my poor wife and child?
Do your duty, corporal, or blast me but I run you
up, though I have to do it myself. You shall know
whether I am not good enough for your dd log-cabin
now, or not. Two minutes, corporalonly two
minutes
,
and a short cordremembertwo minutes, I say
no more.
With the assistance of two of the tory squad, Griffin
was thrown upon his back, and lay struggling upon the
ground, while the rope was adjusted to his neck.
My wife! my child!let them come to me, Amos
Gaskenslet them see me, Gaskensman or devil!
Will you not suffer them to come to me?let me see
and speak to them, I pray you!
They will see you better when you are lifted. Be
quicksay your prayers, man, and lose no time. One
minute is almost gone already. Make the most of the
other.
The ruffian spoke with the coolest indifference,
while mixing a gourd of spirits and water at the spring.
This done, he ascended the hill, bearing the liquor in
his hand, and bade the execution proceed. They
hauled the victim by the rope up the little rising, and
towards the tree, almost strangling him before he
reached the spot. In the mean while the air was rent
with the shrieks of his wife and daughter in the hollow,
where they were pressed with the other prisoners,
whom the guard still kept back from any approach to
the doomed man, then about to be separated from them
for ever. He cried to them by name, in a thick, choking
voice, for the rope was now drawn, by the party
hauling
him along, with a suffocating tightness.
Ellen!Ellen, my wife! Oh, Ellen, my poor
child! Amos GaskensGod remember you for this!
Oh, Ellen! God help me! Have you no mercy,
monsternone? he screamed to his murderer, in
agony.
Father, dear father! cried the girl. The mother
had simply stretched forth her hands as she beheld the
threatened movement, and overpowered by her
emotions
,
had fallen senseless in the effort to speak. The
daughter strove to rush forward, but the strong-armed
sentinel rudely thrust her back with a heavy hand, and
pressed her down with the rest of the prisoners, who
had been made to file into the grove of tallow bushes,
which the prescience of Singleton had prudently
assigned
them. Gasping, but struggling to the last, the
victim had been already drawn up by his executioner,
within a few feet of the broad limb stretching over the
spring, which was to serve the purpose of a gallows; and
the brutal leader of the party, standing upon the little
eminence
the
liquor in hand, which he was stirring, yet
untastedhad already declared the time to be elapsed
which he allowed to the prisoner for the purposes of
prayer, when, distinctly and clear, the voice of
Singleton
was heardabove the shrieks of the daughterabove
the hoarse cries of the prisoner in parting to his wife
above all the bustle of the transaction. The single
word, as given to the boy Frampton, was uttered; and,
in the next instant, came the sharp, thrilling crack of
the rifle, fatally aimed, and striking the legitimate
victim. The body of Gaskens, between whose eyes
the bullet had passedthe word unspokenthe draught
in his hand untastedtumbled forward, prostrate,
immoveable
,
upon the form of his reprieved victim, whom,
still struggling, but half strangled, the corporal had
just dragged beneath the fatal tree.
M 2
CHAPTER XV.
Too long a laggard, he hath stood,
Until the hearth was drenched in blood;
Until the tyrant grew
All reckless, in his bloody game;
The cities proud he wrapped in flame,
Their brave defenders, slew.
The
young partisan, Frampton, to whom Singleton
had intrusted so leading a part in the enterprise, had
well fulfilled the duty assigned him. He had put
himself
in readiness, with the first appearance of the
marauders; and, with a heart throbbing with anxiety
all the while, had witnessed impatiently the progress
of the preceding scene, until broken by the emphatic
utterance of the signal, and his own prompt obedience
to its dictates. Then, with an instinct, which, in that
moment, silenced and stilled the quick pulsation of his
breast, had he raised the deadly weapon to his
shoulder
;
and with a determined coolness that arose, as it
were, from a desire to convince himself, not less than
his commander, that he could be firm, he had twice
varied his aim, until perfectly assured, he had drawn
the trigger, and most opportunely singled out a different
victim from that which Gaskens had contemplated for
the fatal sisters, in the person of that foul murderer
himself.
There was a moment of dreadful pause after this
event. The rope fell from the hands of the
executioner
,
and his eyes, and the eyes of all, were turned in
doubt and astonishment upon the quarter from whence
the deadly messenger had proceeded. The
condemned
man seized the opportunity to throw from his
body the lifeless carcass of the slain tory; and not
doubting that farther aid was at hand, and looking for a
close struggle, he crawled along the hill for shelter to
the neighbouring tree. His effort was interrupted;
for, in the next moment, another and another shot
selected
their victims; then came the full volley; and
then the loud voice of Singleton, as, plunging through
the copse, he led the way for his men, who charged the
confused and terrified tories on every side. They
scarcely showed sign of fight. One or two offered
resistance boldly, and with as much skill as
resolution
;
but they were soon overpowered, as they
received
no support from their comrades, who were now
scampering in the bushes in every direction. The
surprise had been complete; not a man was seriously
hurt among the whigs, while every rifle, fired in the
first of the fray, had told fatally upon its victim.
Seven were slain outright, a few more sabred, and
some few were made prisonersthe rest took the back
track into the woods, and though pursued, contrived,
with few exceptions, to make their escape.
The boy, meanwhile, had well performed the other
duty which had been given to his charge. The
conflict
,
pellmell, had scarcely begun, when, slipping
noiselessly round to the hollow where the prisoners
were confined, so as not to arouse the notice of the two
sentinels having them in custody, and whose eyes were
now turned in surprise upon the unlooked-for contest,
he cut the cords which bound them; and, prompt as
himself, they were no sooner free, than they seized
upon their guards and disarmed them. The ropes
were transferred to other hands than their own. This
was all the work of an instant; so, indeed, was
the affray itself; and the first object that met the eyes
of Singleton as he returned from the charge to the
spot where it first began, was the person of the boy
bending over the man he had shot, and curiously
inspecting
the bullet hole which he had made through
and through his forehead.
Ha, boy! said Singleton; you have done well
you have behaved like a man.
Oh, sir, tell me, cried the boy, was this the
man that was swearing so, but a minute ago? and can
this be the bullet hole from my rifle?
It is; this is the wretch, and your bullet was in
the right time.
Oh, sir, he was cursing when I fired: and then the
poor man he was going to hangI was so afraid that
you would not say, `now,' soon enough to save him.
But I feel so strange!
How, boy?
I have killed a man: what would my poor mother
say, if she was alive and knew it?
Go, go, boy, you have done well; you have shot
him in a good cause, and have saved innocent life
besides. You could not have done betterbut don't
think of it.
I can't help thinking of it, sir, said the boy, upon
whom a new experience was dawning rapidly, as he
moved back to the copse where he had been concealed,
to resume his jacket and rifle which he had there
thrown aside.
In another quarter of the field, the scene which met
the eye of Singleton was one of those which amply
compensate for the pain and the peril, the dread and
the anxiety, through which men must pass to witness
them:the sudden emancipation of the prisoners to
life and freedomthe erect aspect of the beaten and
bound manthe body realizing, in the moment of its
rescue, the liberty for which the mind had been
yearning
,
and whose value can only be duly estimated by
its privation. A crya cheer of joywas upon every
lip; as the bird, escaping from his cage, attests the
consciousness of his new condition of freedom, in
song, not less than flight.
Conspicuous among the prisoners, in their joy upon
this occasion, was the family of the brave but
suffering
wretch who had so narrowly escaped the halter.
Revived by the noise, the rush, the firing, and confusion
of the fight, as much as by the earnest cares of her
daughter, his wife had been filled with a new anxiety,
along with the new hope, when she found that, though
execution had not been done upon her husband, as so
nearly promised, her eyes could not trace out his person
in the midst of the fierce mele which followed the
first arrest of his doom. A moment after, and her
arms were about his neck: and though unused to the
melting mood, the tears forced themselves into the
eyes of Singleton, as he surveyed their meetingthe
sweetness of their sorrowthe joy which is tearful
the pleasure which almost grows into pain, in the
depth of its pure intensity.
Safe, oh safe, Walter Griffin! and there is no
more danger, my husband!
None, none! we are safe, we are all safe, Ellen!
And where is Gaskens?
The wretch is on his back. God bless the bullet
that came in time, and the true hand that sent it.
And we are free, my father, to go home againto
our own home? said the daughter, as she took the
hand of her father in both of her own.
Home! where is it? he exclaimed fiercely, and
with the same savage expression with which his eyes
had regarded Gaskens, even in the moment of his
greatest danger. Where is it? Did you not see the
blaze through the trees, as we looked back? Did he
not throw the torch into the loft with his own accursed
hands? and yet you ask for our home. We have no
home, girl.
But we are free, my husband, we are free. You
will go to workwe will soon have another in the old
place, and we can lodge in a shed till then.
Never, never! I do no such folly. What! to be
burnt down again by other tories?no, no! I am
chopped alreadyI cannot be chopped much worse,
and live; and if I must suffer, let me suffer with those
who will help me to strike, too, and to revenge. I will
burn too; I will kill too. I will have blood for what I
have lost, and the sufferings of others shall pay me
for my own and yours.
Singleton approached at this moment, and the
prisoners
,
so lately freed, gathered around him. Each had
his own story of affliction to tell, and each more
mournful than the other.
They chased me, it mought be a matter of three
miles, 'fore I gin up, captain, and they wore out a
bunch of hickories on my back, because I runsee to
the marks, was the complaint of one. Another had
his tale of petty treachery: his neighbour who had
eaten a hundred times of his bacon and hoecake, had
come in the night time, shot down his cattle, and,
finally, led the tories to his door to slaughter him.
Another had his wife shot in her bed, in mistake
for himself, while he was traversing the swamp to
make his escape. And so onone with simple cruelty,
one with burning, one with murder, and one with even
more atrocious crimeseach of the prisoners had his
own and his family's sufferings, at the hands of the
blood-thirsty tories, to narrate to their deliverer.
Singleton administered his consolations, and put
arms into their hands. The greater number of them
joined him; those who did not, receiving the
upbraidings
,
in no stinted measure, of those who did. The
lately doomed prisoner, Griffin, seized upon a
broadsword
a
massive weapon, which had fallen from the
hands of a huge-limbed toryand proffered himself the
first. His wife laid her hand upon his arm
Oh, husband, you are not a-going to join the troops?
you are not going a-fighting?
He looked sternly upon her, and shook away the
grasp
Ay, but I am! you shan't keep me from my duty
now. I wanted to come out six months ago, but you
tried the same game over me, and I was fool enough
to mind you, and see how it's turned out. Our cattle
shotthe house burntthe farm destroyedand me
chopped up, and almost hung; and all owing to you.
The woman sank back at the reproach. The girl
came between them
Oh, father, don't speak so to mother. Now,
mother
,
he don't mean it; he's only fierce because of the
fighting.
I do mean it! I do mean it! She whined, and
begged, and cried, and kept me back, until the bloody
varmints overcrowed us at every turn. She shall
keep me back no longer. I say to you, captain, here's
an arm, and here's a sword: to be sure the arm's
chopped, and the owner is ragged with cuts and
scratches; but no matter, they're true blood, and, by
God, it's at your service, for old Carolina. Put me
down in your orderly book as one of your men, as
long as the troop holds together. Wat Griffin is one
of your men, and one of Marion's men, and one of all
men that are enemies to the tories.
The man was resolved, and his wife spared all
farther
speech. She knew how unavailing was the
woman's
pleading against the resolute will of the man,
once determined upon. She clung to his arm,
however
;
and it could be seen, in that moment of
affliction
and of peril, of trying adventure and long fatigue
rising up before them, that the firmness of her
resolution
to share his fortunes was equal to that which had
determined him upon them.
An hour's labour buried the bodies of the men who
had fallen in the conflict. The recruits were well
armed from the hands of those who had perished and
become prisoners; and, with a troop now grown to a
respectable size, from the acquisitions of the morning,
Singleton prepared for his farther progress. The men
were soon mounted, some riding double, as the
number
of horses was not equal to that of the partisans.
The prisoners were driven along before them, and,
rather more slowly than they otherwise would have
been, not thus embarrassed, our little corps of patriots
was soon in motion. Singleton led the march at a
gentle pacethe boy Frampton, as had latterly been
his usage, taking his place and keeping close
alongside
of his commander.
CHAPTER XVI.
And subtle the design, and deep the snare,
And various the employ of him who seeks
To spoil his fellow, and secure himself.
Certainly
, man is never so legitimately satisfied,
as when in the realization of his own powers. The
exercise of those attributes which make his nature,
is the duty that follows his creation; and it is only
when he exceeds the prescribed limit, and runs into
excess, that he suffers and is criminal. How various
are these powershow extensive their rangehow
superior their empire! Creative, destructive,
perceptive
all
co-operating for the same endthe elevation
of his own capacities and condition. They are those of
a God, and they prove his divinity. Balanced duly,
each in its place, and restrained, as well as promoted,
by its fellow, he deserves to be, and most probably
will be happy. But whether the balance be preserved
or not, the discovery, on his part, of any one of these
powers, must have the effect of elevating him in his
own thought, and giving him pleasure accordingly.
Sometimes, indeed, to such a degree does its
realization
delight him, that he maddens and gluttonizes in its
enjoymenthe gloats upon it; and, from a natural
attribute
,
cherished for a beneficial purpose, and forming
a necessary endowment, it grows into a disease, and
preys upon its master.
Such is that love of enterprise which sometimes
leads to ungenerous conquest; such that stern desire of
justice which sometimes prompts us, in defence of our
own rights, not to scruple at unnecessary bloodshed.
In the pursuit of both, the original purpose is soon lost
sight of. We guage not our dooms in measure with
the wrongs we suffer; and the fierce excitements
which grow out of their prosecution, become leading, if
not legitimate, objects of pursuit themselves. The
conquest
of new countries, to this day, at whatever expense
of blood and treasure, is scarcely criminal in the eyes
of civilized and Christian man; and where conscience
does suggest a scruple, the doubt is soon set aside in
the gracious consideration of those vast benefits which
we assume to bring the people, whose possessions we
despise, and whose lands and lives we appropriate. Yet
is the enterprise itself legitimate, according to our
nature
;
and the sense of resistance to injustice and
oppression
,
a faculty that could not be dispensed with. They
form vital necessities of our condition, while subordinate.
The misfortune is that we pamper them, as we do
favourite
children, till they rise at last into tyrants, and
change places with us.
The boy Frampton had undergone a change which
did not escape the eye of Singleton as he rode beside
him. The lively laugh had left his countenance, the
gentle play of expression had departed from his rich,
red, and well-chiselled mouth, and in place of them
the eye was kindled with a deep glare of light,
lowering
and strong, while the lips curled into a haughty
loftiness becoming the lord of highest station. A vein
that crossed his forehead was full almost to bursting,
and his brow lowered with an expression of battle that
indicated feelings, even then warmly active with the
brief scene of strife through which they had so recently
passed. The boy was a boy no longer; he had
realized
one of the capacities of manhood; he had slain
his man; he had taken one step in revenging the
murder
of his mother: he had destroyed one of the
murderers
;
but, more than allhe had taken human life.
Something of a higher feeling than this was at the
same time working in his bosom. Though previously
untaught, he had learned too much of the struggle going
on in the colonies, not to have acquired some
knowledge
of the abstract question upon which it depended;
and though his thoughts were all vague and indistinct
on the subject, the rights of man, the freedom of the
Vol. IIN
citizen, and the integrity of his country, he had learned
to feel should all be among the first considerations,
as their preservation was always the first care, of the
patriot. The furious popular declamation of the five
preceding years had not been unheard by the youthful
soldier; and its appeals were not lost upon one, who,
in his own family, had beheld such a bloody argument
as had long since taught him the necessity of regarding
them. His country entered into his thoughts,
therefore
,
in due connection with his feeling of the
individual
wrong which he had sustained; and that personal
feeling which prompted the desire of revenge, was
lifted
higher, and rendered holier, by the connection. It
became hallowed in his bosom, where it contemplated,
not only the punishment of the wrong-doer, but the
protection
of the cottage-homehis own, and his
people's
from
the injustice and the violence of the invader.
It grew into a solemn principle of action thus
associated
,
and the moral abstraction over which the unassailed
citizen might have dreamed through a long season of
years, without duly considering its force or application,
became purely practical in the eyes of Framptona
feeling
of his heart, rather than a worked out problem of
his understanding. The thought grew active in
following
out the feeling; and Singleton, as the boy rode
abstractedly beside him, revolving a thousand new and
strange sensations that were running through his mind,
regarded his countenance with a glance of melancholy
rather than approval. He saw that, in his glance, which
taught him the leading activity of his new emotions.
The boy had a new sentiment in his bosom, the
contemplation
of which made it eminently more familiar.
He could destroyand he could do so without his own
rebuke. He could take the life of his fellowand
good men could approve. He had penetrated a new
world of thought, and he was duly enamoured of his
conquest; and even, as we all desire to renew the
novelty
,
and partake a second time of the strange pleasure,
so the heart of the boy panted for a repetition of that
indulgence which had lifted him into premature
manhood
.
The passions grew active without the least
countenance of reason to uphold them, and this is the
dangerous point in their history. Crime was made
legitimate to him now, and the fruit once forbidden,
was forbidden no longer. He could now pluck with
impunityso he began to thinkand his mind was on
that narrow eminence which divides a duty from an
indulgence
which
separates the close approach of a
principle to an appetitewhich changes the means into
an end; and, identifying the excuse for violence, with
an impelling motive to its commission, converts a most
necessary agent of life into a powerful tyranny, which,
in the end, runs riot, and only conquers to destroy.
Singleton regarded his charge with a close attention,
as he surveyed the unsophisticated emotions of his
heart, plainly enough written upon his face. He read
there all that was going on within; and his own heart
smote him at the survey. He thought of Emily, of
her prayer for peace, her denunciation and her dread
of war; and though he knew not of her death, the
thought that she might, even now, be a silent watcher
from the heavens, was enough to persuade him to an
effort to quiet the fierce spirit at work within the bosom
of the boy. He spokeand his voice, modulated by
grief into a tone as soft as that of a girl, struck strangely
upon the ear of his companion. It was so different
from the wild strain of thought with which his mind
was crowded. A note of the trumpetthe shriek and
shout of advancing foemen, had been far less
discordant
;
and the boy shivered as he heard the simple
utterance
of his own name.
LanceLance Frampton.
For a moment he was incapable of all reply. The
eye of Singleton was fixed upon him; and when he
met, and felt the look, he seemed to understand. His
lips, which were rigidly compressed before, now
separated
though
it was still with seeming difficulty that he
answered
Sir!
Your father is not with us, boy?
No, sirI have not seen him nor heard him. I
don't think he'll come out of the swamp, sir; he loves
the Cypress: though, I reckon, if he only knew we
should have had some fighting so soonI'm sure, sir,
he would have been glad to comehe loves to fight
with the tories, sir. He always hated them, and more
since mother's deaththem, and the dragoons.
And you too, boy, seem to have acquired
something
more of fondness for the sport than you had
before
.
You have learned also to love fighting with the
tories.
The words of Singleton were coldrather stern,
indeed
;
and his glance was not calculated to encourage
the stern passion which was growing so active in the
breast of the boy. But the latter did not regard the
disapprobation which tone and look alike conveyed to
his senses. His eye flashed and lightened, his lip
quivered, closed firmly, then parted and quivered
again, and his arm twisted convulsively the bridle of
his steed.
Oh, sir, I'm not afraid now. I know I shan't be
afraid. I didn't know at first how I should feel in
shooting at a man; but now, sir, I'm not afraid. I
wanted to run in, sir, when you told the men to charge,
but I had to go round and cut loose the prisoners; but I
watched you all the time, sir; and I clapped my hands,
sirI couldn't help itwhen I saw your sword go clean
down through the tory's hand and into his head, in
spite of all he could do. It was a great blow that, sir
a great blow; but I couldn't handle a sword so
heavy.
There was something of a desponding earnestness
in his tones as this last regret was uttered, and
Singleton
surveyed, as some curious study, the face, so full
of transitions, of the boy beside him. After the pause
of a moment, in a calm, subdued voice, he said to him
You shall have a sword, Lance a small one to
suit your hand. But remember, boy, war is not a sport,
but a duty, and we should not love it. It is a cruel
necessity
,
and only to be resorted to as it protects from
cruelty; and must be a tyranny, even though it shields
us from a greater. It is to be excused, not to be
justified
;
and we should not spill blood, but as the spilling
of blood is always apt to discourage the wrong-doer in
those practices by which all men must suffer, and
through which blood must be spilt in far greater
quantity
.
The boy looked on the speaker with an expression
of astonishment which he did not seek to conceal.
Singleton noticed the expression, and continued with
his lesson. But it is not the youthful mind, full of
spirit, and resolute in adventure, which will draw such
nice distinctions as the partisan insisted on. The duty
would be performed, doubtless, while it continued a
pleasure; but when the pleasure to the mind survives
the duty, it is not often that the unregulated impulse
can be persuaded to forbear. The boy replied
accordingly
Ah, sir, and yet I watched your face when you
were fighting, and you seemed glad to cut down your
enemy, and your eye was bright, and flashing with joy,
and your lip even laughed, sirI saw it laugh, sir, as
plainly as I see it now.
That may be, boy, but still war is a duty only, and
should not be made a pleasure. It has its pleasures,
as every duty must have; but they are dangerous
pleasures
,
and not the less so because we can smile when
indulging in them. It is a sad reflection, boy, that we
can laugh when taking the life of a fellow-creature,
and taking the life, too, that we can never return.
Yet, sir, where can be the harm of killing a tory?
They don't mind killing our people, and burning their
houses, and driving off their cattle. I wish I could
kill a thousand of them.
Singleton looked again on the boy, and saw that
he was never more in earnest. He thought once more
of his sister's pleadings, and her fine eloquence in
defence
of humanity, while considering this very subject.
What a contrast! But the one was on the verge of the
grave and of heaven, and her spirit was attuned to the
N 2
divine and gentle influence of the abodes of bliss.
The other was on the verge of lifeits storms yet to
go through, and by them to be purified, or never. No
wonder that the mood was sanguinary: the trial and
the path before him seemed to call for it.
Alight, boy, said he, and bring me a gourd of
that water, while the troop is coming up.
A branch ran across their path, and an opportunity
was suggested to the partisan for a useful lesson to his
charge. With alacrity, the youth alighted from his
horse, and went to gather the water, while Singleton
waited the coming up of the long cavalcade of troop,
and prisoners, women and children, behind. The boy
stooped over the clear streamlet which trickled without
a murmur over the road: it gave back his features from
its untroubled mirror, and he started back from their
contemplation. He had never before seen that
expression
the
expression of triumph in war, and a
sanguinary
desire for a renewal of its fierce and feverish
joys. The blood-shot eye, the corded vein, the wild
and eager expression, were all new to him, who had been
the favourite of a mother, gentle to weakness, and
fostering
him with a degree of sensibility almost hostile
to manhood. He dashed the gourd into the water, and
hurried away with the draught to his commander.
Singleton
barely looked upon him, and the eye of the boy
was turned instinctively from his gazebut for a
moment
,
however. His firmness was soon restored, the
strong fire again filled it, and once more it met that of
his superior unshrinkingly. Singleton gave him back
the vessel, and from that moment felt assured of his
nature
.
He saw that courage to desperation, and a love
of the fight, the adventure, and the risk of war, were
all in his soul, to a degree which no immaturity of
strength, no inexperience, could keep down or
diminish
.
He waited till he was again mounted, and at his
side; and he himself felt, in despite of his own
exhortations
,
a feverish sort of pleasure at seeing so
clearly depicted as they were upon the face of the boy,
the emotions of so bold and promising a spirit.
The long procession was now at hand, and
Humphries
,
who had given his attention hitherto chiefly to
the prisoners and the rear, now rode up to his
commander
.
They conferred upon the subject of their
next proceeding, and as the evening was at hand, and
there could be little prospect of their reaching the
Santee
that night in time to cross it, burdened as they
were with baggage and prisoners, they had almost
resolved
to lie by with the coming darkness; but while
they spoke, Davis, who had been sent on ahead with
the scouts, rode in with intelligence which partially
altered their determination.
There are outriders, sir, that hang on our skirts,
all well mounted. We have had a glimpse at them
through the bush, but not to overhaul them. Once or
twice, sir, we saw eyes peeping out from the woods,
sir, but though we pushed hard, they got shot of us
mighty quick, and we lost 'em. I only rode up to put
you on your guard, for I reckon there's more of 'em,
that we don't see.
'Tis well: put out again, Davis, and do not let them
escape you now if you can help it. We shall see to
the troop.
Davis rode away, and Singleton proceeded to arrange
his men for all circumstances.
Close up, Humphries, and bring your prisoners
into the centre: see that they do not straggle, and let
your men look to their arms. Put them in good
preparation
for any chance.
Then calling to the front a squad of the better armed
and mounted, the partisan extended his line on the
advance
,
so as to throw a few troopers, on either hand,
into the woods that skirted the road. It was not long
after this that Davis, with the scouts, who had more
than once detected a pair of keen eyes watching them
from the distant bush, now came suddenly upon a
countryman
who sat mending a bridle upon a log at the
road-side. He did not seem much startled at their
appearance
,
and his whole features wore an expression
of the most approved simplicity and sang froid. He
made no movement until the scouts had actually
surrounded
him, then blurted out his astonishment with
the coolest composure.
Why, holla! now; but you block a fellow in,
mighty like as if you wanted to look at his teeth.
What mought your wish be, stranger?
Thus addressing Davis, the countryman rose, and
with an air half of doubt and half of defiance,
confronted
the new-comers. The Goose Creeker looked
on his big bones with admiration, for the man was
huge of limb, though uncomely; and the contrast
between
him and Davis was calculated at once to
command
attention. The lieutenant, however, did not
long delay his answer.
Well, now, friend, our wish aint mighty hard to
come at; and the first question I have to ax you, is
after
yourself. What may your name be, and what's
your business?
The man chuckled incontinently for a moment, then
recovering, and looking grave, he replied
Look you, stranger, I never let a man poke fun at
me twice on the same day; so I give you fair warning.
I'm old hell for a varmint, and no tree your eyes ever
looked on will come at all nigh to hide you,if I once
sartainly set out to hunt you up. So, now you'll see
it's a mighty ridiculous notion you have if you think
to poke fun at Thumbscrew without paying for it.
Well, Mr. Thumbscrew, if so be that's your true
name, I'm much obligated to you for your civility in
warning me about your ways. I've no doubt you're
thought a big man in your part of the country; but
I'm thinking they'd look at you for a mighty small one
in mine. But that's not the business now. Big or
little
,
Mr. Thumbscrew, there's too many upon you now
to give you much chance, so the best way before you
is to bear a dry scrape kindly, and that'll save you
from two.
What! won't you give fair play? Well, that's not
so genteel, stranger. Fair play's a jewel, all the world
over; and, man for man, or if so be you mought like
it better, I'm not scrupulous to take two of you for a
bout or so on the soft airth; but more than that'll be a
leetle oncomfortable.
We haint got time for that, friend, was the
careless
reply of Davis; and all that we wants from you
in the way of civility, is just to answer a few questions
that we shall ax you.
Well, ax away, was the half-surly replyax
away; but it wouldn't take too much time for a lift or
two on the soft grass, I'm thinking.
You say your name is Thumbscrew?
Yes, my boy-name; but at the christening they gin
me another, that aint so easy to mention. The true name
is John Wetherspoon, at your sarvice; but
Thumbscrew
comes more handy, you see, and them that knows
me thinks it suits me better.
Very well, Mr. Thumbscrew, or Wetherspoon
now, will you say what you're doing here in these parts
at this time of day?
Well, that's jest as easy to larn now, sence you
see I'm mending my bridle, and looking arter my
critter
that's been stolen, I reckon, by some thieving
soldiers
saving
your presence, and axing your pardon.
What soldiers?
Why, how do I know? Sometimes they're one
thing, sometimes another; now they're whigs, and
now they're tories. One time they're Gainey's,
another
time they're Marion's men, just as the notion
suits 'em.
And what are you? Are you a whig or tory?
Neither, thank God, for all his civilities and
marcies
.
I'm a gentleman, and not a soldier, no how, I'll
have you to know.
And where do you live when you are at home?
In the Big Bend, by Red Stone Hollow, close to
the Clay Church, and right side of Black Heifer
Swamp. My farm is called Hickory Head Place; and
the parson who does our preaching is named
Broadcast
he
preaches through his nose, and has a Way with
him.
What way?
Margery Way, what does his mending: all the
parish knows her.
Well, but I don't know any of these places or
people you've been telling me of, said Davis.
I reckoned as much. They say, though I've never
been in them parts, that you folks, from low down by
the sea, are most unmarcifully stupid.
Humph! and how far are we here from the river?
A small chance of a run, if so be you mean the
Santee
.
This morning, when I left it, it was ten miles off,
but it's been running ever since; and God knows,
stranger
,
I can't tell how far it's got to by this time.
I'm dubious, Mr. Thumbscrew, that you're playing
your tantrums upon me, after all; and if so be I find
you at that work, I'll hang you, dn my buttons, if I
don't, by your own bridle, and no two ways about it,
old fellowhow far is the Santee?
Well now, you're mighty like getting in a passion,
and that'll be quite too rediculous. The Santee, now,
if it stands still, you see, is jest about ten miles away to
the right. It may be more, and it may be less, but it's
thereabouts, if it stands where it ought; but I tell you
it runs mighty fast, for a thing that you look for to be
quiet in one place.
Ten milesand what have you seen in the shape
of men and soldiers about here? Have you seen any
tories or any whigs? Marion's men, they say, are thick
along the swamp.
It's a bad business that, stranger, hunting after
sodgers
.
I knows nothing about them. If I could only
find Nimrod now, stranger, you can't count up how
little I'd care about all you big sword men, tories or
whigs, red coats or blueall the same to Thumby.
They've stolen the nag, and may he ride to the ugly
place with the rapscallion that straddles him, drop him
fairly inside the door, and come back a minute after to
Red Stone Hollow.
In this way, until Singleton's approach, did Davis
seek, in vain, to obtain his information from the
stranger
.
He communicated his ill success to his superior,
and the incorrigible Thumbscrew was brought before
him. The partisan surveyed him closely, and saw at a
glance that the fellow, in southern phrase, was playing
possum, and knew much more than he delivered. But
the key was at hand, and the first words of Singleton
unsealed the mystery.
How are the owls, Thumbscrew?
At roost, and ready for the moon, was the instant
reply; and every feature was full of awakening
intelligence
.
Singleton ordered his men back, and conferred
with him alone.
The Swamp Fox is at handnot moving?
He waits for Major Singleton, and prepares for the
continentals; but must be close, for the tories under
Pyles, Huck, Tynes, and Harrison, are all around him.
And how far are we now from Nelson's?
Just nine miles, and the road clear, all but our
scouts. Horry with twenty men scours to the left, and
ten of us skirt the track to Nelson's, partly on the look
out for you, sir, and partly for the tories.
'Tis wellyou have a horse?
Ay, sir, close in the wood.
Shall we be able to reach the Santee before dark?
Impossible, sir, with all your men; but a detachment
may, and had better ride on to prepare for the rest.
Colonel Marion is fast transferring the boats to the
other side, and as the road is clear, sir, you would find
it best to spur forward with a few, while the lieutenant
brings up the remainder.
Desirous of securing the passage, Singleton adopted
the counsel, and singling out a dozen of his best horse,
he led the way with his new guide, and left Humphries
to bring up the cavalcade.
CHAPTER XVII.
I love the wild adventurethe thick woods,
Strange aspects, and the crowding things that rove,
Peopling their deep recesses.
The
little force led by Singleton in advance of his
main body continued to make acquisitions at every
step of its progress. The scouts of Marion, lining the
woods at convenient intervals from each other, were
soon notified of the approach of friends by the
peculiar
whistle which Thumbscrew employed; a whistle
shrill in itself, and singularly modulated, which Marion's
men were all taught to understand. They came out,
one by one, from the bush; brought out their hidden
horses, and each, answering to his
nom de guerre
, as it
was called out by Thumbscrew, took his place along
with the advancing party. There were Supple Jack
and Crabstick, Red Possum and Fox Squirrel,
Slickfoot
and Old Ben; all men of make and mettle, trusty
and true, and all of them, in after years, winning a
goodly reputation in the land, which the venerable
tradition
,
in sundry places, will not willingly let die.
The river was now at hand, and Thumbscrew was
required to give the signal to the scouts who were at
watch along its banks. He did so, and the effect was
admirable. From one bush to another, cover to cover,
they all gave back the emulous sounds. The old
cypress
had a voice from its hollow, the green bush from
its shade, and the shrill echoes rollingly arose from the
crowding leaves of the thick tree that overhung the
river, reverberating far away along its bosom. The
signal was but once repeated, and all was still for
a moment. Suddenly, the approaching troop heard
the plash of paddles, the plunge of a horse in
the water, and a quick, lively blast from the common
horn, the sounds seeming to arise from the swamp on
the opposite shore. Pushing his steed forward, and
followed by his men, Singleton rode up to the bluff of
the river, just as the last gay glimpses of the setting
sun hung like so many rose-streaks upon its bosom,
trembling to and fro like so much gossamer on the
green edges of the gathering foliage.
And what a sight, in addition, was before their eyes!
The surface of the river was strown with boats of all
sorts and sizes. A dozen or more, filled with the men
of Marion, were in progress from one side of the stream
to the other, while they towed behind them as many
more, laden with live-stock and provisionsa large
assessment
having just been made upon the farmsteads
of the neighbouring tories. They had reached the
centre
of the stream, when the signal of the scouts struck
their ears; and the quick command of their leader,
the renowned partisanfor it was Marion himself who
led themarrested their farther progress. He stood
erect when the troopers rode up to the bank; and
the eye of Singleton soon distinguished him from the
rest. Yet there was little in his appearance, to the
casual spectator, to mark him out from his compatriots.
His habiliments were not superior to theirs. They
had borne the brunt of strife, and needed, quite as much
as many of the rest, the friendly hand of repair and
restoration
.
His person was small, even below the middle
stature, and exceedingly lean and slender. His body
was well-set, however, with the exception of his knees
and ankles, which were thick, incompact, and badly
formed. At the time, he rested almost entirely upon
one legthe other being at ease upon the gunwale of
the boat. He still suffered pain in one of his limbs
from a recent hurt; and in walking, an unpleasant
limping
movement was readily perceptible. His dress, as
Singleton now beheld him, was one rather unusual for a
commanding officer from whom so much was expected.
It consisted of a close-bodied jacket, of a deep crimson
colour, but of coarse texture. His smallclothes, of
the fashion of the day, were badly conceived for such
Vol. II.O
a figure as his. The free Turkish trowsers might
have concealed those defects which the closely fitting
fashions of the time rendered unnecessarily
conspicuous
.
His were of a blue stuff, coarse, like the jacket,
and made with exceeding plainness, without stripe or
ornament of any description, beyond the frog of his
sword, the small cut-and-thrust which hung rather low
at his side. A white handkerchief about his neck,
wound loosely, accorded strangely with the rest of
his dress, and did not seem, in its disposition, to have
tasked much of the care, in arrangement, of the wearer.
His uniform, if so it may be styled, was completed by
the round leathern cap, forming a part of the dress
which he wore when an officer in the second South
Carolina regiment, and bore in front a silver crescent,
with the words, Liberty or Death, inscribed beneath.
He wore no plume, but in its place a white cockade,
which was worn by all his men, in order that they
might be more readily distinguished in their night
actions
with the tories. Such was the garb of the famous
guerillathe Swamp Foxof Carolina. The features
of his face did not ill accord with the style of his garments.
His skin was dark and swarthy; his eyes, black,
piercing
,
and quick; his forehead, high, full, and commanding;
his nose was aquiline; his chin bold and projecting,
though not sharp; and his cheek sunken, and deeply
touched with the lines of thought. He was now
forty-eight
years of agein the very vigour of his
manhood
hardened
by toil and privation, and capable of
enduring every sort of fatigue. Cool and steady,
inflexible
,
unshrinking; never surprised; never moving
without his object, and always with the best design for
effecting itMarion, perhaps, of all the brave men
engaged
in the war of American liberty, was the one
best calculated for the warfare of the partisan. His
patriotism, wisdom, and fearlessness moved always
together
,
and were alike conspicuous. Never despairing
of his cause, he was always cheerful in vicissitude,
and elastic under defeat. His mind rose, with renewed
vigour, from the press of necessity; and every new form
of trial only stimulated him to newer and more
successful
efforts. His moral and military character, alike,
form the most perfect models for the young, that can be
furnished by the history of any individual of any nation.
The paddles of the rowers were lifted as Singleton
appeared in sight. The boats rested in the centre of
the river, and, shading his eye with his hand, Marion
closely noted the troop as its several members wound
out of the woods and gathered along the bank. He
did not need much time in the survey, before his keen
eye singled out the persons of such of the new-comers
as he had before known. His voice, strong, regular,
and even in its utterance, though at the same time
subdued
and musical, was heard immediately after.
Ah, Major Singleton, you are as prompt as ever.
I rejoice to see you. You come in good season, though
you come but poorly accompanied.
A few words from Singleton explained the cause of
his apparent weakness, and the orders of Marion were
promptly given.
Lieutenant Conyers, throw off the empty boats and
put back after me in your own, leaving the spare ones.
Take the whole of them, for the squad of Major
Singleton
will doubtless fill them all. McDonald,
convey
the rest to the camp, and let Oscar
[3]
[3]
His favourite servant.
bring Ball
Ball, his horsea noble animal, that always led the advance in
swimming the rivers.
with him. It may be difficult otherwise to get the
strange horses over, and there is no flat.
With these, and a few other instructions, Marion led
the way back to where Singleton with his troop
awaited him; and a few minutes only had elapsed
when they stood once more together in close
conference
.
The brief history of past events was soon
given, and the major was delighted to meet with the
unqualified approval of his superior. He learned from
Marion that his uncle had gone on to join with Gates
only a few hours before his arrival, having been
anxious
to find active service at as early a time as
possible
.
He had not endeavoured to dissuade him, as his
was an independent commission; though the
determination
of Marion himself, was to proceed with the same
object in the same direction. His force, with the
recruits
brought by Singleton, was now something more
respectable in form if not in equipment. In arms and
ammunition, not to speak of clothes and the usual
equipages of camp and horse, they were miserably
deficient
;
but with the hope that the continentals were
provided well, and with a surplus, this matter gave the
partisan but little concern. A small supply of shot and
powder which Humphries had contrived to procure in
Dorchester, came seasonably to his assistance; and
with a new hope from this seasonable arrival of his
men, Marion determined earnestly to press his advance
to a union with the commanding force supposed to be
coming on with Gates.
To Singleton he partially unfolded his determination,
though he entered into no particulars. He had not yet
determined as to the time and route of his purposed
movement. It was necessary that he should first
ascertain
the precise position of Gates; and, again, he
had the duty yet to perform, in part, which he had
voluntarily
undertaken, of destroying all the boats upon
the river at the various crossing places, which might
otherwise be employed to facilitate the progress of
Lord Cornwallis to the assistance of Rawdon at
Camden
,
upon which place it was now understood the first
effort of the approaching southern army would be
made. There was little doubt that Cornwallis would
soon be apprised, if, indeed, he was not already, of the
necessity for his presence at Camden; for though
Singleton
had arrested one courier, and Marion himself
another, it was not to be expected that others would
not succeed in passing with intelligence where the
line of country to be watched was so extensive as
to call for ten times the active force of Marion, with
the hope of doing so with any thing like reasonable
certainty. To retard the movements of the
commander
at Charlestownto keep him back until Gates
should be able to strike his first blow, was an object
quite too important to be foregone or given up but with
great effort; and, an understanding between Sumter
and Marion, had assigned one of the two leading
routes to the designated ground of battle to each of the
partisans. Marion had done much already towards his
object. He had destroyed more than two hundred boats
on both sides of the river, sparing neither canoe nor
periagua. All within reach had been broken up, save
the few which he still employed for his own purposes
in the swamp, gathering provisions, and for the
facilitation
of his own progress. Another day, and Singleton
would not have found it so easy to
Swim the Esk river, where ford there was none.
That night, as soon as the whole party had come
up, the passage was effected, and without any great
difficulty
.
The horses swam beside the boats, secured by
ropes and bridles, while their riders, for the time,
occupied
a more secure seat within them than they might
have done upon their saddles. Ball, the famous horse
of Marion, led the way for the rest, and he went
through the water as freely and fearlessly as a native
born to the element. The rest followed with some
little shivering and restiveness, but, with the boats,
soon reached their depth, and were then mounted and
ridden through the river-sedge, over the fallen tree, and
safely, at length, into the island thicket which formed
the hiding-place of the Swamp Fox on the Santee.
The boats, filled with the women, children, and
prisoners
,
under a small guard, had a more tedious, though
more secure and easy passage to the same spot. Soon
as they left the current of the river and got within the
foliage, the swamp-suckers, with an old experience,
seized upon their long canes, twenty feet in length, to
the end of each of which a prong of the deer's antlers,
and sometimes a crotch stick of some hard wood, had
been tightly fastened. With these, catching the
overhanging
limbs and branches that fenced in a crooked
creek that led to the island, they drew themselves
O 2
along. Without dip of oar, or plash of paddle, silently
and still, as if endued with a life of its own, the boat
swept through its natural abode, a familiar tenant of its
depths. Torches flashed along at intervals upon the
banks to guide them, but they were perfectly
unnecessary
to the frequent dwellers in the swamp. They
who steered and led the way could have travelled by
night and day, unfearing, and unswerving from their
designated path, with the ease of a citizen along the
high road. The rapidity of their movements through
scenes only distinguishable when the torch flashed
over them, delighted and astonished the men from the
low country, who now traversed them for the first time.
Porgy was absolutely overcome with anticipations.
He could not refrainsuch was the good humour which
the novelty of their progress inspiredfrom addressing
Doctor Oakenburg, who sat beside him in the boat, on
the subject of his musings.
This, Doctor Oakenburg, said he, this is a
region
so
Major Singleton tells mewhich, in the
language
of Scripture, may be said to flow with milk and
honey.
The doctor, terrified before into silence, was now
astounded into speech.
Milk and honey! he exclaimed, with wondering.
Ay, doctor, milk and honey! that is to say, with
fish and terrapin, which I take to mean the same
thing, since nobody would desire any land in which
there was no meat. The land of milk and honey
simply
means to convey the idea of a land full of all
things that men of taste can relish; or we may even
go farther in this respect, and consider it a land
teeming
with all things for all tastes. Thus, yours, Doctor
Oakenburgeven your vile taste for snakes and eels has
been consulted here not less than mine for terrapin.
Along the same tussock on which the bullet-head
reposes
,
you will see the moccasin crawling confidently.
In the same luxurious wallow with the hog, you will
behold the sly alligator watching him. The summer
duck, with its glorious plumage, skims along the same
muddy lake, on the edge of which the dd bodiless
crane screams and crouches; and there are no possible
extremes in nature to which a swamp, like this, will not
give shelter, and furnish something to arouse and satisfy
the appetite. It is a world in itself, and, as I said before,
with a figurative signification of course, it is indeed a
land of milk and honey.
Land indeed! said one of the troopers; I don't
see much of that yet. Here's nothing but rotten trees
and mud-holes, that I can make out when the lightwood
blazes.
Never mind, my lark, said one of the conductors
in a chuckling reply; wait a bit, and you'll see the
blessedest land you ever laid eyes on. It's the very
land, as the big-bellied gentleman says, that's full of
milk and honey; for, you see, we've got a fine range,
and the cattle's plenty, and when the sun's warm you'll
hear the bee trees at middayand such a music as
they'll give you! Don't be afeard now, and we'll soon
come to it.
I doubt not, my good friend, I doubt not, and I
rejoice
that your evidence so fully supports my opinion.
Your modes of speech are scarcely respectful enough,
however; for though a man's teeth are prime agents and
work resolutely enough for his belly, yet it is scarcely
the part of good manners to throw one's belly
continually
into one's teeth, Porgy responded gravely.
Oh, that's it, said the other; well, now don't be
skittish, mister, for though I am Roaring Dick, I never
roars at any of our own boys, and I likes always to be
civil to strangers. But it's always the way with us,
when we don't know a man's name, to call him after
that part that looks the best about him. There's
Tom Hazard now, we calls him by no other name
than Nosey; 'cause, you see, his nose is the most
rumbunctious
part that he's got, and its almost the only part
you see when you first look on him. Then there's
Bill Bronsonas stout a lark as you've seed for
many a daynow, as he's blind of one eye and can
hardly see out o' t'other, we calls him Blinky Bill, and he
never gets his back up, though he's a main quick hand
if you poke fun at him. So, stranger, you must not
mind when we happen to call you after the most
respectable
part.
Respectable part! I forgive you, my friendyou're
a man of taste. Dr. Oakenburg, your dd hatchet
hip is digging into my side; can't you move a jot
farther? There, that will do; I am not desirous of
suffering martyrdom by hip and thigh.
Now we're most home, said Master Roaring
Dick to his little crew. One more twirl in the creek,
and you'll see the lights and the island; there, there it
is. Look, now, stranger, look for yourself, where the
Swamp Fox hides in the daylight, to travel abroad
with old blear-eyethe owl, that iswhen the round
moon gets out of her roost.
And grand and imposing, indeed, was the scene that
now opened upon Porgy and the rest, as they swept
round the little bend in the waters of the creek, and
the deeply imbowered camp of the partisan lay before
them. Twenty different fires, blazing in all quarters
of the island, illuminated it with a splendour which no
palace pomp could emulate. The thick forest walls
that girdled them in, were unpierced by the rays; they
were too impenetrably dense even for their splendours,
and like so many huge and blazing pillars, the larger
trees seemed to crowd forward into the light with a
solitary stare that made solemn the entire and
wonderful
picturesqueness of the scene. Group after group of
persons, each with its own vocation, gathered around the
distinct fires, while horses neighed under convenient
trees; saddles and bridles, sabres and blankets, hung
from their branches, and the cheery song from little
parties the more remote, made lively the deep seclusion
of that warlike abiding-place. The little boat floated
fairly up to one of the fires; a dozen busy hands at
once assisted the new-comers to alight, and a merry
greeting hailed the acquisition of countrymen and
comrades. Boat after boat, in the same way, pressed
up to the landing, and all in turn were assisted by
friendly hands and saluted with cheering words and
encouragement. It was not long before the strangers,
with the readiness which belongs to a life like theirs,
chose their companions in mess and adventure, and
began to adapt themselves to one another. Lively chat,
the hearty glee, the uncouth but pleasant jest, not
forgetting
the plentiful supper, enlivened the first three
hours after the arrival of Singleton's recruits, and
fitted them generally for those slumbers to which
they now prepared to hasten.
Well, Tom, said Porgy to his old retainer, as he
hurried to his tree, from a log, around which his
evening's
meal had been eaten in company with Roaring
Dick, Oakenburg, and one or two otherswell, Tom,
considering how dd badly those perch were fried, I
must confess I enjoyed them. But I was too hungry
to discriminate; and I should have tolerated much
worse stuff than that. But we must take care of this,
Tom, in future. It is not always that hunger helps us to
sauce, and such spice is a dd bad dish for us when
lacking cayenne.
Porgy threw off his coat, unbuckled the belt from
his waist, and prepared himself to lie down; but a
moment's
inspection of his couch counselled him to be
discontented
.
This won't do, Tom: you must bring me some
more rushesa good armful, boyand no finicking.
Look you, is that a blanket, Tomthere, hanging from
that limb?
Yes sa; dah blankethim b'long to somebody, I
'speck.
Very likely, Tom; but God knows I'm somebody;
I have some body at least to take care ofso bring it
to me.
The blanket was brought, the gourmand wrapped it
carefully around him, put his saddle under his head
for a pillow, bade Tom take cover behind him, and
stretched himself, at length, for the night. A few
moments
after, the owner of the blanket came looking for
his property, and never did nose insist more
religiously
upon its master's slumber, than did that of Porgy.
The man surveyed the huge body of the gourmand, and
his eye particularly noted the blanket in which he lay;
but the torch which he carried gave too partial a light
to permit of his assuming with certainty that it was
his, and he moved away at last, to the great
satisfaction
of Porgy, leaving him in undisturbed possession
of his prize.
CHAPTER XVIII.
We move betimes to-day'tis some time yet
To the gray dawning. Wherefore is the toil
But that we would not loiter, but show forth
A boy's ambition?
The
stars were yet shining when the slumbers of
Major Singleton were broken. His page, the devoted
Lance Frampton, stood beside him.
Why, how now, Lancewhat disturbs you? was
the inquiry of the major rising from the brush on which
he had been lying. But he needed no answer to the
question. His own senses, now completely awakened,
readily took in the occasion of the disturbance. The
partisans were in motion on every side, and the shrill
voice, brief and emphatic, of Marion himself, was
heard on the edge of the island, in rapid command.
Horses were prancing, and a troop was evidently on
the approach from the upper edge of the swamp. The
quick, comprehensive whistle of the scouts came to
his ears, clearly, above all other sounds; and, obeying
the signal from the camp, the scouts themselves came
in a moment after.
Singleton was soon beside his commander. He had
slept in his clothes, having no other covering,
beside
the greenwood tree, and the clear, transparent blue
sky, that shone, in glimpses, with its thousand eyes,
upon him, through the leaves. The movement of the
Swamp Fox was soon understood. That wily
commander
only lingered for the morning watch to set
forth upon his journey, in order to form a timely
junction
with the continentals. He had a wild region yet
to traverse before he could attain the object; and
every acre of ground was in possession either of
confirmed
enemies, or doubtful friends. Sparing no
precaution
,
Marion, however, moved with confidence and
without fear.
You are prompt, major, and as I would have it.
Make your own men readystill keep their command,
till our disposition may be made more uniformand put
them into a column of advance. Horry is just coming
in with his troop, from which your lead will be taken.
Our scouts are all in, and one brings me a courier with
news from the army. De Kalb is now on the way, in
rapid march from Salisbury with two thousand
continentals
;
Colonel Porterfield, with Virginia horse, is
moving
to join him; and General Caswell, with the North
Carolina militia in force, arming for the same object.
Though better provided than ourselves, as well in arms
as in numbers, we must not hesitate to show ourselves
among them. General Gates will doubtless bring a
force with him; and it will be hard, if our boys, ragged
though they be, should not win some laurels and
blankets
together.
Singleton promptly passed to the sheltering clumps
of trees where his men had been placed, and his
command
was in movement quite as soon as any of the
rest.
This is scarcely civil, young man, cried Porgy to
the soldier who had undertaken to arouse him, and who,
in order the more effectually to do so, had seized upon
the ends of the blanket in which the gourmand had
enveloped himself, and which he pulled at tightly
Scarcely civil, young man, I repeat. What if the
blanket is your propertyits adroit appropriation
by himself still running in his headif it is your
property, what of that? I have never denied it, and a
polite demand for it should have secured it readily.
But to disturb a gentleman's slumbersit's an offence,
sira glaring offence, which should have its
punishment
;
andlet me but unwrapI am a pacific man, and
my temper is not ungentle; but, to disturb my slumbers,
which are so necessary to the digestive organsstop,
I saydn, don't pull so! Ah, Humphries, my dear
fellow, is that you?you have come in season to my
relief. That intrusive fellowbut do take the torch
from my eyes, the glare is very offensive.
Humphries, who now stood beside him with a flaming
brand, explained to the reluctant Porgy the true cause
of the disturbance, and relieved the unconscious soldier
from the impending danger. But the current of his
wrath was only turned in another direction.
What! move nowleave the swamp! Why, my
dear fellow, either you or I am dreaming. Leave the
swamp! we have just come into ithaven't yet seen
it fairly, and know nothing of its qualities. I had
hoped to have dwelt here one or two days, at leastto
have enjoyed its products, and compared them with those
of the Cypress.
It's a truth, Porgy, and I'm sorry, for your sake, that
it is so. But the major's orders are to be quick, and
don't stand for trifles. The Swamp Fox, as the men
here call Marion, has been stirring this hour. You
see him yonder, where the soldiers are in the saddle
he that has his cap off. He's talking to our men, and
you ought to be there to listen, for he talks mighty
strong to them, they say, and they all like to hear
him; so, be in a hurry, my boy, or you'll lose all.
There's no policy worse than that. Never hurry
keep cool, keep cool, keep coolthose are the
three great precepts for happiness. Life is to be
looked after, and you'll never find it if you hurry.
Happiness is a thing of grains and fractions: and it is
with pleasure, as with money-making, according to the
rule laid down by that old Pennsylvania printer, `Take
care of the pence, and the pounds will take care of
themselves.' Take care of the moments, and you need
never look after the hours. That's my doctrine for
happinessthat is the grand secret. Hurry forbids all
this. You skip momentsyou skip happiness. Why
do you sip rum punch? why, indeed, do you sip all
goodly stomachics?simply to prolong the feeling of
enjoyment. It is your beast only that gulps, and gapes,
and swallows. It is only your beast that hurries.
Happiness
is not for such.
But we must hurry now, Porgy, if we want to hear
what he says.
I never hurried for my father, though he looked
for me hourly. I will not hurry for the best speech
ever delivered. Do oblige me with that belt; and lay
down your torch, my good fellow, and pass the strap
through the buckle for me. Therenot so tight, if you
please; the next hole in the strap will answer now; an
hour's riding will enable me to take in the other, and
then I shall probably try your assistance. Eh! what's
that?
The pitiful howling of a negro, aroused from his
slumbers, prematurely, by the application of an
irreverent
foot to his ribs, now called forcibly the attention of
the party, and more particularly that of Porgy.
That's Tom's voiceI'll swear to it among a
thousand
;
and somebody's beating himI'll not suffer that.
And with the words he moved rather rapidly away
towards the spot whence the noise proceeded.
Don't be in a hurry now, Porgy; rememberkeep
cool, keep cool, keep cool, cried Humphries, as he
followed slowly after the waddling philosopher.
Do I not, Humphries? I am not only cool myself,
but I go with the charitable purpose of cooling
another
.
But what's the harm?he's only kicking
Woolly-head
into his senses.
Nobody shall kick Tom while I'm by. The
fellow's
too valuable for blows;boils the best rice in
the southern country, and hasn't his match, with my
counsel, at terrapin in all Dorchester. Holla! there,
my friend, let the negro alone, or I'll astonish you.
Vol. II.P
The soldier and Tom, alike, came forward at the
salutation
,
and with the first possible opportunity of contact,
Porgy grappled the first by the collar, and shook him
violently. The soldier, in astonishment, demanded the
cause of the assault.
That's the cause, my friendthat's the causean
argument that runs on two legs, and upon which no
two legs in camp shall trample.
Porgy pointed to the negro, who stood by, shaking
his head and grumbling.
Das right, Massa Porgy. Wha' for he kick nigger
das doing noting but sleep? ax um dat, Mass Porgy.
The soldier now grew ruffled, and as he was stout
and vigorous, would most probably have tumbled
Porgy
in the dirt without much effort, had not the approach
of Singleton, already in the saddle, called for the
prompt obedience and pacific aspect of all parties.
To saddle, Mr. Porgyto saddle; and be ready for
a movement in five minutes. The colonel will soon
give the word, and I would not that any of our troop
should be cause of delay.
Nor I, Major Singletonnor I. Ambitious
emulation
is the soldier's principle; and though I would
never hurry, I would never be a laggard. The golden
medium, sir, should be still preserved. I approve it
much. But slumbers once brokenvisions intruded
uponseldom return in their original felicity. We
may try, but glimpses only come back to us, telling us
not so much what to enjoy, as what we have lost the
enjoyment
of.
You must allow for circumstances; perilous
necessity
,
Mr. Porgy, you well know, has a standard of
its own.
A manifest truism, Major Singleton; and in its
recognition
,
I will even hurry to obey our present orders.
Tom, old boywhy, dn it, that fellow's bloodied your
nose! Your left nostril has an ugly abrasion.
'Speck so, Mass Porgyhe feel very much like he
bin hurt.
Wash it, and tighten that girth, Tom. I did not
think he had hurt you so, or I should have confounded
him. An ugly slit that; but no matter. See to the
girth; and before we mount, be sure that you have that
cold ham which I wrapped up in the buckskin. We
shall get nothing better to-morrow, boy, and we must
be secure of that.
Talking all the while, now with Tom, now with this
or that trooper beside him, Porgy continued, until,
ordering
silence, Singleton led his cavalcade forward to
a designated point, where the greater portion of the
partisans under their several leaders had already
assembled
.
Under that forest canopy, in that solemn starlight,
and amid waving torches and prancing steeds,
Marion
unfolded his plan, and briefly informed his men of
the condition of things, not only as they concerned the
colony, but as they concerned the confederation. He
read to them a resolve of congress, in which that body
had declared its determination to save each and every
province that had linked its fortunes with the federal
union, and particularly declared its resolution, in the
teeth of a report to this effect which the British and
tories had industriously circulated in South Carolina
and Georgia, not to sacrifice those two colonies to the
invader, on any terms of peace or compromise which
they might make with him. Such a resolve had
become
highly necessary; as the great currency given to
the rumour of such a compromise, and on these especial
terms, had produced, in part, the results which had been
desired. The patriots, drooping enough before, had
begun to despair entirely, while the tories were
encouraged
by it into perseverance, and stimulated to the
most adventurous and daring action. This readand
the formal resolution as it had been adopted by
congress was in his hand for the purposeMarion then
proceeded to recapitulate, not only the information
which he had been enabled to obtain of their own
army, but of that of their enemies. His information,
gathered from various sources, had been singularly
extensive
;
and while it taught his men the full extent of
the danger with which they were to contend, on all
hands, it also served greatly to increase their
confidence
in a commander, whose knowledge of passing
and remote events seemed intuitive; and whose
successes
had been so unbroken, though small, as to
inspire
in them a perfect assurance of his invincibility.
The military force of the British then in Carolina, was
distributed judiciously throughout its entire circuit.
The twenty-third and thirty-third regiments of
infantry
,
the volunteers of Ireland, the infantry of the legion,
(Tarleton's,) Brown's and Hamilton's corps, and a
detachment
of artillery under the command of Lord
Rawdon
,
hutted in, and about, the town of Camden. Major
McArthur with the 71st regiment was stationed at
Cheraw
,
near the Peedee region, covering the country
between Camden and Georgetown, and holding
continued
correspondence with the rank and thickly
settled
tory region of Cross Creek, North Carolina.
With the approach of the continentals, this regiment
had been ordered in, to a junction with himself, by
Rawdon; and they left the passage open for Marion
through the country where most of his warfare was to be
carried on. In Georgetown, a large force of provincials
was stationed. The chain of British military posts, to
the west of Camden, was connected with Ninety Six by
Rocky Mount, itself a strong post on the Wateree,
occupied
by Lieutenant-colonel Turnbull of the New-York
tory volunteers and militia. Lieutenant-colonel Balfour,
and subsequently Lieutenant-colonel Cruger,
commanded
at Ninety Six. The troops there consisted of
battallions
of Delancey's, Innis's, and Allen's provincial
regiments
,
with the 16th and three other companies of light
infantry. Major Ferguson's corps, with a large body of
tory militia, traversed the country between the Wateree
and the Saluda rivers, and sometimes stretched away
even to the borders of North Carolina.
Lieutenant-colonel
Brown held Augusta with a large force of British and
tories; Savannah was garrisoned by Hessians and
provincials
under Colonel Alured Clark; Charlestown
contained
the 7th, 63d, and 64th regiments of infantry, two
battalions of Hessians, a large detachment of the royal
artillery, and several corps of provincials under the
immediate
command of Brigadier-general Patterson. The
legion dragoons (Tarleton's) were employed in keeping
open the communication between the several
cantonments
.
In addition to these, there were the posts of Fort
Watson, Biggins' Church, Dorchester, and many others,
which, as the whole colony lay at the feet of the
conquerors
,
were maintained with small bodies of men,
chiefly as posts of rest, rather than of danger or defence.
[4]
[4]
Facts chiefly drawn from Tarleton.
See Memoirs
.
Having narrated, at full, the amount of the British
force distributed thus throughout the colony, Colonel
Marion did not scruple to present, without any
exaggeration
,
a true picture of the strength of that power
which was to meet and contend with it. He painted
to them the depressed condition of congress, the
difficulties
of Washington, and taught them how little was
to be looked for, in the shape of succour and assistance,
apart from that which he insisted was in their own
handsin their own firm determination, fearless
spirits
,
and always ready swords. I take up the sword,
gentlemen, said he, with a solemn vow, never to
lay it down, until my country, as a free country, shall
no longer need my services. I have informed myself
of all these difficulties and dangersthese inequalities
of numbers and experience between us and our
enemies
,
of which I have plainly told you. Having them
all before my own eyes, I have yet resolved to live or
die in the cause of my country, placing the risks and
privations of the war in full opposition to the honour and
the dutythe one which I may gather in her battles,
and the other which I owe to her in maintaining them
to the last. I have told you all that I know, in order
that each man may make his election as I have done.
I will urge no reasons why you should love and fight
for your country, as my own sense of honour and shame
would not suffer me to listen to any from another on
the same subject. Determine for yourselves without
P 2
argument from me. Let each man answer, singly,
whether he will go forward under my lead, or that of
any other officer that General Gates shall assign, or
whether he will now depart from our ranks, choosing a
station, henceforward, of neutrality, if such will be
allowed
him, or with the force of our enemy. Those
who determine with me, must be ready to depart
within
the hour, on the route to Lynch's creek, and to the
continental army.
The piercing black eye of Marion, darting around
the assembly at the conclusion of his speech, seemed
to look deep into the bosom of each soldier in his
presence. There was but a moment's pause when he
had concluded, before they gave a unanimous answer.
Could they have had other than one sentiment on such
an occasion? They had notand no single voice spoke
in hesitation or denial. It was a cheering, soul-felt
response.
We will all go!Marion for ever! and from the
rear came up the more familiar cry
Hurra for the Swamp Fox!let him take the track,
and we'll be after him.
A single bowa slight bend of the body, and brief
inclination of the headtestified their leader's
acknowledgment
;
and, after a few directions to Horry, he
ordered
the advance. With a calm look and
unchanging
position, he noted, with an individual and
particular
glance, each trooper as he filed past him. A small
select guard was left behind, who were to conduct the
women and children to the friendly whig settlement of
Williamsburg. They were to follow, after this, upon a
prescribed route, and meet with the main body at
Lynch's creek. An hour later, and the silence of the
grave was over the dim island in the swamp of the
Santee, so lately full of life and animation. The brands
were smoking, but no longer in blaze; and the
wildcat
might be seen prowling stealthily around the
encampment
which they had left, looking for the scraps
of the rustic feast partaken at their last supper by its
recent inmates.
A devilish good speech, said Porgy to Humphries,
as the latter rode beside him, a little after leaving the
islanda devilish good speech, and spoken like a
gentleman. No big words about liberty and death, but
all plain and to the point. Then there was no tricking
a fellowpersuading him to put his head into a rope
without showing him first how dd strong it was. I
like that, for now I can see the way before me. Give
me the leader that shows me the game I'm to play, and
the odds against me. In fighting, as in eating, I love
to keep my eyes open. Let them take in all the
danger
,
and all the dinner, that I may neither have too
little appetite for the one, nor too much for the other.
Ah, Porgy, said Humphries in reply, you will
have your joke though you die for it.
To be sure, old fellow, and why not? God help
me when I cease to laugh. When that day comes,
Humphries, look for an aching shoulder. I'm no trifle
to carry, and I take it for granted, Bill, for old
acquaintance'
sake, you'll lend a hand to lift a leg and
thigh of one that was once your friend. See me well
buried, my boy; and if you have time to write a line
or raise a headboard, you may congratulate death upon
making an acquaintance with one who was remarkably
intimate with life.
CHAPTER XIX.
Sound trumpetslet the coil be set aside
That now breaks in upon our conference.
Meanwhile, the hero of Saratogaa man who, at
that time, almost equally with Washington, divided the
good opinion of his countrymenarrived from Virginia
and took command of the southern army. The arrival
of Gates was a relief to the brave German soldier, De
Kalb, who previously had the command. The
situation
of the army was then most embarrassing. It lay
at Deep river, in the state of North Carolina, in a steril
country, filled either with lukewarm friends or
certain
enemies. The executive of the colony had done
but little to secure aid or co-operation for the
continentals
.
Provisions were procured with difficulty, and
the militia came in slowly, and in unimportant numbers.
The command of the state subsidy had been intrusted
to a Mr. Caswell, a gentleman without the qualities
which would make a good soldier, but with sufficient
pretension to make a confident one. He strove to
exercise an independent command, and, on various
pretences, kept away from a junction with De Kalb, in
whom his own distinct command must have been
merged. Even upon Gates's arrival, the emulous
militia-man
kept aloof until the junction was absolutely
unavoidable, and until its many advantages had been
almost entirely neutralized by the untimely delay in
effecting it. This junction at length took place on the
fifteenth day of August, nearly a month after Gates's
assumption of the general command.
A new hope sprang up in the bosoms of the
continentals
with the arrival of a commander already
so highly distinguished. His noble appearance, erect
person, majestic height and carriage, and the bold play
of his features, free, buoyant, and intelligent in the
extreme, were all calculated to confirm their sanguine
expectations. In the prime of life, bred to arms, and
having gone through several terms of service with
character and credit, every thing was expected by the
troops from their commander. Fortune, too, had almost
invariably smiled upon him; and his recent success at
Saratogaa success which justice insists should be
shared pretty evenly with Arnold, the traitor Arnold,
and others equally brave, but far more worthyhad
done greatly towards inspiriting his men with
assurances
,
which, it is not necessary now to say, proved
most illusory. Nor was De Kalb, to whom General
Gates intrusted the command of the Maryland division
of the army, including that also from Delaware,
without
his influence in the affections of the continentals.
He was a brave man, and had all his life been a soldier.
A German by birth, he was, in the service of the King
of France, a brigadier, when transferred to America
in the revolutionary struggle. Congress honoured him
with the commission of a major-general, and he did
honour to the trusthe perished in the execution of
its duties.
The command given to Gates was so far a shadowy
one. With the Maryland and Delaware regiments, it
consisted only of three companies of artillery under
the command of Lieutenant-colonel Carrington, which
had just joined from Virginia, and a small legionary
corps under Colonel Armand, a foreigner, of about sixty
cavalry and as many foot. But the general was not to
be discouraged by this show of weakness, though evident
enough to him at the outset. He joined the army on
the 25th July, was received with due ceremony by a
continental salute from the little park of artillery, and
received the command with due politeness from his
predecessor. He made his acknowledgments to the
baron with all the courtesy of a finished gentleman,
approved and confirmed his standing orders, and, this
done, to the surprise of all, gave the troops instructions
to hold themselves in readiness to move at a moment's
warning. This was an order which manifested the
activity of their commander's mind and character; but
it proved no little annoyance to the troops themselves,
who well knew their own condition. They were
without
rum or rationstheir foragers failed to secure
necessary supplies in sufficient quantityand nothing
but that high sense of military subordination which
distinguished the favourite line of continentals under
De Kalb's direction, could have prevented the open
utterance
of those discontents which they yet could not
help but feel. De Kalb ventured to remind Gates of
the difficulties of their situation. A smile, not more
polite than supercilious, accompanied the reply of the
too confident adventurer.
All this has been cared for, general. I have not
issued orders without duly considering their bearing,
and the unavoidable necessities they bring with them.
Wagons are on the road with all the articles you name
in sufficient quantity, and in a day or two these
discontents
will be all satisfied. Your line is not
refractory
,
I hope?
Never more docile, I beg your excellency to
believe
,
than now. The troops I command know that
subordination, not less than valour, is the duty of the
soldier. But human nature has its wants, and no small
part of my care is, that I know their sufferingnot from
their complaints, sir, for they say nothingbut from
my own knowledge of their true condition, and of what
their complaints might very well be.
It is wellthey will soon be relieved; and in order
to contribute actively to that end, it is decided that we
march to-morrow.
To-morrow, sir! Your excellency is aware that
this is impracticable unless we move with but one-half
of our baggage, for want of horses. Colonel Williams
has just reported a large deficiency.
With evident impatience, restrained somewhat by a
sense of politeness, Gates turned away from the baron
to Colonel Otho Williams, who was then approaching,
and put the question to him concerning the true
condition
of the army with regard to horses. The cheek
of the old veteran, De Kalb, grew to a yet deeper hue
than was its habitual wear, and his lips were
compressed
with painful effort as he heard the inquiry.
Williams confirmed the statement, and assured the
general, that not only a portion of the baggage, but a
portion of the artillery must be left under the same
deficiency in the event of a present movement.
And, how many field-pieces are thus unprovided,
Colonel Williams?
Two, sir, at least, and possibly more.
Gates strode away for a few moments, then
returning
quickly, as if in that time he had effected his
resolve
,
he exclaimed
They must be left: we shall do without them.
We must move to-morrow, gentlemen, without loss of
time, taking the route over Buffalo ford towards the
advance post of the enemy on Lynch's creek. We
shall find him there, I think.
Gates seemed to think that nothing more was
wanting
to success than finding his enemy, and his eye
looked the confident expectation of youth, unprepared
for, and entirely unthinking of, reverse. Flattered by
good fortune to the top of his bent, she now seemed
desirous of fooling him there: and his eye, lip, look,
and habitual action, seemed to say that it was now with
him only to see, to conquer. De Kalb turned away
sorrowfully in silence; but Colonel Williams, presuming
on large personal intimacy with the general, ventured
to expostulate with him upon the precipitate step
which he was about to take. He insisted upon the
necessity
of horse, not only for the baggage and artillery,
but for the purpose of mounting a large additional force
of the infantry, to act as cavalry along the route. But
Gates, taking him by the arm, smiled playfully to his
aide, as he replied
But what do we want with cavalry, Williams?we
had none at Saratoga.
Perhaps it would be safe to assert that the game
won at Saratoga was the true cause of the game lost
at Camden. The folly of such an answer was apparent
to all but the speaker. With a marked deference,
careful
not to offend, Williams suggested the radical
difference
between the two regions thus tacitly compared.
He did not dwell upon the irregular and broken
surface
of the ground at Saratoga, which rendered cavalry
next to useles,s and, indeed, perfectly unnecessary;
but he gave a true picture of the country through
which they were now to pass. By nature steril,
abounding
with sandy plains and swamps, thinly inhabited,
nothing but cavalry could possibly compass the extent
of ground over which it would be necessary that they
should go daily in order to secure provisions. He
proceeded
,
and described the settlers in the neighbourhood
as chiefly toriesanother name for a banditti the most
reckless and barbarous, who would harass his army
at every step, and seek safe cover in the swamps
whenever
he should turn upon them. Williams, who knew
the country, ably depicted its condition to his superior,
and with a degree of earnestness only warranted by
the friendship existing between them. It was,
nevertheless
,
far from agreeable to his hearer, who,
somewhat
peevishly, at length responded
Colonel Williams, we are to fight the enemy, you
will admit? He will not come to us, that is clear.
What next? We must go to him. We must pit the
cock on his own dunghill.
It will be well, general, if he doesn't
pit
us there.
Though we do seek to fight him, there's no need of
such an excess of civility as to give him his own choice
of ground for it; and permit me to suggest a route by
which we shall seek him out quite as effectually, I
think, and, with due regard to your already expressed
decision, on better terms for ourselves.
Proceed! was all the answer of Gates, who
began
whistling the popular air of Yankee Doodle, with
much
sang froid
, at intervals, even while his aide was
speaking. The brow of Williams grew slightly
contracted
for an instant; but well knowing the habits of
the speaker, and regarding much more the harmony of
the army and its prospect of success than his own
personal feelings, he calmly enough proceeded in his
suggestions. A rude map lay on the table before him,
on which he traced out the path which he now
counselled
his superior to take.
Here, sir, your excellency will see that a route
almost northwest would cross the Peedee river, at or
about the spot where it becomes the Yadkin: this
would lead us to the little town of Salisbury, where
the people are firm friends, and where the country all
around is fertile and abundant. This course, sir, has
the advantage of any other, not only as it promises us
plenty of provisions, but as it yields us an asylum for
the sick and wounded, in the event of a disaster,
either
in Mecklenburgh or Rowan counties, in both of
which our friends are stanch and powerful.
The suggestion of disaster provoked a scornful
smile to the lips of Gates, and he seemed about to
speak, but perceiving that Williams had not yet
concluded
,
he merely waved his hand to him to proceed.
Williams beheld the smile and its peculiar expression,
and his manly and ingenuous countenance was slightly
flushed as he surveyed it. His tall, graceful figure rose
to its full height, as he went on to designate the several
advantages offered to the army by the suggested route.
In this review were included, among other leading
objects
,
the establishment of a laboratory for the repair
of arms at Salisbury or Charlottea depot for the
security
of stores conveyed from the northward by the
upper routethe advantage which such a course gave
of turning the left of the enemy's outposts by a
circuitous
route, and the facility of reaching the most
considerable
among them, (Camden,) with friends always
in the rear, and with a river (the Wateree) on the
right. These and other suggestions were offered by
Williams, who, at the same time, begged to fortify his
own opinions by a reference to other and better
informed
gentlemen than himself on the subject. Gates,
who had heard him through with some impatience,
only qualified in its show by the manifest complacency
with which he contemplated his own project, turned
quietly around to him at the conclusion, and replied
briefly
All very well, Williams, and very wisebut we
must march now. To-morrow, when the troops shall
halt at noon, I will lay these matters, as you have
suggested
them, before the general officers.
Laying due stress upon the word general, he
effectually
conveyed the idea to the mind of Williams, that, though
he had received the suggestions of a friend and
intimate
,
he was not unwilling to rebuke the presumption
of the inferior officer aiming to give counsel. With a
melancholy shake of the head, De Kalb turned away,
jerking up the hips of his smallclothes, as he did so,
Vol. II.Q
with a sufficiently discontented movement. Williams
followed him from the presence of the infatuated
generalissimo
,
and all parties were soon busy in
preparation
for a start.
The next morning, the journey was begun; the
army
setting forth, unmurmuring, though without half
their baggage, and with no present prospect of
provisions
.
Gates, however, seemed assured of their
proximity
,
and cheered his officers, and through them, the men,
with his assurance. At noon they came to a halt, and
here they were joined by Colonel Walton, bearing
advices
from Marion, and bringing up his own skeleton corps,
which was incorporated with Colonel Dixon's regiment
of the North Carolina militia. The services of Walton,
as, indeed, had been anticipated by him, were
appropriated
at once by the general in his own family. No
conference
took place at this halt, as Gates had promised
Williams. After a brief delay, which the men employed
in ransacking their knapsacks for the scraps and
remnants
which they contained, the march was resumed:
the wagons with provisions not yet in sight, and their
scouts returning with no intelligence calculated for their
encouragement. The country through which their
journey
was to be taken, exceeded in sterility all the
representations
which had been made of it. But few
settlements
relieved, with an appearance of human life,
the monotonous originality of the wild nature around
them; and these, too, were commonly deserted by their
inhabitants on the appearance of the army. The
settlers
,
dividing on either side, had formed themselves
into
squads to plunder and prey upon the neighbouring and
more productive districts. They were Ishmaelites in
all their practices, and usually shrunk away from any
force larger than their own; conscious that power must
only bring them chastisement. The distresses of the
soldiery, on this sad and solitary march, increased with
every day in their progress. Still, none of the
provisions
and stores promised them by the general at their
outset, came to hand. In lieu of these, they had the
long perspective, full of promise, before them. There
was the Peedee river at hand, the banks of which
they were told, exceedingly fertile, held forth the
prospect
of abundance; but hour after hour came and
passed, without the realization of these promises. The
preceding crop of corn along the road had been long
since exhausted, and the new grain was yet in the fields,
unripened and unfit for use. But the necessity was
too peremptory, and not to be restrained. The
soldiery
plucked the immature ears, and boiling them with
the lean beef which herded in the contiguous swamps,
they provided themselves with all the food available in
that quarter. Green peaches were the substitute for
bread; and fashion, too, became a tributary to want, and
the hair powder so lavishly worn by all of the
respectable
classes at that period, was employed to thicken
the unsalted soups, for the more reserved appetites of
the officers. Such fare was productive of
consequences
the most annoying and enfeebling. The army was
one of shadows, weary and dispirited, long before it
came in sight of an enemy.
It was on the third day of August that the little
army
crossed the Peedee, in batteaux, at Mask's ferry,
and were met on the southern bank by
Lieutenant-colonel
Porterfield, of Virginia, with a lean
detachment
of troops which he had kept together with much
difficulty after the fall of Charlestown. A few hours
after, and while the army was enjoying its usual
noonday
halt, the little partisan corps of the Swamp Fox
rode into camp. His presence created some sensation,
for his own reputation had been for some time
spreading
;
but the miserable and wild appearance of his little
brigade, was the object of immense ridicule on the
part of the continentals. They are represented by
the historian as a most mirthful spectacle, all well
mounted, but in wretched attire, an odd assemblage of
men, and boys, and negroes, with little or no equipment,
and arms of the most strange and various assortment.
Colonel Marion was at once introduced to the marquee
of the general, but his troops remained exposed to the
unmeasured jest and laughter of the continentals. One
called them the crow-squad, from their sooty outsides;
this name another denied them, alleging, with a sorry
pun, that they had long since forgotten how to crow,
though they were evidently just from the dunghills.
A third, more classical, borrowed a passage from
Falstaff
,
and swore he should at once leave the army, as
he wouldn't march into Coventry with such scarecrows;
but a fourth said, that was the very reason that he
should stick to it, as Coventry was the only place for
them. The fierce low-country men did not bear this
long; and as they sauntered about among the several
groups which crowded curiously around them, sundry
little squabbles, only restrained by the hard efforts of the
officers, took place, and promised some difficulty
between
the parties. Our friend Porgy himself, though
withal remarkably good-natured, was greatly aroused
by the taunts and sarcasms uttered continually around
him. He replied to many of those that reached his
ears, and few were better able at retort than himself;
but his patience at length was overcome entirely, as,
among those engaged most earnestly in the merriment
at his expense, he heard the frequent and boisterous
jokes of Colonel Armand, a mercenary soldier, who, in
broken English, pressed rather rudely the assault upon
our friend Porgy's equipment in particular. Armand
was a man lean and attenuated, naturally; and his
recent
course of living had not materially contributed to
his personal bulk. Porgy eyed him with wholesale
contempt for a few moments, while the foreigner
blundered
out his bad grammar and worse English. At
length, tapping Armand upon the shoulder with the
utmost
coolness and familiarity, he drew his belt a
thought tighter around his waist, while he addressed
the foreigner.
Look you, my friendwith the body of a sapling,
you have the voice of a puncheon, and I like nothing
that's unnatural and artificial. I must reconcile these
extremes in your case, and there are two modes of
doing so. I must either increase your bulk or lessen
your voice. Perhaps it would be quite as well to do
both; the extremes meet always most readily: and by
reducing your voice, and increasing your bulk at the
same time, I shall be able to bring you to a natural and
healthy condition.
Vat you mean? demanded Armand, with a look
of mixed astonishment and indignation, as he drew
away from the familiar grasp which Porgy had taken
upon his shoulder.
I'll tell you: you don't seem to have had a dinner
for some time back. Your jaws are thin, your
complexion
mealy, and your bellywhat there is of itis
gaunt as a greyhound's. I'll help to replenish it.
Tom, bring out the hoecake and that bit of shoulder,
boy. You'll find it in the tin box, where I left it.
Now, my friend, wait for the negro; he'll be here in
short order, and I shall then assist you, as I said
before
,
to increase your body and diminish your voice:
the contrast is too great between themit is unnatural,
unbecoming, and must be remedied.
Armand, annoyed by the pertinacity, not less than
by the manner of Porgy, who, once aroused, now held
on to him all the while he spoke, soon ceased to laugh
as he had done previously; and, not understanding
one-half
of Porgy's speech, and at a loss how to take him,
for the gourmand was eminently good-natured in his
aspect
,
he repeated the question
Vat you sall say, my friend?
Tom's coming with ham and hoecakeboth good,
I assure you, for I have tried them within the hour;
you shall try them also. I mean first to feed youand
by that means increase your bulkand then to flog you,
and so diminish your voice. You have too little of
the one, and quite too much of the other.
A crowd had now collected about the two, of whom,
not the least ready and resolute were the men of
Marion
.
As soon as Armand could be made to understand
what was wanted of him, he drew back in unmeasured
indignation and dismay.
I shall fight wid de gentilmans and officer, not wid
you, sir, was his reply, with some show of dignity, to
Q 2
the application of Porgy. A hand was quietly laid on
his shoulder, and his eye turned to encounter the glance
of Major Singleton.
I am both, sir, and at your service, Colonel
Armand
,
in this very quarrel, though, in justice, you owe
the right to Mr. Porgy, who also seeks it. You waived
your rank when you ridiculed the private, and put
yourself
out of the protection of your epaulet.
Conceding
you the point, however, permit me to repeat, sir,
that I am at your service.
But, sare, vat you sall be name?
SingletonMajor Singleton, of the brigade of
Colonel
Marion, who will answer for my rank, as well as
for my honour.
But, sare, I sall not laugh at de gentilmans.
It matters notwill you compel me to disgrace you,
sir? was the stern reply.
The scene and disputation now grew exceedingly
warm, and the uproar reaching head-quarters, soon
brought out the commander-in-chief. By this time,
Armand's
corps had clustered about their commander, and
Singleton was surrounded, in like manner, by his own
little squad from the Cypress. Swords were already
drawn, and Humphries, Davis, and the rest, not
forgeting
Lance Frampton, with rifles and sabres ready, were
each facing some particular foe, when the stern voices
of the general officers called for silence, and the drum
rolled in obedience to their commands, calling the
several
squads to their appointed stations. The affray
was thus prevented, which, a moment before, seemed
inevitable. Such is military subordination. Gates, with
the leading officers, again returned to the conference,
which had been highly animated and important before
this interruption.
CHAPTER XX.
The evening clouds are thick with threat of storm;
The night grows wild: the waters champ and rave,
As if they clamoured for some destined prey.
The
reader will scarcely believe, knowing as he
does the great achievements of General Marion at the
South throughout the revolution, that his proffer of
service
on this occasion was not so agreeable to General
Gates. Yet so we have it, on the authority of history.
That gentleman partook largely of the spirit which
circulated so freely in his army; and the uncouth
accoutrements
,
the bare feet, and the tattered garments of
the motley assemblage of men and boys, half armed,
which the Swamp Fox had brought with him to do the
battles of liberty, provoked his risibility along with
that of his troops. The personal appearance of Marion
himself was as little in his favour. Diffident even
to shyness, there was little that was prepossessing in
his manners. He was awkward and embarrassed in
the presence of strangers: and though singularly cool
and collected with the necessity and the danger, he
was hardly the man to command the favourable
consideration
of a superficial judgeone of mediocre
ability, such as General Gates undoubtedly was. The
very contrast between them was enough for the latter.
Built, himself, on a superb scale, the movement, the look,
the deportment of Gates, all bespoke the conscious great
man. Marion, on the other hand, small in person, lame
of a leg, with a downcast eye, and hesitating manners,
was a cipher in the estimation of the more imposing
personage who looked upon him. And then the coarse
clothesthe odd mixture of what was once a uniform,
with such portions of his dress as necessity had
supplied
,
and which never could become soaltogether
offended
the nice taste of one rather solicitous than
otherwise
of the symmetries of fashion. Nothing, therefore,
but a well-regulated sense of politeness, formed closely
upon the models of foreign service, prevented the
generalissimo from laughing outright at the new
auxiliaries now proffered to his aid. But, though he
forbore to offend in this manner, he did not scruple to
lay before Marion his objections to the proposed
junction on this very ground. The shallow mind could
not see that the very poverty, the miserably clad and
armed condition of Marion's men, were the best pledges
that could be given for their fidelity. Why should
they fight in rags for a desperate cause, without pay
or promise, but that a high sense of honour and of
country was the impelling principle? The truth must
be spoken: and the Partisan of Carolina, the very
stay of its hope for so long a seasonhe who, more
than any other man, had done so much towards keeping
alive the fires of liberty and courage there, until they
grew into a bright, extending, unquenchable flame
was very civilly bowed out of the army, and sent
back to his swamps upon a service almost nominal.
Our force is sufficient, my dear colonel, was the
conclusion of the generalquite sufficient; and you
can give us little if any aid by direct co-operation.
Something you may do, indeedyesby keeping to
the swamps, and furnishing us occasional intelligence
picking off the foragers, and breaking up the
communications
.
My men are true, your excellency, was the calm
reply; they desire to serve their country. It is the
general opinion that you will need all the aid that the
militia of the state can afford.
The general opinion, my dear colonel, errs in this,
as it does in the majority of other cases. We shall
have a force adequate to our objects quite as soon as
a junction can be formed with Major-general Caswell.
Could you procure arms, and the necessary equipments,
and attach your force with his
I understand your excellency, was the simple
answer
,
as Gates hinted his true objections in the last
sentence; but, save the slight compression of his lips,
usually parted otherwise, no trace of emotion besides,
followed upon the countenance of the speaker.
My men, he continued, are, some of them, of
the very best families in the country, homeless now,
and robbed of all by their enemies. They are not
the men to fight less earnestly on that account, nor will
their poverty and rags hinder them from striking a good
blow, when occasion serves, against the invader to
whom they owe them.
Gates was sufficiently a tactician to see that the pride
of Marion was touched with the unjust estimate which
had been made of his men, and he strove to remove
the impression by a show of frankness.
But, you see, my dear colonel, that though your
men may fight like very devils, nothing can possibly
keep the continentals from laughing at them. We
can't supply your people; and so long as they remain
as they are, so long will they be a laughing stockso
long will there be uproar and insubordination. We are
quite too delicately situated now to risk any thing with
the army; we are too nigh the enemy, and they have
been too stinted. To deny them to laugh, is to force
them to rebel; we can only remove the cause of
laughter
,
and, in this way, defeat the insubordination which
undue merriment, sternly and suddenly checked, would
certainly bring about.
Gates had made the best of his case, and Marion,
with few words, obeyed the opinion, from which,
however
,
he mentally withheld all his assent. He contented
himself, simply, with stating his own, and the desire of
his men, to serve the country by active operation in the
best possible way. Gates replied to this in a manner
sufficiently annoying to his hearer, but which had
subsequently
its own adequate rebuke.
Any increase of force, my dear colonel, would be
perfectly unnecessary after my junction with the troops
I daily look for. Caswell will bring me all the North
Carolina subsidies, and General Stevens, with a strong
body of Virginians, will join in a few days. My force
then will be little short of seven thousand men, and
quite sufficient for all contemplated purposes. We
shall therefore need no aid from your men.
I hope not, general; though should you, my men
are always ready to offer it for their country. Have I
your excellency's permission to retire?
You have, Colonel Marion; but I trust you will
still continue operations on the Peedee and the Santee
rivers. One service, if you will permit me, I will
require
at your hands; and that is, that you will employ
your men in breaking up all the boats which you can
possibly find at the several crossing places on the
Watereeat Nelson's and Vance's ferries in
particular
.
We must not let my Lord Rawdon escape us.
It was now Marion's turn to smile, and his dark eye
kindled with an arch and lustrous expression as he heard
of the anticipated victory. He well knew that Rawdon
could not and would not endeavour to retreat. Such a
movement would have at once lost him the country. It
would have stimulated the dormant hopes of all the
people
.
It would have crushed the tories, by withdrawing
the army whose presence had been their prop. It would
have destroyed all the immense labours, at one swoop,
by which the invader had sought, not only to realize,
but to secure his power. The weakness of Gates
amused the partisan, and the smile upon his lips was
irrepressible. But the self-complaisance of the
general
did not suffer him to behold it; and, concluding his
wishes and his compliments at the same time, he bowed
the Swamp Fox out of the marquee, and left him to the
attention of the old baron, De Kalb.
[5]
[5]
For much of the authority on which these sketches are founded,
see the narrative of Otho Williams, Lee's memoirs, and the general
history of these events. In this imaginative biography, I have been
careful to colour only according to what is known. A just regard to
verisimilitude is as much the object of romance as of history.
The veteran
was gloomy, and did not scruple to pour his
melancholy
forebodings into the ears of Marion, for whom
he had conceived a liking. At parting, he ventured a
smile, however, as he reminded him of the employment
which Gates had assigned him in the destruction of the
boats.
You need not hurry to its execution, my friend, said
he; it is a sad waste of property, and, if my thoughts
do not greatly wander, I fear an unnecessary waste.
But God cheer us, and his blessing be upon you.
They partednever to meet again. The partisan
led his rejected warriors back in the direction of his
swamp dwelling, on the Santee, while the old veteran
went back with a heavy heart to his duties in the camp.
In an hour, the onward march was again
resumed
.
The troops went forward with more alacrity,
as they had that day feasted with more satisfaction to
themselves than on many days previous. A small
supply of Indian meal had been brought into camp by
the foragers, and produced quite a sensation. This
gave a mess to all; and the impoverished beef, which,
hitherto, they had eaten either alone or with unripe fruit,
boiled along with it, grew particularly palatable. With
all the elasticity which belongs to soldiers, they forgot
past privations, and hurried on, under the promise of
improving circumstances at every step of their farther
progress. This spirit was the more increased, as the
commanding officer, aware of the critical situation of
the troops, unfolded himself more freely than he had
hitherto done to Colonel Williams, who acted as deputy
adjutant-general.
[6]
[6]
See Otho Williams's Narrative
The show of confidence operated
favourably on the troops, who were at a loss to know
why General Gates, against all counsel, had taken the
present route. He said it had been forced upon him;
that his object was to unite with Caswell; that
Caswell
had evaded every order to join with him; that
Caswell's
vanity desired a separate command, and that he
probably contemplated some enterprise by which to
distinguish himself.
I should not be sorry, said he, to see his ambi
tion checked by a rap over the knuckles, if it were not
that the militia would disperse and leave this handful
of brave men (meaning the continentals) without even
nominal assistance.
[7]
[7]
The recorded language of Gates on the occasion. These
considerations
,
pro and con, are almost entirely historical.
He urged that the route was taken to counteract the
risks of Caswell, by forcing him to the junction he
seemed so desirous to avoid; and, at the same time, to
secure some of the supplies of provisions and other
necessaries, which he asserted, on the alleged authority
of the executive of North Carolina, were even then
in the greatest profusion in Caswell's camp. He
moreover
suggested that a change of direction now would
not only dispirit the troops, but intimidate the people
of the country, who had generally sent in their
submissions
as he passed, promising to join him under
their own leaders. These were the arguments of
Gates; and whatever may be their value, he should
have the benefit of them in his defence. To these
were opposed, in vain, the poverty and destitution of
the country, and the perfidious character of the people
along the route they pursued. The die was cast,
however
,
and the army went forward to destruction. But
we will not anticipate.
On the fifth of August, in the afternoon, General
Gates received a letter from Caswell, notifying him of
an attack which he meditated upon a post of the
British
,
on Lynch's creek, about fourteen miles from the
militia encampment. This increased the anxiety of
Gates, who urged forward the regulars. While urging
them still upon the ensuing day, a new despatch was
received from the general of militia, stating his
apprehensions
of an attack from the very post which, the
day before, he had himself meditated to assault. Such
a strange mixture of boldness and timidity alarmed
Gates even for his safety; and he now hurried forward,
to relieve him from himself, with more rapidity than
ever. On the seventh of August, by dint of forced
marching, he attained his object, and the long-delayed
junction was safely effected, at the Cross Roads, about
fifteen miles east of the enemy's most advanced post
on Lynch's creek. The army was soon refreshed;
every thing was in plenty: and amid the greatest
confusion
,
and in spite of all his difficulties, Caswell had
contrived to keep a constant supply of wines, and other
luxuries on hand, with which the half-famished
continentals
were pleasantly regaled. After the junction,
which occurred about noon in the day, the army
marched a few miles towards the enemy's station. On
the next day, pressing forward to the post, they found
the field their own; the enemy had evacuated it, and
returned back, at his leisure, to a much stronger
position
on Little Lynch's creek, and within a day's march
of the main post of Camden, where Rawdon
commanded
in person, with a force already strong, and hourly
increasing from a judicious contraction of the minor
posts around him, which he effected, with the approach
of the continentals.
Still, the army pressed forward, in obedience to
command
,
ignorant of its course, and totally unconscious
of the next step to be taken. The commander,
however
,
began to take his precautions, as he saw the
danger
of approaching an enemy encumbered as he now
was with unnecessary baggage, and the large numbers
of women and children, whom he had found with
Caswell's
militia. Wagons were detached to convey the
heavy baggage, and such women as could be driven
away, to a place of safety near Charlotte; but large
numbers of them preferred remaining with the troops,
sharing all their dangers, and partaking of their
privations
.
Exhortations and menace alike failed of effect;
they positively refused to leave the army on any terms.
Relieved, however, of much of his encumbrance, Gates
proceeded to the post on Little Lynch's creek, to
which the enemy had retired. Here he found him
strongly posted. He was in cover, on a rising ground,
on the south side of the Wateree; the way leading to
it was over a causeway to a wooden bridge which
stood on the north side, resting upon very steep banks.
Vol. II.R
The creek lay in a deep, muddy channel, bounded on
the north by an extensive swamp, and only passable
(except by a circuit of several miles) directly in front
of the enemy.
To attack him in face, would be taking the bull by
the horns, indeed, was the concluding remark of
Gates, as he reviewed the position and examined his
intelligence. We'll go round himand, for the first
time, the commander prepared to take the least direct
road to the enemy. Defiling by the right, having
cautiously
thrown out a flanking regiment under Colonel
Hall, of Maryland, the army pushed on by a circuitous
course towards Rawdon. This movement had the
effect of breaking up the minor post of the enemy
which Gates had been compelled to avoid, and its
commanding
officer, with some precipitation, fell back with
all his garrison upon Camden. The post at Clermont,
Rugely's Mills, was also abandoned at the same time;
and, on the thirteenth of August, it was occupied by the
American general with his jaded army.
The movements of Gates had been closely watched
by the enemy, who was vigilant in the extreme. The
precautions taken by Rawdon, who, up to this moment,
had been opposed to him, were judicious and timely.
But the command was now to be delivered into yet
abler hands; for, with the first account of the
proximity
of the southern army, Cornwallis, with a portion
of the garrison from Charlestown, set forth for Camden.
His march communicated, like wildfire, the business of
his mission to the people of the country through which
he was to pass; and it was with feelings in nowise
enviable
,
that he saw the exulting looks of the disaffected
whenever they met with him on his progress. At
Dorchester
,
where he paused a day, and by his presence
controlled somewhat the restless spirit of those in that
quarter, who, otherwise, were willing enough to rise in
mutiny, he could almost hear the muttered rebellion
as it rose involuntarily to the lips of many. Standing
lustily in his doorway as the glittering regiments went
through the village, old Pryor growled out his hope for
their destruction.
Ay, go! ye glitter now, and look dn fine, but
Gates will roll your red jackets in the mud. He'll
give you a dressing, my lads, ye shall remember. Ay,
shake your flags, and beat your drums, but you'll have
another guess sort of shake and tune when you're
coming
back.
The stern and lofty earl, erect and tall, inflexible and
thoughtful, moved along upon his steed like some
massive
tower, before the dwelling of the sturdy rebel; who,
uttering no shout, waving no hat, giving no sign but
that of scornful hate, and a most bitter contempt, gazed
upon the warrior without fear or shrinking.
Go, dn you, go; go where the drum that beats
for you shall be muffled; go where the bugle that rings
in your ears shall not stir you again in your saddles;
go where the rifle shall have a better mark in your
bodies than it ever found at Bunker's and at Lexington.
And as he muttered thus, his old eye rekindled, and
he watched the last retreating forms in the distance,
repeating to himself the fond hope, which was then a
pregnant sentiment in the bosom of thousands, who
had felt long, when they could not resent, and now
rejoiced in the belief, confidently entertained, that their
enemies had gone to a battle-field from whence they
never would return. The hour of punishment was at
hand, so they fondly thought, and Gates's was the
avenging
arm sent for its infliction.
On the night of the fifteenth of August, without any
conference with his officers, Gates bade his army
advance
from Clermont on the route to Camden. What
was his hope? What, indeed, we may well ask, was
his object? He literally had no intelligence; he had
omitted many of those precautions by which, in armies,
intelligence was to be procured. The suggestions of
his own friends were unheeded, and he deigned no
general consultation. Colonels Williams and Walton,
both ventured to remind him in general terms of the near
neighbourhood of the foe, doubtless in force; for, on
the subject of their numbers, no information had yet
been received. On the same day, an inhabitant from
Camden, named Hughson, came to head-quarters,
affecting
ignorance of the approach of the Americans,
and pretending a warm interest in their success. He
was a Marylander, and was disposed to be very friendly
with his countrymen, the continentals. He freely gave
his information to Gatesinformation which was true,
so far as it went; but which was given in just
sufficient
quantity to promote the precipitation of the
American
commander and the purposes of the British.
Gates readily believed all that was told him; and though
suspicions arose in the minds of some of the officers
around him, the credulity of the general underwent no
arraignment, and the spy was actually suffered to leave
the camp and return to Camden, not only with the
fulfilment
of the purpose for which he went, but
possessed
of the more valuable information with which he
was permitted to return. Besotted self-confidence had
actually blinded the American general to the huge and
fearful trench which he had been digging for himself,
and which now lay immediately before him.
A few hours only divided him from his enemy; yet,
strange to say, he knew not that it was Cornwallis who
stood opposed to him. That brave commander had
hurried with all possible celerity to the scene of action.
He knew how greatly the fortunes of the colony
depended
upon the present contest. Marion was even
then busy along the Santee, and so effectually did he
guard the passes by Nelson's and Watson's, that his
lordship, though commanding a fine body of troops,
veterans all, fresh from Charlestown, and superior
far to any force of the partisan, was compelled to take
a circuitous and indirect route in reaching Camden.
Marion had greatly increased his force with a number
of insurgents from Black river. Sumter, too, was in
active motion, and watched the Wateree river with the
avidity of a hawk. On the success of this battle
depended
every thing; for, though to gain it would not
necessarily have secured the conquest of Cornwallis
in Carolina, not to gain it would most probably have
been the loss of all. He knew this, and his desire
was for early battle before the troops of Gates were
rested; before the militia could come in to his relief;
and before the spirit of revolt, throughout the province,
should distract, by concerted and simultaneous
operation
.
No general was ever more ready than Cornwallis
to carve his way out of difficulties with the strong arm
and the sword. Policy, and his desire alike, persuaded
him now to the adoption of this stern arbitrament.
At the very hour that Gates moved from Clermont
in the route to Camden, the British general set out
from that station to attack him in his encampment.
Yet Gates had no intelligence of this: he knew not
even that his lordship was in Camden. He neglected
every means of intelligence, and the retributive justice,
which, in one moment, withered all the choice laurels
of his previous fame, and tore the green honours from
his brow, though stern and dreadful, must yet be held
the just due of him, who, with a leading responsibility
of life, freedom, and fortune depending upon him,
forfeits
,
by the feebleness of a rash spirit, all the rich
triumphs
that are otherwise within his grasp. Vainly
has the historian striven after arguments in his excuse.
He is without defence; and in reviewing all the events
of this period, we must convict him of headstrong
self-confidence
,
temerity without coolness, and effort, idly
expended, without a purpose, and almost without an
aim. It was the opinion of his officers, and, indeed, of
all others, that the delay of a few days, with his army
in a secure position, was all that was necessary towards
giving the American an immense superiority over the
British commander. Provisions would have been
plenty in that time, and the native militia, once
satisfied
of his presence, would have crowded to his camp.
But the fates were impatient for their prey, and he
whom God has once appointed for destruction, may well
fold his robes about him in preparation for his fall.
R 2
CHAPTER XXI.
And the deep pause that ushers in the storm,
More fearful than its presence, thrills us now
This silence is the voice that speaks it nigh.
The
American general at last began to exhibit some
consciousness of the near neighbourhood of foes; and
that day, the 15th August, after general orders, he
prepared
the following in additionColonel Williams,
acting
adjutant-general, Colonel Walton, and one other
member of his family being present:
1. The sick, the extra artillery stores, the heavy
baggage, and such quarter-master's stores as are not
immediately wanted, to march this evening, under a
strong guard, to Waxsaw. To this order the general
requests the brigadier-generals to see that those under
their command pay the most exact and scrupulous
obedience.
2. Lieutenant-colonel Edmonds, with the
remaining
guns of the park, will take post and march with
the Virginia brigade under General Stevens. He will
direct, as any deficiency may happen in the artillery
affixed to the other brigade, to supply it immediately.
His military staff, and a proportion of his officers, with
forty of his men, are to attend him and await his
orders.
3. The troops will be ready to march precisely at
ten o'clock, in the following order, viz:
Colonel Armand's advancecavalry commanded by
Colonel Armand; Colonel Porterfield's light infantry
upon the right flank of Colonel Armand, in Indian file,
two hundred yards from the road; Major Armstrong's
light infantry in the same order as Colonel
Porterfield's
,
upon the left flank of the legion.
Advance-guard of foot; composed of the
advance-pickets
,
first brigade of Maryland, second brigade of
Maryland, division of North Carolina, division of
Virginia
;
rear-guardvolunteer cavalry upon the flank of
the baggage, equally divided.
In this order the troops will proceed on their march
this night.
4. In case of an attack by the enemy's cavalry in
front, the light infantry upon each flank will instantly
move up, and give, and continue, the most galling fire
upon the enemy's horse. This will enable Colonel
Armand, not only to support the shock of the enemy's
charge, but finally to rout him. The colonel will
therefore consider the order to stand the attack of the
enemy's cavalry, be their number what it may, as
positive.
5. General Stevens will immediately order one
captain, two lieutenants, one ensign, three sergeants,
one drum, and sixty rank and file, to join Colonel
Porterfield's
infantry. These are to be taken from the most
experienced woodsmen, and men every way fittest for
the service.
6. General Caswell will likewise complete Major
Armstrong's light infantry to their original number.
These must be marched immediately to the advanced
post of the army.
The troops will observe the profoundest silence
upon the march, and any soldier who offers to fire
without
the command of his officer, must instantly be put
to death.
When the ground will admit of it, and the near
approach of the enemy renders it necessary, the army
will, when ordered, march in columns.
The artillery at the head of their respective
brigades
,
and the baggage in the rear. The guard of the
heavy baggage will be composed of the remaining
officers
and soldiers of the artillery, one captain, two
subalterns, four sergeants, one drum, and sixty rank
and file, &c.
The tents of the whole army are to be struck at
tattoo.
Such were the general orders for the march.
Colonel
Williams the adjutant-general, Colonel Walton,
and Major Thomas Pinckney, were in conversation at
the entrance of the general's marquee, when, with a
smiling and good-natured countenance, he brought
the paper forth, and called for the adjutant-general's
attention
.
Colonel Williams, you will be punctual in the
transmission of these orders to the several commands,
so that there be no delay. Look also at this estimate,
which has been made this morning of the entire force,
rank and file, of the army. It would seem to be
correct
.
Williams took the paper, and glanced rapidly over
the estimate, which startled him by its gross
exaggerations
.
Correct, sir! he exclaimed, with unfeigned
astonishment
;
impossible! Seven thousand men!
there are not five thousand fit for duty.
You will see, and report on this, said the general,
coolly, and at once turned away to the tent, in which,
a moment after, he was lost from sight.
Pinckney, said Williams, come and assist me
in this estimate. Colonel Walton will keep in
attendance
you
will not be wanted.
The gallant young soldier, then a tall, fresh, and
vigorous youth, noble, and accomplished as were few
native Americans at that period, immediately complied
with the request, and the two moved away upon the
contemplated mission. Availing himself of his orders,
which were to bid all the general officers to a council
in Rugely's barn, Williams called also upon the officers
commanding corps for a field return. This he required
to be as exact as possible; and as neither himself nor
Pinckney was required to attend the deliberations,
they devoted themselves to a careful abstract of the
true force of the army for the general's better
information
.
This was presented to him as soon as the
council had broken up, and just as the general was
coming out of the door, where Williams and his aids
awaited him. He took the paper, and with clouding
brows examined its contents.
How! what is this? what is this figure, Colonel
Williams? he inquired, dashing his forefinger hurriedly
upon the paper.
A three, sir, was the reply.
A three! And you mean to say that there are only
three thousand and fifty-two, rank and file, fit for duty?
I do, your excellencyscarce a man more.
Impossible! There were no less than thirteen
general
officers in council, and our estimate gave not a
man less than seven thousand, rank and file.
Your estimate of the general officers is correct
enough, sir, said Williams, firmly, but mine of the
men is not less so. The disparity between officers
and men, in our battles, continued the speaker,
innocently
enough, has always been rather remarkable.
A quick motion of Gates's head, a sudden shooting
glance of his eye, intimated his own perception of the
sarcasm, and apprised Williams, for the first time, of
the equivocal character of his remark. His cheeks
grew to scarlet, as he perceived its force, and his
confusion
would have been evident to his superior, but
that the general relieved him by turning away, with
the paper crumpled up in his hands, simply remarking,
as he left them
Three thousandthat is certainly below the
estimate
of the morning; but they are enoughenough for
our purpose.
Williams longed to ask him what that purpose was,
but prudence restrained him. The only farther remark
of Gates on the subject was uttered as he was retiring
You have delivered the orders, sir?see them
obeyed. There was no dissent from them in council.
True it is that there had been no dissent from them
in council; but they were scarcely submitted for
examination
.
There had been no consultation, and their
promulgation out of council, at once provoked the most
unrestrained animadversion. The officers generally
insisted that all opinion or discussion had been
silenced
by the very positive terms in which the orders
had been expressed; and, indeed, there could have been
little doubt, from all the context, that General Gates
did not conceive it necessary that any reference should
be made to the opinions of those around him. The
council was the pure creature of a certain sense of
military propriety, and was yielded by Gates rather to
general notions of what was due to courtesy, than what
was necessary to the great cause and deep interests in
which he was engaged. The elder officers said little
when the orders were conveyed to them. The old
Baron De Kalb, presuming on his age and services,
however
,
and the usual respect with which Gates had treated
him hitherto, sought an interview with him, which was
not denied. He suggested to him the diminished force
of the army, so infinitely inferior, as it was found to be,
to the estimate which had been made of it in the
morning
.
This he held a sufficient reason for changing the
present resolution for one less hazardous. There was
another, and more forcible reason yet.
Two-thirds of our army, your excellency is aware,
are militiamen who have never yet seen service, and
have scarce been exercised in arms together.
True, baron, but that is an argument against using
them at any period. They must begin sometime or
other.
Yes, your excellency; but our first experiments
with them should be easy ones. By these orders, we
are not only to march them, but to require them to form
column, and to manuvre, by night, in the face of an
enemy, and probably under his fire. This is the work
of veterans only.
The danger seems to increase in magnitude, baron;
does it not?
The old soldier drew himself up in dignityhis
manly person, no longer bowed or bent, his fine blue
eye flashing, and his cheek reddening as he spoke:
he replied
I know not what your excellency's remark may
mean; but in regard to the greatness or the littleness
of the danger, I who have been forty years a trusted
soldier of the King of France, should care but little to
encounter it. Were the question one affecting my
life only, it were easily answered: I came to fight the
battles of your country, sir, and am prepared, at all
hours, to die in them.
The rebuke had its effect upon the commander,
though he did not acknowledge it. His self-esteem
was too great for that. Nor did he allow the
suggestions
of the baron to have any weight upon his
previous
determinations. With a commonplace compliment,
the conference was closed, and De Kalb went back to
his command, doubtful, pained, and justly offended. In
camp, the dissatisfaction had rather subsided, with the
single exception, among the officers, of Colonel Armand.
He took exception to the positive orders concerning
himself, as implying a doubt of his courage; at the
same time he objected to the placing of his cavalry in
front of a line of battlecertainly a very injudicious
order, particularly as the legion of Armand was most
heterogeneous in its formation, and such a disposition
of cavalry had never been made before. He
complained
that Gates had placed him there from
resentment
,
on account of a previous dispute between them
touching the use of horses.
I do not say, said he, in broken English, that
General Gates intends to sacrifice us; but I do say,
that if such were his intentions, these are just the steps
which he should take for it.
Still, however, as it was not known that the enemy
was positively in force before them, all the parties grew
more satisfied, after a while, to proceed; and the army
moved on accordingly at the appointed hour.
The two armies met at midnight. They first felt
each other through the mutual salutation of small-arms,
between their several advance-guards. The cavalry of
Armand's legion were the first to reel in the
unexpected
contest. They recoiled, and in their retreat,
flying confusedly, threw the whole corps into disorder.
This, with a similar recoil, fell back upon the front
column of infantry, disordered the first Maryland brigade,
and occasioned a momentary consternation throughout
the entire line of advance. But Colonel Porterfield
advanced from the wing agreeable to first orders, threw
in a prompt fire upon the British van, and gallantly
cheering as they advanced, restored the general
confidence
.
The British, seemingly no less astounded
than the Americans, fell back after the first shock, and
both parties seemed to acquiesce in a suspension of all
further hostilities for the night. Prisoners were taken
on both sides, in this rencontre, and the intelligence
gained by those brought into the American camp, was
productive of a degree of astonishment in General
Gates's mind, which found its way to his countenance.
He called a council of war instantly. When the
adjutant-general
communicated the call to De Kalb, the
old veteran's opinion may be gathered from the
response
which he made to that officer
Has the general given you orders to retreat the
army, Colonel Williams?
He has not, was the answer.
I will be with you in a moment, then, but will first
burn my papers; a duty which he did in a short
time after, with scrupulous promptitude.
Assembled in the rear of the army, General Gates
communicated the intelligence obtained from the
prisoners
just taken; then, for the first time, proposed a
question, implying some little hesitation on the subject
of future operations.
What now is to be done, gentlemen?
For a few moments all were silent, until General
Stevens of the Virginians, after looking round for
some other to speak, advanced in front of the
commander
,
and put his own answer in the form of a new
inquiry.
Is it not too late,
now
, gentlemen, to do any thing
but fight?
Another pause ensued, which, as it seemed to give
assent to the last words of Stevens, General Gates
himself interrupted
Then we must fight: gentlemen, be pleased to
resume
your posts.
They moved to their stations with the promptness
of the soldier, but with the thoughts and feelings of
men, who could not approve of what had been done,
and who had nothing consoling in the prospect before
them. Gates moved hurriedly for several moments up
and down the little tent which had been raised for
him within the hour. His manner was subdued, but
cool. Once or twice he looked forth from its cover with
an air of anxiety, then turning to Williams, and the
aids in attendance, he remarked
This is a quiet night, gentlemen, but it promises to
be a tedious one. What is the time, Colonel Walton?
A little after one, sir, was the reply.
You may leave me for an hour, gentlemenonly
an hour; we must prepare for daylight.
Walton and Major Pinckney, together, strolled away,
not requiring repose. The thought of Colonel Walton
was with his childthe onethe one onlywho could
fill his heartwho could inspire painful anxiety, at that
moment, in his mind. How fervent were his prayers
in that hour for her safety, whatever fate, in the
coming
events of the daylight, might award to him!
CHAPTER XXII.
Then came the cloud, the arrowy storm of war,
The fatal stroke, the wild and whizzing shot,
Seeking a victimthe close strife, the groan,
And the shrill cry of writhing agony.
If
every thing was doubtful and uncertain in the
camp of Gates, the state of things was very different
in that of Cornwallis. That able commander knew
his ground, his own men, and the confidence and the
weakness alike of his enemy. That weakness, that
Vol. II.S
unhappy confidence, were his security and strength.
His own force numbered little over two thousand men;
but they were tried soldiers, veterans in the British
southern army, and familiar with their officers. The
troops of Gatestwo-thirds of them at leasthad
never once seen service; and the greater number only
now for the first time knew and beheld their commander.
They had heard of his renown, however, and this
secured their confidence. It had an effect far more
dangerous upon his officers; for, if it did not secure
their confidence also, it made them scrupulous in their
suggestions of counsel to one who, from the outset,
seemed to have gone forth with the determination of
rivalling the rapidity, as well as the immensity, of
Csar's victories. To come, to see, to conquer, was
the aim of Gates; forgetting, that while Csar
commanded
the Roman legion, Horatio Gates was required
first to teach the American militia. Cornwallis seems
perfectly to have understood his man. They are said
to have once seen foreign service together; if so, the
earl had studied him with no little success. He now
availed himself of the rashness of his opponent, and,
though inferior in numbers, went forth to meet him.
We have seen their first encounter, where Gates,
contrary
to the advice of his best officers, commenced a
march after nightfall, requiring of undrilled militia the
most novel and difficult evolutions in the dark.
Having
felt his enemy, and perceived, from the weight of
Colonel Porterfield's infantry fire, that the whole force
of the Americans was at hand, Cornwallis drew in his
army, which had been in marching order when the
encounter began; and changing his line to suit the
new form of events, proceeded to make other
arrangements
for the dawning.
The firing still continued, in the advance, though
materially diminished and still diminishing, when
Cornwallis
gave the orders to recall his forces. The order
was a timely one. In that moment, the advance of
Porterfield had pressed heavily upon the British van,
and was driving it before them. The mutual orders
of the two generals, both dreading to risk the
controversy
on a struggle so unexpectedly begun, closed the
affair for the night. Dismounting beneath a clump of
trees, Cornwallis called around him a council of his
officers. The tall, portly form of the earl rose loftily
in the midst of all, with a cool, quiet dignity, that
indicated
command. His face was one of much
expression
,
and spoke a character of great firmness and quick
resolve. His features were bold and imposing; his
cheeks full and broad, nose prominent, forehead rather
broad than high, his lips not thin, but closely fitting.
His eye had in it just enough of the kindling of battle
to enliven features which otherwise would have
appeared
more imperious than intelligent. His carriage
was manly, and marked by all the ease of the courtier.
Standing erect, with his hand lightly resting on the hilt
of his sword, and looking earnestly around him on his
several officers as they made their appearancea
dozen lightwood torches flaming in the hands of the
guards around himhis presence was majestic and
noble. Yet there was a something in his features
which, if not sanguinary, at least indicated well that
indifference to human life, that reckless hardihood of
atrocity, which marked too many of his doings in the
South. His looks did not belie that callosity of soul
which could doom his fellow-men, by dozens, to the
gallowsthe accusation unproven against them, and
their own defence utterly unheard.
Beside him, conspicuous, though neither tall nor
commanding in person, stood one to whom the
references
of Cornwallis were made with a degree of
familiarity
not often manifested by the commander. His
person was of the middle size, rather slender than full,
but of figure well made, admirably set, and in its
movements
marked alike by ease and strength. He was
muscular and bonythough not enough so to command
particular attention on this account. The face alone
spoke, and it was a face to be remembered. It was
rather pale and thin, but well chiselled; and the mouth
was particularly small and beautiful. Its expression was
girlish in the extreme, and would have been held to
indicate
effeminacy as the characteristic of its owner,
but for its even quiet, its immobility, its calm
indifference
of expression. The nose was good, but
neither
long nor large: it comported well with the
expression
of the mouth. But it was the eye that spoke; and
its slightest look was earnestness. Every glance
seemed sent forth upon some especial missionevery
look had its object. Its movements, unlike those of
the lips, were rapid and ranging. His hair was light
and unpowdered; worn, singularly enough at that
period
,
without the usual tie, and entirely free from the
vile pomatum which disfigured the fashionable heads
of the upper classes. His steel cap and waving plume
were carried in his hand; and he stood, silent and
observing
,
beside Cornwallis, as Lord Rawdon, followed by
the brave Lieutenant-colonel Webster, and other officers,
came up to the conference. The warrior we have
endeavoured briefly to describe, was one whose name
had its own particular terror in the ears of the
Southrons
in that region and reign of terror. He was the
notorious
Colonel Tarleton, the very wing of the British
invading army: one, striking and commanding in
aspect
,
gentle and dignified in deportment, calm and even
in his general temper; but fierce and forward in war,
sanguinary in victory, delighting in blood, and impatient
always until he could behold it flowing.
Webster, equally, if not more brave than Tarleton, and
certainly a far better officer, bore a better character in
the southern warfare. His worth to his own army was
equally great, and there is no such odium coupled with
his exploits as shaded and stained the very best of
Tarleton's. His celebrity with the one never obtained
for him any unhappy notoriety with the other.
The enemy is in force before us, gentlemenso
our prisoners tell us. They confirm the reports of
the Marylander, Hughson, and come, as we could wish
them, fairly into our clutches.
And more than confirmed, I think, my lord, by the
severity of their fire from the infantry on the left. Such
a proportion on the march would at once speak for the
presence of their entire army.
This was the remark of Webster. There was a
pause of a moment, in which Cornwallis appeared to
consult a memorandum in his hand. He spoke at
length to Tarleton.
What horse, was the report of Hughson?
Armand's onlysome sixty-five, your excellency.
And their late reinforcement of Virginians?
A perfect, but single regiment.
'Tis odds, gentlemen, large odds against us, if
these reports be true. The lines of Maryland and
Delawaregood troops thesethe Virginia troops, the
North Carolinians, and native militia, make up five
thousand
men at leastfull five thousandfor the rebel
army. Ours is not three.
But quite enough, my lord, was the prompt but
measured language of Tarleton. They are mere
carrion
,
half-starved, and De Kalb's continentals alone
excepted, will not stand a second fire. We shall ride
over them.
Ay, you, Tarletonyou will ride over them when
our bayonets have first given you a clear track, said
Webster.
Which you can soon do, was the equally cool
but ready response of the other. They have come
into our clutches, to employ the phrase of your
excellency
;
it will be our fault if we do not close our fingers
upon them. Half-starved, and perfectly undrilled,
they will offer little obstacle. The novelty of situation
alone is terror enough for these militia; that, indeed,
is the only terror, and that they never get over until
the third trial. This is the first, with two-thirds of
this hodge-podge army. We must see that they do not
get to a third.
There spoke the sabre, said Rawdon, playfully.
It should never speak twice, responded Tarleton,
without a smile; dead rebels never bite.
No, but they howl most cursedly before they die,
as you should know, Tarleton, above all others. We
S 2
hear the echoes even now from the Waxsaws, when
your sabres told upon Buford's regiment, said Rawdon.
Ay, that was a sad business, Bannister, though, to
be sure, you could not well help it, was the additional
remark of Cornwallis, who yet looked approvingly upon
the person whom he thus partially censured. Tarleton
simply smiled; his thin lips slightly parting, and
exhibiting
a brief glimpse of the closed teeth, as he
replied
Better they should howl than hurt; their bark is
music; their bite might be something worse. You
may talk, gentlemen, as you please; but if you were
asked the question, you will much prefer the one to
the other, with the dawning of to-morrow's sun.
Our wish is for the fight, gentlemen, said
Cornwallis
;
my own opinion insists upon it as the
preferable
measure. They outnumber us, it is true; but I
feel satisfied we can outfight them. Whether we can
or not, I think, at least, we should try for it. We gain
every thing by victory; the delay increases their force;
and even without defeat, it makes the difficulty of
conquest
with us so much the greater. The suggestion
of Tarleton is one also of importance. The rebels are
half-starved men; their provisions have been unequal
and unsatisfactory for some time past. Disease, too
so we learn from Hughsonhas thinned them greatly;
and in every possible aspect, our condition imperiously
calls for fight. This is my opinion.
And mine, responded Tarleton, slowly, letting down
his sabre, which rattled quiveringly in the sheath with
the stroke. The same opinion was expressed by
Rawdon
,
Webster, and the rest; the resolve for fight was
unanimous. Cornwallis then proceeded to arrange his
army in order of battle. They displayed in one line,
completely occupying the ground, one flank resting on
a swamp, the other on a slight ravine which ran
parallel with, and near it. The infantry of the
reserve
,
dividing equally, took post in a second line,
opposite the centre of each wing. The cavalry,
commanded
by Tarleton, held the road, where the left of
the right wing met the volunteers of Ireland, a corps
which, thus placed, formed the right of the left wing.
On the right, Lieutenant-colonel Webster was placed
in command. To Colonel Lord Rawdon, the left was
assigned. Two six and two three pounders, under
Lieutenant M'Leod, were placed in the front line, and
two other pieces with the reserve. The arrangement
of this force, though at midnight, so perfectly drilled
and well-experienced had they been, was the
movement
of machines rather than of men. Every step
was taken under the eyes of superior officersevery
cannon found its assigned place with a niceness,
admirably
contrasting with the confusion which is
supposed
to belong to battle. Each soldier, before the
dawn, had his supply of rum provided him; and officers
and men, resolute and ready, held their places in order
of battle, anxiously awaiting the approaching daylight.
The American army was formed with similar
precision
,
and at the same hour. The second brigade of
Maryland, with the regiment of Delaware, under
General
Gist, took the right; the brigade of North Carolina
militia, led by Caswell, the centre; that of Virginia,
under Stevens, the left. The first Maryland brigade
was formed in reserve, under General Smallwood.
Major-general Baron De Kalb, charged with the line
of battle, took post on the right, while Gates,
superintending
the whole, as general-in-chief, placed
himself
on the road between the line and the reserve. To
each brigade a due proportion of artillery was allotted;
but the wing of the armythe horsewas utterly
wanting. The cavalry of Armand, defeated at the first
encounter of the night, is thought, by some of the simple
countrymen who witnessed their rapidity, to be flying
to this very day. Gates's line of battle has been
criticised
with the rest of his proceedings in this unhappy
campaign. His arrangements placed the Virginia
militia, an untried body, which had never before seen
service, on the left, a disposition which necessarily put
them in front of the enemy's right, consisting of his
veterans
.
The better course would certainly have been,
to have thrown the continentals, our regulars, upon the
left; by which arrangement, the best men of both armies
must have encountered. This was the plan of Lincoln
in previous events, and certainly that plan most
conformable
to, and indeed called for by, the circumstances of
the case. The flank of the American, like that of the
British army, rested upon a morass; and, thus disposed,
it awaited upon the ground, and in the given order, for
the first glimpses of daylight and the enemy.
With the dawn of day, the British were discovered
in front, in column, and on the advance. This was
communicated to the adjutant-general, Williams, who
soon distinguished the British uniform about two
hundred yards before him. Immediately ordering the
batteries to be opened upon them, he rode to General
Gates, who was in the rear of the second line, and
informed
him of what had been done, communicating his
opinion at the same time that the enemy were displaying
their column by the right; but still nothing was clear
enough in the proceedings of the opposite army for
certainty on either side. Gates heard him attentively,
but gave no orders, and seemed disposed to await the
progress of events; upon which the adjutant-general
presumed upon a farther suggestion.
Does not your excellency think that if the enemy
were attacked briskly by Stevens, while in the act of
displaying, the effect
Yes, sir, said Gates, hurriedly interrupting him;
that's rightlet it be done, sir.
These were almost the last orders given by the
unhappy
commander. Quick as thought, Williams seized
the commission, and, readily obedient, General Stevens
advanced with his brigade to the charge, all seemingly
in fine spirits. But the instructions came too latethe
evolution of the enemy was complete; they were
already
in line, and prepared to receive the attack. But
this did not alter the determination either of Stevens
or the adjutant. Assigning a force of fifty men to the
latter to commence the action by firing from the cover
of trees as riflemen, in the hope to extort the premature
fire of the British, Stevens cried out to his brigade, as
he saw the column moving down upon him in front
Courage, my men, and chargecharge! You have
bayonets as well as they.
His words were drowned, and lost, in the wild
huzzas
and the fierce onset of the opposing British, who
fired as they came on, with their pieces in rest, for
the charge of bayonets. The militia was seized with a
panic, and, in spite of all the efforts of the gallant
Stevens
,
could not be persuaded either to stand the charge
or to return the fire. A few only stood with their
leader
.
The great majority, throwing away their loaded
arms, fled in every direction; and, catching from them
the unworthy panic, the North Caroliniansa single
regiment under Colonel Dixon alone excepted
followed
the shameful example. In vain did Stevens and
Caswell endeavour to stem the torrent of retreat. The
fugitives were not to be restrained; and sought, in
desperate
flight, for that safety which flight seldom gives,
and which it most certainly denied to them. They broke
through the line, leaving the right still firm, and
pressing
down upon the reserve, disordered them while
passing through. From his place, the
commander-in-chief
beheld the disaster with an emotion he had never
anticipated. His hair withered at its roots as he
surveyed
the rout, and madly he pressed towards them,
with head uncovered, waving his hat and crying to them
as they flew
Standturnbrave menmen of Virginia! I come
to lead you back. Turn, cowardsfor your country
for yourselves! Shame me notshame me not; but
rally. Come with me; lookI myself will lead you!
But they heardthey heeded nothing of his
exhortations
.
He threw himself directly in front of the
fugitives, and with drawn sword, striking around him,
as if among his enemies, he vainly endeavoured to
compel
their return. Never were exertions and exhortations
more honest to this end. In his fury, hewing a soldier
hurrying past him, down, almost to the middle, at a
stroke, he vented his indignation in a torrent of oaths.
Villains! cowards! for shamefor your country
for me! Turn, for meturn, you dd rascals, turn!
Vain were all his exhortationsvain his oathsvain
his efforts. Panic is madness; it is moreit is
contagion
.
They bore him along by the rush of numbers;
and as he strove to turn, and for this purpose had
drawn his steed suddenly round upon a tall sergeant
who was hurrying away with the rest, the fellow did
not hesitate, with his sabre, to cut the bridle of the
animal, leaving the general without any control upon
him. In this situation, the tumult attained its
ascendency
.
The crowd bore him onward with it in its flight;
and the fiery steed which he rode, free from all restraint,
now imbibing some portion of the general panic,
hurried
along with the flying mass more madly than the
rest. Gates had seen all of the battle which he was
destined to see. His hair grew white as he flew, a
token of that heart-felt humiliation which clung to him
during all his subsequent existence. Meanwhile, the
battle had become general throughout the field which he,
per force, had deserted. The British army, flushed with
the opening success, now advanced on every side; but
the onward course of conquest was arrested when they
encountered the continentals. Accustomed, as were
the latter, to frequent encounter, they beheld the rout
with little or no emotion. The panic touched not them.
Stand your ground, brave men, cried De Kalb, as,
with uncovered head, he rode calmly along through the
smoke and dangerstand your ground, brave men,
and do no shame to you officers. Colonel Dixon, said
he, addressing the officer in command of the only
regiment of North Carolinians who kept their places
Colonel Dixon, close up, and feel the Maryland
regiment
.
Surveying the prospect as he rode, and seeing that
his flank, exposed by the desertion of the militia, was
now partly covered, the old veteran prepared for the
charge. His orders were given with the tone of true
valour, while his decision was that of experience.
Alighting from his horse, he turned him loose in the
rear, then advancing on foot before his men, he
commanded
their instant preparation for that terrible
movement
.
He himself led the way, and fought on foot at
their head. His order to charge bayonets, uttered
in the imperfect tones of the foreigner, was heard
distinctly
through the affray. Catching his spirit, as it
were, his line advanced without hesitation, and
shouting
buoyantly as they did so, in a few moments the
line was overpassed which separated them from the
enemy's left, commanded by Rawdon. The rival
muskets
were crossed, their bayonets linked, and for a few
seconds the opposing armies reeled to and fro, like so
many lock-limbed and coherent bodies: but the rush,
and the enthusiasm of the charge of De Kalb, were, for
the moment, irresistible, and Rawdon fell back
beneath
it.
Where is the commander-in-chief? cried De Kalb,
in a fierce voice, as he beheld the adjutant-general,
Williams, advancing with his own, the 6th Maryland,
having actually driven the enemy out of line in front.
Gone! was the single word with which he
announced
to the old soldier the isolation of his
continentals
.
On, then, on! was the immediate shout of De
Kalb; look not to the right, nor to the left, brave men
but on! You are alone: your own steel must work
your safety. Charge!
A group of officers and soldiersBritish and American
was seen struggling in front. An officer was down;
a squad of soldiers was seeking to despatch him, and
two others unequally contending against them with
their swords. The wounded officer was an American.
Againonce more, my brave fellowsonce again
through them to the hearts of the enemycharge
charge! was the fierce order of De Kalb, in his
imperfect
English; through, and heed them not!
But the officers are oursthey are aids to the
general, cried Brigadier Gist, in the hope to arrest
the desperate charge of De Kalb.
And we are men, was the responsewhat are
these officers to us? onward! through them, brave men
once more to the hearts of the enemy!
The group sought to disperse; the assailing soldiers
fled away, leaving the wounded officer, and those who
had been fighting in his behalf, alone, before the
charging
squadrons.
Hold! cried Colonel Walton, for it was he,
advancing
as he spokehold, I pray you, Baron De Kalb!
we are your friends
On thento the enemy! cried De Kalb, unheeding
the exhortation; and, filled with his own furythe fury
of desperationthe advancing line resolutely obeyed
him. The wounded man, and those who stood beside
him, must have been crushed, or gone along with the
pressing line; and the moment was, therefore, full of
peril to the group. Presenting his sword to his
advancing
countrymen, Colonel Walton cried to the wounded
officer, who lay almost senseless at his feet
I will share your fate, Pinckney, if I cannot divert
it. I stand by you to the last. Hold, Americans!
What madness is this?we are friendswould you
trample us down?
On with us, then! fiercely cried De Kalb, on with
us, if you be friends! We know you not otherwise.
He is too much wounded, cried Walton, pointing
to the insensible officer.
This is no time, sir, to regard the dead or the
wounded. The field is covered with both; shall we
lose all for one manofficer or soldier? On with us,
Colonel Waltonthere is no help else. On!
It was the last command of De Kalb, who was
already
severaly wounded. In that moment the fierce
onset of the continentals was arrested. A new
obstacle
,
in a fire from the right, restrained their progress.
This was Webster. Having thoroughly defeated the
American left, he was now free to turn his face upon the
isolated continentals. This small, resolute, and now
compact body, had moved forward irresistibly. The
fierce spirit of its commander seemed to have been
shared equally with his men; and though every step
which they took was with the loss of numbers, they
ceaselessly continued to advancethe fire of the British
left and centre still telling dreadfully upon them, but
without
shaking their inflexible and reckless charge. The
sudden movement of Webster upon their flanks first
arrested their progress. He turned the whole force of
his infantry, together with the twenty-third regiment,
upon
the exposed flank of the first, or Smallwood's brigade.
This had been commanded bravely by Colonel Gunby,
and other of its officers, the general himself not being
available for some time before. The shock of Webster's
charge upon this body was irresistible; they reeled
and broke beneath it. They were rallied, and once
more stood the assault. They stood but to perish; and
it was found impossible to contend longer with the
vastly
superior and fresh force from the reserve which was
now brought to bear upon them. This shock, and the
effect of Webster's assault, at this critical moment,
saved the life of Walton and that of his wounded friend,
Major Pinckney. The fierce command of De Kalb was
no longer obeyed by the flank regiment, now compelled
to combat with another enemy. They faced Webster;
and Walton found himself on the extreme left, instead
of being in front of the body which, a moment before,
had been ordered to pass over him. In another instant,
the line reeled beyond him: he saw the enemy
pressing on, and he rushed to the front of the
retreating
division of Americans. Again they were brought
to a stand; again the impelling bayonets of Webster
drove them backward; and while they yet strove bravely,
at the will of their officers, to unite more compactly
together
for the final conflict, the shrill voice of
Tarleton
was heard upon the left. Then came the rush of
his dragoons; the sweeping sabre darting a terrible
light on every hand, and giving the final impetus to that
panic which now needed but little to be complete
throughout the army.
Spare! oh spare the Baron De Kalb! was a cry
of anguish that went up from the centre of the line.
It was doubly agonizing, as the accents were uttered
evidently by a foreign tongue. Walton looked but an
Vol. II.T
instant in the direction where lay the old veteran, feebly
striving still to contend with the numbers who were
now pressing around him. The Chevalier Du
Buysson
,
a faithful friend, stood over him, vainly
endeavouring
to protect him by the interposition of his own body.
His piteous crySpare the baron! spare the Baron
De Kalb! had little or no avail.
Eleven wounds already testified to the reckless
courage
of the veteran, and the earnestness with which he
had done battle to the last for the liberties of a foreign
people. The bayonet was again lifted above him to
strike, when Colonel Walton pressed forward to his
relief
.
But, with the movement, he was himself
overthrown
himself
exposed to the bayonet of the enemy.
He threw up his sword and parried the first stroke of
the weapon, which glanced down and stuck deeply in
the grass beside him. Another pinned him by his
sleeve to the spot; and his career in the next moment
would probably have been ended, but for the timely
appearance
of Colonel Tarleton himself. His order was
effectual, and Walton tendered him his sword.
You have saved my life, sir: my name is Colonel
Walton.
The lips of Tarleton wore something of a smiling
expression, as, returning the weapon, he transferred his
prisoner to the guardianship of two of his troopers.
The expression of his face, so smiling, yet so sinister
in its smile, surprised Walton, but he was soon taught
to understand it.
The battle ceased with the fall of De Kalb. It had
been hopeless long before. Turning his eyes gloomily
from the thick confusion of the field, Colonel Walton
moved away with his conductors, while Tarleton, with
his eye kindled with fight, and a lip quivering with its
pleasurable convulsions, led his cavalry in pursuit of
the fugitives, marking his progress for twenty-two miles
from the field of battle with proofs of that sanguinary
appetite for blood, which formed the leading feature of
his character, according to history and tradition, in all
the fields of Carolina.
CHAPTER XXIII.
A stubborn knave, you may not trust or tame.
Go, bear him to the block! The biting axe
Shall teach him quiet hence.
The
victory was complete in all respects. The
army of Gates was dispersedthat general, a
melancholy
wanderer, hopeless of fortune, and, with a proper
self-rebuke, dreading the opinion of his country. The
loss of the Americans in this battle was heavy. Of
the continentals but six hundred escaped; and as their
number was but nine hundred in all, they necessarily
lost, in killed, wounded, and prisoners, one third of their
entire force. The whole number slain of the American
army must have been six hundred mena large
proportion
,
in a small body of three thousand and fifty-two.
The loss admitted by the British commander, was
three hundred killed and woundedan amount
certainly
unexaggerated, and showing conclusively what
must have been the result of the contest had the militia
done their duty,had they but stood the first round,
had they but returned the fire of the foe. The
continentals alone bore the brunt of the conflict, and
they were victorious until isolated and overborne by
numbers.
The prisoners, among whom is included Colonel
Walton, were roped by the command of Tarleton, and
formed not the least imposing portion of the triumphal
procession of the victor, on his return to Camden. De
Kalb died a few days after in the arms of Du Buysson,
his aide. His last words were those of eulogy upon the
gallant troops whom he had so well trained, and who,
justifying his avowed confidence in them, had stood
by him, in the previous struggle, to the last.
My brave division! These, in broken accents and
imperfect English, were his last words. While
expiring
,
his eye blazed up for a moment, as if the ardour
of the strife was again burning in his soul, and then its
light went out for ever. His name can never be erased
from the history, nor his memory forgotten by the people
in whose cause he perished.
A different fate awaited the other prisoners, to many
of whom a like death would have been a glad reprieve.
The revengeful feelings of Lord Cornwallis were yet
to be satisfied. The banquet of blood which the late
battle had afforded, had quickened and made ravenous
the appetite, which, at the same time, it had failed to
satisfy. There was much in the circumstances of the
period to provoke this appetite in the British
commander
,
though nothing to justify its satiation to the
gross extent to which it carried him. He had seen
much of his good labours in the province entirely
overturned
.
Deeming the country utterly conquered, such
had been the amount of his communications to his
king. The work had now to be begun anew. The
country, so lately peaceable and submissive, was now
everywhere in arms. The swamps on every side of
him began to swarm with enemies; and his own
victory
over Gates and the continentals, though
unqualified
and conclusive, was burdened with tidings of the
great success of Sumter on the Wateree, of Marion on
Black river, and of many other leaders not so
distinguished
as these, but highly promising for the future
in the small successes of the beginning. These
tidings
gave just cause of irritation to the mind which,
having first flattered itself with an idea of its complete
success, now discovers that all its labours have been
taken in vain. He grew vindictive in consequence,
and persuading himself that a terrible example was
necessary, if not for justice, at least for his cause, he
ordered a selection to be made from among the
prisoners
in his possession, who were doomed to expiate
the guilt of patriotism upon the gallows.
The streets of Camden were filled with
lamentations
the day upon which this determination was made
public. This was three days after the battle,time
enough, surely, having intervened for the subduing of
his sanguinary temper. Twenty victims were chosen
for the sacrifice, and among them was Colonel Walton.
They were chosen either for their great popularity, or
for their reputation of especial malignity. The former
class was selected in order that the example might
be an imposing one; the punishment of particular
offences
was the ground upon which the others were
to be justified. Yet reasons, if plenty as
blackberries
,
were not readily furnished, or cared for, on the
occasion. Even the trial which preceded their
execution
was of a most summary and nominal character.
The stern commander himself presided, with a general
officer on either hand. The prisoners were brought
before him singly.
Why has this man been chosen? was the inquiry
of Cornwallis to Lord Rawdon.
Violation of protection, my lord: this man is one
Samuel Andrews, who was quiet and pacific enough
full of professionsuntil the rebel army came to
Lynch's creek. He was taken on the field.
Take him away, marshal, was the immediate
order. To the tree with him! The man was
removed
.
Who are these?
Their names areLord Rawdon, in reply, read
from a paper which he held in his handRichard
Tucker, John Miles, Josiah Gayle, Eleazar Smith,
Lorimer Jones
[8]
[8]
Historicalthe names of the sufferers are on record as here
given.
No more, cried Cornwallis, interrupting the reader.
Enough of that. They are all brought up under the
same chargeare they?
All but one: the man Gibson, there, in the blue
stripes, is little better than an outlaw. The charge
against him in particular is, that he shot Edward
Draper
,
a soldier in the `Queen's Guards,' across the
Wateree river, and was subsequently taken alone,
without
connection with any military body whatsoever.
T 2
The insolent scoundrel! Advance him, guard
bring him forward.
The man was singled out from the group. His arms
were lashed behind him with cords, but he moved forward
as if perfectly unbound, and no figure could have been
more erect. He had on neither coat nor jacket; his
shirt was torn, bloody, and open at the breast,
displaying
beneath the fair bosom of a youth, but the full
muscular development of the man. He approached
the table unshrinkingly, striding boldly forward to
Cornwallis, and, with an upward eye, met the stern
glance of his judge, intended to be an overwhelming
one, with a corresponding look of defiance.
Stand where you are, sir!we desire you no
closer, cried his lordship. You hear the charge
against you?
The man did not stand where he had been ordered,
but continued to approach until the table only
intervened
between himself and his lordship. The latter
repeated his inquiry.
You hear the charge against you?
I doit is the truth. I shot Edward Draper, a
corporal in the Queen's Guards, across the Wateree.
With what purpose?
To kill him.
Ay, we suppose thatbut what did you propose
to gain by it?
Justice.
Justice!what had he done?
Beat my mother.
Why did you not apply for justice at the first
station
,
instead of taking it into your own hands?
I did;Lord Rawdon, there, will tell you why I
took it into my own hands.
Well.
He denied it to me.
It is false, my lord, exclaimed Lord Rawdon;
Draper was severely reprimanded.
My mother was beaten, and the man who beat her
wasreprimanded! I did not think that enough of
justice, and I shot him.
The evident discrepancy between the original wrong
and its punishment by Rawdon, could not but appear to
all parties; and Cornwallis himself was almost
disposed
to look favourably upon the offender. But
examplea terrible examplewas supposed to be
necessary; and with this belief, he was determined to
shield no victim from his fate, who exhibited any thing
like a strong and decisive character. Still, as the
offence
was rather of a private than of a public nature,
the commander proposed to the prisoner the usual
British alternative of safety at that period, and under
like circumstances.
If I pardon you your crime, Gibson, will you at
once take arms for his majesty?
Never! was the quick and firm response; I'll
see him dd first.
Take him forth, marshal, with the rest. See that
they suffer instantly. Away with him!
The stern voice of Cornwallis rang like a trumpet
through the assembly; and as the sounds died away,
another voice, yet more thrilling, sent forth a scream
a woman's voicea single scream, and so shrill, so
piercing, so wo-begone and sad, that it struck through
the assembly as something ominous and unearthly. A
woman rushed forth from behind the group, and threw
herself before the merciless commander. It was his
mother.
My sonmy only sonhe is all I have, my lord!
Ohspare himspare him to his widowed mother!
I have none on earth but him! was all she said,her
eyes bent upon Cornwallis, while her finger pointed to
the tall and manly youth beside her.
Take him away! It is too late, my good woman,
you should have taught him better. Take him
away! was the stern and only answer.
The prisoners were hurried forth; the woman, doomed
so soon to be childless, clinging to her son, and
shrieking
all the while. There was yet another victim.
Rawdon whispered the commander, and from an
adjoining
apartment, Colonel Walton was brought before
his judge. Cornwallis rose at his approach with a
show of respectful courtesy, then again gently resumed
his seat.
Colonel Walton, I am truly sorry to see you thus
truly sorry, was the considerate speech of his
excellency
,
as the prisoner approached. Walton bowed
slightly in return, as he replied
I am grateful for your lordship's consideration, but
cannot withhold my surprise that you should regret
your own successes. The fortune of war has made
you the victor, and has given me into your power.
The prisoner of war must not complain when he
encounters
the risks, which should have been before his
eyes from the beginning, no more than the victor should
regret the victory which he sought from war.
The prisoner of war! I am afraid, Colonel Walton,
we cannot consider you in that character.
Your lordship will explain.
Colonel Walton, a subject of the King of Great
Britain, found in arms against his officers, is a rebel to
his authority, and incurs the doom of one.
No subject of the King of Great Britain, sir! I
deny the charge. I am not his subject, and no rebel
therefore to his authority. But this is not for me to
argue now. To what, may I ask your lordship, does
all this tend?
The consequences are inevitable, Colonel Walton
the traitor must bear the doomhe must die the
death of the traitor.
I am ready to die for my country at any hour, and
by any form of death. The prisoner, sir, is in your
hands. I will simply protest against your decision, and
leave it to the ripening time and to the arms of my
countrymen to avenge my wrongs.
I would saveI would save your life, Colonel
Waltongladly save it, would you but allow me, said
Cornwallis earnestly.
My dissent or assent, my lord, on such a subject,
and under present circumstances, is surely unnecessary.
The mockery of such a reference is scarcely
agreeable
to me, and, certainly, not becoming on the part of
the conqueror. The power is in your hands, my lord,
to work your pleasure.
We will speak plainly, Colonel Walton, and you will
readily understand us. As you say, mine is the power
to command your instant death: and whether I do so, in
error or in right, it matters not; it will avail you nothing.
I would save you, as your life, properly exercised for
the royal causefor the cause of your king, sirwill
serve us much more materially than your death. Your
influence is what we wantyour co-operation with us,
and not your blood. Twice, sir, has a commission
an honourable and high commissionin his majesty's
service, been tendered to you from me. Twice has it
been rejected with scorn; and you are now taken in
arms against his majesty's troops, having violated your
solemn pledge to the contrary, which your protection
insisted upon.
Wrong, sir! exclaimed Walton, interrupting him
wrong, sir! The contract was violated and
rendered
null by the proclamation of Sir Henry Clinton
not by me.
This is your opinion; and I need not say how
incorrectly
.
But, as I have before said, whether justly
or unjustly you fell a victim, will avail you nothing.
The hanged man heeds nothing of the argument which
proves that he was hung by mistake. I have the
power of life and death over you in my own hands;
and, believe me, Colonel Walton, in opening a door of
safety for you, I am offering you the last, the only
alternative
.
You shall die or live, as you answer!
I am ready, my lord. You somewhat mistake my
character, if you think that I shall fall back from the
truth, because of the consequences which it may
happen
to bring with it. Ha! What is this?
He was interrupted by a sudden blast of the bugle,
a confused hum of voices, and then a shriek. Another,
and another, wild and piercing, rose from the court in
front. At that instant, a soldier entering the apartment
threw open the doors, and gave an opportunity for those
within to behold the awful tragedy that had been going
on the while. A single tree in front of the place bore
twenty human bodies; the limbs were yet quivering in
the air with their agonizing convulsions, and the
executioner
was not yet done.
Close the door, sergeant, said Cornwallis calmly.
Then, continuing his exhortation to Walton, he made
use of the awful circumstance which they had just
witnessed, the more earnestly to impress his desires
upon the mind of the hearer, and produce a different
determination.
An awful doom, but necessary. It is one, Colonel
Walton, from which I would gladly save you. Why
will you reject the blessings of life? Why will you
resist the mercies which still seek to prevent the
purposes
of justice?
Justice! was the scornful exclamation of the
prisoner
,
and all that he deigned to reply.
Ay, sir, justice! The cause of the rightful
monarch
of this country is the cause of justice; and its
penalties are incurred by disloyalty before all other
offences
.
But argument is needless here.
It isit is needless, said Walton, emphatically.
And, therefore, Cornwallis proceededtherefore,
sir, I confine myself to the brief suggestion which I
now make you, by the adoption of which you will
escape
your present difficulties. Though you have twice
rejected his majesty's terms of favour, he is reluctant
to destroy.
The tree attests the reluctance. It bears its own
illustration, your lordship, which your assertion,
nevertheless
,
does not need. I hear you, sir.
Somewhat disconcerted, Cornwallis, with a show of
rising impatience, hurried into a conclusion.
Once more, sir, he offers you safety; once more
he tenders you an honourable appointment in his armies.
Here, sir, is his commissiontake it. Go below to
the Ashley and make up your own regiment; choose
your own officers, and do for him what you have
hitherto
fruitlessly sought to do for his enemies.
Never, sir, never! was the conclusive reply.
Yet, a while, bethink you. You know the doom
elsedeaththe gallows.
I know it; I have thought: you have my answer.
Then, you diedie like a dog, sir, in the scorn of
all around you.
Be it so. I hope, and fear not, to die like a man.
My country will avenge me. I am ready!
Your country! said Cornwallis, scornfully. Then
turning to Rawdon, he gave his order.
My Lord Rawdon, you will instantly detach an
especial guard for the prisoner, in addition to that which
has been designated to conduct the prisoners of war
taken in the late action to the Charlestown provost. He
shall go with them to Dorchester.
For what? with what object? why to Dorchester,
my lord? was the anxious inquiry of Walton.
You shall die there, sir, as an example to the
rebels of that quarter. You shall suffer where you are
most knownwhere your loss would be most felt.
Let me die here, rather, my lord! I pray you for
this mercy. Not therenot therealmost in sight of
my child.
There, and there only, Colonel Walton. Your
doom is sealed; and, refusing our mercy, you must
abide our penalty. Make out your orders, my Lord
Rawdon, to the officer of the station, Colonel Proctor;
I will sign them. Say to him that the rebel must be
executed at the village entrance, within three days
after
the guard shall arrive. Take him away!
Such was the British jurisdiction; such was the
summary administration of justice under Lord
Cornwallis
.
These items are all historical; and fiction
here has not presumed to add a single tittle to the
evidence
which truth has given us of these events.
CHAPTER XXIV.
What sad despair is this, that braves the storm,
Would battle with the whelming tides that heave,
And pant to close around, and strive to cling,
And keep the victim down?
It
was a fine, but warm summer afternoon, in August.
The Santee river lay smooth and shining like a
polished
mirror in the unclouded sunlight, and all
nature
appeared to revel in the same luxurious repose.
Our old acquaintance, Porgy, lay along the banks of
the river, half concealed in the shelter of the brush
around him. The spot which gave him a resting-place
and shelter, shot out, at this point, from the dead level
strip of shore, boldly into the stream; which, seemingly
vexed at the interruption, beat with a pettish murmur
upon its upward side, as if vainly struggling to break
through it in its downward progress. The jutting land,
thus obtrusively trenching upon the water, was of no
great extent, but, being well covered by the trees and
luxuriant foliage, it formed an excellent hiding-place
for one desirous of watching the river on either hand,
without danger of exposure. Sweeping around the
point, both above and below, the spectator, thus
stationed
,
might see for a few miles, on both sides, the
entire surface of the stream, commanding, in this scope
of sight, one or two of the usual crossing places at low
stages of the water. The river was probably a mile
wide at this point, not including the swamp, which, in
some places, extended to a width five or ten times that
of the main body of the stream. From this dead level
of swamp, it was only now and then that the banks
of the river rose into any thing like height or boldness.
The point now occupied by Porgy was one of those
places most prominent to the sight. On the upper or
northern side of the river, directly opposite, there was
another bold ascent to a bank from which the boats
usually started when putting across the stream. This
bank was easily beheld by the spectator opposite. The
trees were but few upon it; and its baldness, the
natural
result of the frequent use made of it, contrasted,
not unpleasantly, with the otherwise unvarying wall of
woods that formed the boundary of the main current;
the trees crowding thickly down into the river until
their bending branches met its embraces; and their
tops, sometimes, when the freshet was great, rested
like so many infant shrubs, depending without a root
or base upon its swollen bosom.
The afternoon sun, streaming from the west along
the river's surface, its beams mingling in an even line
to the east with its current, still farther contributed to
the softness of the picture. A warm flush, tempered
by the golden haze that hangs like a thin veil over the
evening midsummer prospect in the south, subdued
pleasantly the otherwise blinding effulgence of the day.
The slight breathings of the wind, only equal to the
lifting of the lightest leaf, whispered to all thingsthe
bud, the flower, and the insect, of that dreamy indulgence
and repose which Porgy, who felt always and
appreciated
such an influence, had stretched himself off to
enjoylying at length under an overhanging tree,
lazily watching the scene around him, and with a
drooping eye, that seemed to say how irksome was the
task which he yet found himself bound to execute.
He was on duty even then. The men of Marion
were all around him in the swamp on the southern side
of the river. The partisan chief was full of anxiety,
and his scouts and guards were doubled and spread
about on every hand. He looked hourly for
intelligence
from Gates and the continentals; not that he
hoped much, if any thing of the army, or of good in the
news which he anticipated. He had not been
persuaded
,
in the brief interview which he had been
vouchsafed by the American general, and in what
he had seen of his command, to look for or to
expect
Vol. IIU
much from the then approaching issue.
Marion
was the very opposite of Gates in nearly all
respects. Modest, yet firm, his reliance upon himself
arose not from any vague confidence in fortune or in
circumstances, but in the timely adaptation of
corresponding
means to ends, and in the indefatigable
industry
and zeal with which he plied all the energies,
whether
of himself or of his men, to the successful
attainment
of his object. Gates, he soon perceived, was
afflicted with his own infallibilitya disease that not
only forbids precaution, but that rejects advice and
resists
improvement. Such a malady is the worst under
which generals or philosophers can labour; and Marion
needed no second glance to perceive the misfortune of
Gates in this respect. His confidence in that
commander
was lessened duly as he beheld this failing;
and he returned from the camp, if not full of
forebodings
,
at least warmly anxious on the score of
approaching
events. He had partly fulfilled the duties which
Gates had assigned him; he had traversed the Santee
and Peedee, breaking up the boats, dispersing the
little bands of tories as they leagued together and came
in his way, and contributed largely to the overthrow of
that consciousness of security on the part of the
British
which they had hitherto enjoyed, but of which
they were deprived, in greater or less degree, from the
moment that Marion rose in arms and led the Black
river insurrection. He had now, in pursuit of the
same objects, brought his squad again to the Santee,
occupying those positions along that river by which he
would be sooner likely to receive intelligence, assist
his friends, or harass his enemies.
Porgy, on the present occasion, held the post of a
sentinel. A good watcher was he, though the labour
was irksome to him. Could he have talked all the
while, or sung, with no ears but his own to appreciate
his melodies, he would have been perfectly content;
but silence and secrecy were principles in the partisan
warfare, and tenaciously insisted upon by the
commander
.
Porgy looked east and west, north and south,
without relief. The banks lay beautiful before him,
in a deep quiet, on the other side of the river. Near
him ran a dozen little creeks, shooting into the swamp
dark and bowery defiles, whose mouths,
imperceptibly
mingling with the river, formed so many places of
secure entry and egress for the canoes of the warriors.
Stretched along the grass, he surveyed one of these
little bayous, and his increasing heedfulness indicated
some cause of disturbance. Presently, a shrill whistle,
just as he had lifted his rifle, and was about to fire,
reached his ears; and quietly returning the signal, he
crawled along the bank towards its edge, and looked
down to the little creek, as it wound in, behind him,
from the river. The signal which he had heard
proceeded
from that quarter; and from the recess, a few
moments after, a little dug-out shot forth, propelled
by the single paddle of Lance Frampton. Concealing
the boat behind a clump of brush, that hung over the
mouth of the creek, the boy jumped out, and scrambling
up the sides of the bluff, was, soon after, alongside of
the drowsy sentinel.
Harkee, young man, said Porgy, as the youth
approached
him, you will pay dearly for good counsel,
unless you heed carefully what I now give you. Do
you know that you had nearly felt my bullet just now,
as I caught the sound of your paddle, before you
condescended
to give the signal? A moment more delay
on your part would have given us both no little pain,
for truly I should have sorrowed to have shot you; and
you, I think, would have been greatly annoyed by it.
That I should, Mr. Porgy; and I ought to have
whistled, but I did not think.
You must learn to think, boythat is the first
lesson
you should learn. Not to think, is to be vulgar.
The first habit which a gentleman learns, is to think
to deliberate. He is never to be taken by surprise.
The habit of thinking is to be lost, or acquired, at the
pleasure of the individual; and not to think, is, not only
to be no gentleman, but to be a criminal. You will
suffer from the want of such a habit. It is the vulgar
want always, and, permit me to add, the worst.
I try, sir, to think, for I know the good of it; but
it takes time to learn every thing, sir.
It does; but not so much time as people usually
suppose. The knowledge of one thing brings with it
the knowledge of another; as in morals, one error is
the parent of a dozenone crime, the predecessor of
a thousand. Learn what you can, and the rest will
come to you; as in fowling, you inveigle one duck, and
the rest of the flock follows. Talking of ducks, now,
boy, puts me in mind of dinner. Have the scouts
brought in any provisions.
No, sirnot yet; and no sign of them.
Porgy looked, with a wo-begone expression, towards
the sun, now on the decline, and sighed audibly.
A monstrous long day, Lancea monstrous long
day. Here, boy, draw this belt, and take in another
buttonholenay, take in two; it will admit of it.
The boy did as he was directedPorgy stretching
himself along the grass for the purpose of facilitating
the effort, and the boy actually bestriding him; the
slender form of the latter oddly opposed to the
mountainous
mass of matter that lay swelling and shrinking
beneath him. While engaged in this friendly office,
the boy started, and in a half-whisper, pointing to the
opposite shore, exclaimed
Oh, Mr. Porgy! look! look! what a beautiful
creature
!
Porgy started at once; seized his rifle; brought it
up to his shoulder; then, a moment after, let it drop
heavily, with an air of chagrin and mortification, to the
ground. And well he might be mortified. Before him,
on the opposite shore, directly on the edge of the stream,
to the surface of which his head was bending, stood a
buck of the largest description. His antlers, full and
thick, branched loftily in air; his brown, sleek sides
and slender limbs, as he stood snuffing the breezenow
suspiciously lifting his head to listen, and now
stooping
to the clear wave to drinkfurnished a study for
the painter, not less than for the gourmand. But he
was half a mile off.
Master Frampton, exclaimed Porgy, with much
gravity, you will be the death of me. You show me
a deer, and deny me a dinner.
The boy laughed.
Don't laugh, boy; it is too serious a matter, quite.
It is too provoking. Dn the beastlook at himhe
seems to see us, and to know our mortificationmine,
at least. Now could I be tempted to send him a shot,
if it were only to scare him out of his breath. He looks
most abominably impudent.
He looks scared now, sir, said the boy, as,
starting
to one side of the bank, and towards the thickening
swamp on the right of it, the animal seemed to show
alarm, and a desire for flight.
Yes: something has frightened him, that's clear;
and what troubles him, may be equally troublesome to
us. Lie flat, boydraw that brush a little more in
front of you, and take off your cap. You can see
through the leaves well enough.
At this moment, a whistle behind them announced a
friend, and Humphries joined the two a little time after.
What do you see, Porgy?
The gourmand pointed to the deer, which now, in
evident alarm, bounded forward a few paces into the
stream, then, swimming a few rods up the river, sought
a cover in the swamp thicket to the right. His alarm
was unequivocally clear to the partisans, and
Humphries
,
following the example of the two, squatted
down beside them; taking care so to cover his person
behind the brush, as, while seeing every thing, himself
to remain unseen. He had scarcely done so, when the
cause of the deer's alarm was made evident in the
approach
,
to the very spot upon which the animal had
stood drinking, of a man, in the common dress of the
woodman. His appearance was miserably wo-begone
and unhappy. His dress was tattered and dirty; and
consisted of the coarse stuffs worn by the poorer
orders
of the country. He had no armsno apparent
U 2
weapons of any kind; and his movement, sluggish and
without elasticity, seemed that of one greatly fatigued.
He threw himself, a moment after his arrival, at length
along the bank, with that air of listless
self-abandonment
which marks the character of despair.
Poor devil! he seems wearied and worn,
Humphries
.
It is one of our men. Ten to one he brings us
news from camp.
Bad news, then: he looks like any thing but the
messenger of good. But staywhat is he about?
The stranger, while they spoke, had arisen; and,
leaving the edge of the bank, went back to the wood,
from which, a few moments after, he emerged, bearing
in his hands a couple of common fence rails. These
he bore with difficulty to the edge of the water, and,
though no burden to a man in ordinary strength, their
weight, in his fatigue, seemed to demand a more than
ordinary effort.
Why, what's he going to do now? said Porgy.
The man, as he spoke, threw off his jacket and shoes,
and taking a ragged handkerchief from his pocket,
enclosed
them with its folds, then placing them over the
two rails which he laid side by side for the purpose,
he lashed them strongly together. This done, he
advanced to the stream, taking the bundle in his hands.
For a few moments he paused, looked up and down the
river, and seemed to hesitate with a due sense of
caution
;
then, as if ashamed of his fears, he rushed to the
water, and throwing the rails before him, boldly plunged
after them into its bosom.
The damned booby, he will certainly drown,
said Porgy, half rising from his place. Humphries
pulled him down and bade him be quiet, with a voice
which, though low, was stern with authority.
But we must not let the poor devil drown, Bill.
We must do our dutywe must not expose
ourselves
if we can help it, Porgy. His life is nothing to
our own; and we don't know who comes behind him.
That's true: dn the fellowlet him drown
who cares?
Meanwhile, swimming feebly, striking with one
hand while the other derived a feeble support from the
rails, the stranger moved forward. But it was soon
evident that his strength was that of a child, in
opposition
to the current. He strove desperately to keep a
direct course over the water, but, every movement
carried
him out of his line, and the sweeping stream
resisted
,
and rendered futile, the feeble dash of his hand,
with which, striking its overbearing billows, he laboured
earnestly, though vainly, to master their strength. As
he advanced farther within its current, he found
himself
still less able to contend with it; and the
partisans
,
from their place of watch, could now see that
his almost powerless hand was just raised above the
water, dropping into it feebly, at long and increasing
intervals, without impulsion, and taking no purchase
from the stream. He certainly ceased to advance, and
his movement now was only with the current.
We must help him, Humphries, my dear fellow,
or he will drown and be dd, said Porgy.
Oh yes, sirdo let us help him! exclaimed Lance,
who had watched the scene with an anxiety that kept
him starting anxiously, with every movement of the
swimmer.
If it must be done, Porgy, said Humphries, in
reply
,
there's only one of us that can do it. The
`dug-out' won't carry more, and I'm the best hand at
the paddles. So, keep cool and quietdon't cry out,
for we don't know but the tories may be after the
fellow
,
or maybe the British; and if they guess at Marion's
men being in the swamp, it'll break up all our schemes.
Lie close, and if the chap can keep above water till
I get to him, I'll save him.
With the words, descending quickly from the bluff,
Humphries took the skiff; and the little canoe, under
his powerful arms, soon shot from the concealing bush
where Lance had left it. It was not long before the
swimmer saw him, and he shouted joyfully, but faintly,
at the sight. The tones were so feeble that the
boatman
threw all his skill and strength into his paddle,
sparing no effort to reach him, as he felt assured that
the man could not long continue the struggle with the
heavy setting current of the river.
Keep up, keep up, Humphries cried out to him in
encouragement; keep up for a little whileonly a few
minutes more, stranger, and I'll fish you up like an
oyster.
Words, but so faint as to be undistinguishable,
reached Humphries from the swimmer in reply. The
sounds only were audible, but none of the syllables.
The canoe, light as a feather, was sent more rapidly
than at first towards the speaker, as Humphries felt more
and more the necessity of speed. It whirled on nearer
and nearer, and Lance started up, and clapped his hands
in delight, as he beheld the swimmer throwing aside
his frail support, and grasping firmly the gunwale of the
little bark that had so opportunely come to his
assistance
.
Supported without effort on his own part, by
holding upon its little sides, the man was brought
safely to shore; Humphries, with all the dexterity of
the Indian, having trimmed and propelled his frail bark,
even though thus encumbered, with little fatigue, and
comparatively as little effort. The exhausted
swimmer
was carried into camp, and soon recovered
sufficiently
to unfold his intelligence to the commander of
the partisans in person.
CHAPTER XXV.
Now let us follow in the quick pursuit,
And bring good tidings to the destined one.
Colonel Marion
examined the fugitive himself.
He was one of the little squad of Colonel Walton, and
had sustained the battle as one of the regiment of Colonel
Dixon, to whose North Carolina regimentthe only
one that had stood the fighthe had been attached by
Gates. He had seen the first and last of the battle, and
had been fortunate enough to reach one of the swamps
which lay on the flank of both armies, where he found
shelter until the victor had departed. He gave the
whole gloomy story of the defeat in broad colours to
the partisans; and though he could say nothing as to
the fate of Gates himself, and the several officers,
touching
whose safety the inquiries of Marion and of
Singleton
were made in particular, he yet knew enough to
assure them of the utter dispersion of the army, and
the slaughter, according to his account, of at least one
half of it. His farther intelligence was important, and
its advantages were yet available. He had seen, and
with difficulty had escaped from the British guard,
which had been despatched by Cornwallis, having
custody of the continental prisoners, destined for the
provost, or common prison in Charlestown. That guard,
he informed the partisan, had pursued an upper road,
and would, according to all probability, cross the
Santee at Nelson's, a few miles higher up the river.
Burdened with baggage and prisoners, they might not
yet have reached the river; and with this hope, giving his
signals with the rapidity of lightning, Marion collected
his squad, resolute to try odds, though inferior in number,
with the detachment in question. The rescue of one
hundred and fifty continentals, for that was their least
number, would be an important acquisition to the cause;
and a successful stroke, so soon after such a defeat as
that of Gates, might have the beneficial effect of restoring
confidence, and giving renewed hope to the paralyzed
Carolinians. Himself undespairing, Marion adopted
his plan with the determination. Dividing his force
into three parties, he gave one to Colonel Hugh Horry,
another to Singleton, and the third he led in person.
The signal sounded, the men rose from their
hiding-places
,
gathered around their different leaders; and
within an hour after the receipt of the intelligence just
given, and while the sun yet shone richly and gem-like
in the west, the partisans were all mounted upon their
fleet steeds, and dashing up to the spot where they
looked for, and prepared themselves to receive, their
enemies. Silence resumed her savage empire in the
swamp, and the gray-squirrel leaped fearlessly over
the island retreat, which an hour before he had trembled
but to approach.
As the partisan drew nigh the designated point, he
received intelligence that the guard with the prisoners
had not yet crossed the river, but had marched to
Great Savannah, a little above it. He was particularly
informed as to their number, and that of their
prisoners
,
though nothing was yet known to the
partisans
of the peculiar condition of some among them
the doom to which they were destined, or of those who
had already been sacrificed to the vindictive spirit of
the British commander. All this they were yet to
learn. Moving now with greater rapidity, Marion soon
crossed the river with all his force; and as the enemy
could not be very far off, he proceeded more cautiously.
He sent out his scouts, and as they severally came in
with intelligence, he prepared his farther plans. Night
came on, and he was advised that the British would
most probably lie by on the main road, at the
public-house
which was kept on the edge of the Great
Savannah
.
The opinion seemed probable, as travelling
by night in the southern swamps was no part of the
British custom; and to cross the river after dark would
have been a risk of some magnitude. This, however,
was Marion's favourite mode of warfare; and calling
in his parties, he gave directions to Colonel Horry to
make a circuit round the savannah, and lurking on its
lower edge, gain the pass of Horse creek, and keep
close in cover until he should receive a
communication
how to proceed from him. The reckless and
ready officer in question immediately went off in
obedience
to the commander. To Major Singleton a
similar station was intrusted on the other side of the
road, where the woods were open, and where he was
compelled, as the sheltering cover was thin and
imperfect
,
to bury his party more deeply in its recesses
than would otherwise have been considered necessary.
Marion's men, and the largest division, occupied both
sides of the road above the designated house, while a
detachment of selected scouts traversed the whole line
of road, bearing intelligence to the commander as
promptly as it was required.
Unsuspectingly, the British guard marched on; and
duly informed at every step in their progress, Marion
suffered them safely to reach the house at which they
were determined to stop for the night. A scout of
the partisan looked in at the window, disguised and
unobserved. He carefully watched the progress of the
supper, saw the disposition of the soldiers and the
prisoners, and left, in safety, his place of observation.
A little before daylight in the morning, while it was
yet quite dark, an officer of Marion communicated to
Horry the instructions of the commander. Promptly
moving forward as directed, Horry led his men to the
house, and had almost reached it without interruption;
but as he threw wide a little paling gate that opened
from the garden, through which he came to the
courtyard
of the dwelling, he was challenged by a sentinel.
Horry not answering, but advancing at the moment with
alacrity, the sentinel fired his piece unsuccessfully,
and was immediately cut down by him. The alarm
was given, however; and though the surprise was
effective
,
it was incomplete. A pile of arms before the door
was seized upon; but the great body of the enemy, partly
armed, made their escape through the front entrance,
and immediately pushed down the road. It was then
that Singleton charged upon them. He was promptly
metthe guard rallied with coolness and in good order,
and the small force of Singleton was compelled to give
back before them. But Horry, who had lingered to
release the continentals, now came up, and the contest
was resumed with vigour. The British, slowly moving
down the road, held their way unbroken, and fought
bravely at brief pauses in their movement. They
were still in force quite too great for the parties
opposed
to them, and the advantages gained by the
latter were those chiefly of surprise. While they
fought, the guard divided; a portion of them carried
Colonel Walton, with such other prisoners as had
been subjects of special judgment and particular care,
to the cover of the savannah, while the rest, now
unencumbered, continued the fight valiantly enough.
But the troops of Marion now rushed in, fresh men,
and falling upon the enemy's rear, they soon
finished
the contest. The fight had lasted, however,
for an hour at least before its conclusion; and the loss
of the British was severe. The partisans not only
rescued all the continentals, one hundred and fifty in
numberall of the Maryland linebut they took besides
twenty-two regulars of the 63d regiment, including
their captain, and sundry other prisoners. But the
small guard, carrying with it Colonel Walton, and the
other South Carolina prisoners, had gone clear; and
hurrying under good guidance to the Santee, while yet
the fight was going on, they seized upon some of the
boats of Marion, and were safe upon the other side
of the river, and speeding upon their way, before the
conflict was half over.
What was the horror of Singleton, when, at daylight,
the released prisoners gave intelligence of the destiny
of Colonel Walton, and the perfect escape with their
charge of the guard having him in custody. He
immediately
rushed to his commander with the
melancholy
narrative.
It is unhappydreadfully unhappy, Major
Singleton
,
said the commanderbut what are we to do? It
is now scarcely possible that we should overtake them;
they have the start too greatly to leave us any hope of
a successful pursuit, and beyond that, I see nothing
that can be done. If they do indeed execute our
citizens
,
we shall only be compelled to retaliate.
That of course we must do, Colonel Marion, was
the rejoinder; and I am willing, sir, that my name
should be the first on the list which pledges our
officers
to the practice, and incurs the risk which such
pledge involves. But, surely, we must do something
to save, not less than to revenge, our countrymen. I
believe, Colonel Marionnay, I am sure, I can
overtake
the detachment. Give me, sir, but twenty men
the men I brought with me from the Cypressthey
will volunteer in the service, they will risk their lives
freely in behalf of Colonel Walton.
Marion regarded the earnest speaker with a
melancholy
glance. He shook his head mournfully as he
replied
They are too far on the startsome hours the lead
upon you. It is impossible, Major Singleton, that you
should overtake them.
Our horses are superior
But not freshno, no! It is a bad business; but
I fear we cannot mend it.
You will not suffer a brave man, a good citizen, to
perish! Pardon me, sirpardon me, if in my
earnestness
and anxiety I seem to overstep the bounds of
propriety
and privilege. Pardon me, sir; but hear me.
Permit me to make the effortlet me save him if I
can. Think, sir, he is a man of great influence in his
parish, one highly valuable to our cause; he is brave
and virtuousa good citizena father!
Allall these I grant; but look at the prospect,
Major Singletonthe great risk to allthe little hope.
After this defeat of the continentals, this region to
which you propose to go, will be one of certain doom
to you. We shall now ourselves have to hurry farther
from the Santee; and I have already prepared the
orders to march our little brigade back to Lynch's
creek, though I leave you and the force you propose
to take to certain destruction.
Not certain, not even probable, Colonel Marion;
for, believe me, I will do nothing rash.
Marion smiled.
Your blood even now is boiling, Major Singleton;
the veins rise upon your foreheadyour cheek burns
your lips quiver. You are in a feverish impatience
which will hurry you into fight with the first
opportunity
.
Vol. II.X
Oh no, sirno! I am fevered, I am thirsting, I
grant you, to strike the enemy at all hazards; but I
know the risk. I have estimated the danger. The
section to which I go has been exhausted of troops to
supply the army of Cornwallis at Camden. A small
force, scarcely superior to the little one I brought with
me, is all the garrison at Dorchester. The army of
Cornwallis will press the pursuit of Gates into North
Carolina; the results of so great a victory will not be
neglected by the British commander. This movement
will leave the country free for some time; and they
have not men enough below to find me, or rout me
out of the Cypress.
But Marion thought differently as to the probable
course of Cornwallis. He knew the weakness, not only
of the British army, but of the footing upon which their
cause stood in the country. He knew that Cornwallis
had quite enough to do in South, without exposing his
army in North Carolina; and he shook his head in
reply
to the arguments of Singleton, as he suggested his
own doubts of their validity.
But, I know you, Major Singleton, he continued;
and your claims to serve and save your relative if
you can, should be considered. What force will you
require for this?
Twenty men, sir; twenty will do.
Take thirty, sir, if you can get as many to
volunteer
from the force brought with you. I give you no
instructions. I will not fetter your courage or good
sense with any commands of mine. But I counsel you,
sir, not to forget, that neither your own, nor the lives of
your men, are at this period your or their property.
You belong to your country, Major Singleton; and it is
only as one of her sons and defenders, that I am now
willing to save Colonel Walton. Proceed now with
what speed you may; and if safe and successful, you
will seek me out, with the old signals, somewhere near
Black Mingo. Go, sir; and God speed and prosper
you.
The acknowledgments of Singleton were hearty,
though made in haste. He hurried to the men of the low
country, and in few words made known the
circumstances
.
Humphries, Davis, Porgy, the two
Framptons
indeed,
all of the original party from the Cypress
volunteered instantly. He could have had a dozen
more for the enterprise. Black Tom was permitted,
after some difficulty, to attend the party; the obstinate
negro swearing he would not be left: and with this
addition to his limited number, Singleton was soon in
saddle, and pushing fast in pursuit of the enemy.
CHAPTER XXVI.
Then bring me to him. He shall hear from me,
How much I fearhow much I dare to hope.
The
chase was so far unsuccessful. The pursuers
reached the Cypress without having overtaken the
enemy
.
There, however, having discretionary power,
Singleton proceeded earnestly to do what he could
towards
the rescue of his uncle. The good sense, the
skill, and partisan qualities of Humphries, all came
into excellent exercise, and were found immensely
important at this crisis. With him, Singleton conferred
closely, and immediately after his arrival. The result
of the conference was the departure, that night, of
Humphries
,
for the village of Dorchester.
Meanwhile, the individuals of the party in the
Cypress
resumed their old places and habits. Porgy was
quite at home, and not the less pleased that the
eelloving
Oakenburg had forborne to volunteer. He soon
set the peculiar talents of black Tom in requisition;
and a little foraging furnished the scouts with a
sufficient
supply for the evening feast. Of this we need
scarcely say that Singleton ate but little. He was
eminently wretched; and as he wandered gloomily
along the edge of the island, he was not unpleasantly
aroused at hearing the wild laugh, and at meeting the
wolfish visage of the maniac Frampton immediately
beside him.
You are come, said the wretched manyou are
come to see him. You shall see him; he is there,
pointing with his finger. I have put him to watch her
grave, and he watches well; he never leaves it. The
owl and himthey watch together, and one hoots when
the other sleeps. Comeyou shall see.
Singleton could only conjecture the meaning of his
speech; the scattered rays of reason illuminating the
vague obscurity of his language, as a faint flickering of
twilight unveiled imperfectly the crowding blackness
and the strange cluster of objects around them in the
swamp. The firelight fell on the cheek of the
madman
,
and showed Singleton its squalid and miserable,
not less than maniacal expression. He had evidently
suffered from hunger as well as wo.
Come with me, rather, said the partisan, losing for
a moment the feeling of his own wretchedness in that
of the unfortunate being before him. The man
followed
quietly enough, and he led him to where the
rest were busily engaged at supper. Porgy in an
instant
made room for him on the log on which he
himself
was sitting: at the same time he broke the
hoecake
before him, and gave orders to Tom, who stood
conveniently by, to produce the remnants of some
chickens, in the procuring of which, one of the
neighbouring
plantations had suddenly suffered assessment.
But the wild man did not for a moment notice the
invitation
.
He seized Singleton by the arm, and with a
gentle pressure, carried him through the circle to the
spot where his young son was sitting. The elder
rose at his approach; but him he did not regard for a
moment. But when he looked upon the younger, and
beheld the sword at his side, he burst into one of those
dreadful laughs which seemed to indicate, as they
invariably
accompanied, every occasional symptom of his
mental consciousness. The boy stood up before him,
and the hand of the maniac rested upon his head. His
fingers, for a few seconds, played with the fine long
hair of the boy; but, as if satisfied, in a little while
he dashed away from the spot, and hurried back to the
supping-place of the rest.
Poor fellowhe doesn't seem to have eaten for a
month, said Porgy, as the maniac voraciously devoured
the meats set before him. No wonder he's madI
should be mad myself, I doubt not, were I to go
without
eating even a day. I felt something like it on the
Santee.
The maniac ate on, heedless of remark or
observation
;
but sometimes he would pause, and indicate, by
a laughing chuckle, that some faint gleams of
perception
had come into his brain. To the surprise of all,
he did not depart as soon as he had eaten, as had been
his usual custom heretofore; but throwing himself
under
an old tree, he seemed disposed to follow the
example
of several of the rest, who had resigned
themselves
to sleep.
Humphries, meanwhile, had reached Dorchester in
safety. The night was favouringly dark, and he trod
the street in which his father dwelt, in perfect safety.
He penetrated, with cautious steps, and with the utmost
circumspection, into the enclosure, and, successfully,
and unseen by any, made his way to the stables. Here
he remained quiet for a while, until the hour had
fairly
arrived at which the tavern was usually closed for
the night. He then ventured out of his hiding-place,
and went towards the dwelling. But the Royal
George was still open, and still full of guests. A
couple of British soldiers were drinking at the bar;
and there were some four or five of the villagers. The
old landlord had been listening to some narrative which
had greatly awakened his attention. It could be seen
that he was in that awkward situation, when a man
finds it difficult to laugh, and when it is yet expected
that he should do so. The efforts of old Humphries
in this way, were very unhappy. His laughter died
away in a hoarse chuckle; a gurgling, gulping sound
X 2
filled his throat; and the poor fellow turned away to
conceal tears.
And when will he be hung? asked one of the
villagers
.
FridayFriday next, replied one of the soldiers,
gruffly; and that's giving him a dd sight too much
time for any prayer that he can make. I'm for having
it soon over. Just the same with other people as with
myself. No long-winded speeches, say I.
Only three days! continued the villager. Well,
it's a great pity, for he used to be a mighty good man,
and quite a gentleman. And then there's his daughter,
Miss Katharinepoor girl, I wonder if she knows it?
I reckon she does, said another of the villagers,
for I seed the family coach drive in not an hour after
the guard brought him; and, though I didn't see who
was in it, yet I s'pose it couldn't be nobody but her.
Yes, she's come, said the soldier who had just
spoken, and she's been to the colonel, begging him, I
suppose, for mercy. But it's all in my eye and Betty
Martinthe colonel can't help her much.
Yet they did say that Colonel Proctor had a liking
for the young lady. Maybe he might do much on her
behalf for the father.
He can't, even if he would, said the soldier; the
orders came from Lord Cornwallis himself, and it's as
positive as old Jamaica. The colonel has done all he
could. He's let the girl go to her father, and she was
with him when I left the garrison. She's going to put
herself under guard the same as her father, to be with
him all the time.
Poor, poor girl, muttered old Humphries, hastily
turning away. Bless me, where's Bella? Here,
Bella
,
my dear!
Taking a parting draught, the soldiers first, and then
the villagers, withdrew. The old man proceeded to
fasten the doors; and when this was securely done,
the younger Humphries, who had been waiting and
watching, concealed in an inner apartment, made his
appearance
before his father. It was a meeting of
rejoicing
as well as regret; for the old man was proud of his
son, and loved him not less than the daughter. There
were long stories told between them which do not
concern
this narrative. But all relating to Colonel Walton,
his daughter, and the danger before him, was drunk in
by the son with a greedy interest. He ascertained the
place of the colonel's imprisonment; and found, to his
great regret, that it was within the walls of the fort
itself. It was there, and there only, that Katharine
could see him. It was there that she watched and
wept with her father now; and the soul of the
proud-spirited
girl, mortified in many respects, was humbled
to the dust as she contemplated the degrading doom
which her father was destined to undergo. Death on
the battle-field would have been honourable death, in
her estimation; and though, even now, he was to
perish
in the cause of his country, that cause, sacred and
lofty as it was, could not qualify her previous
impressions
of that disgrace which such a mode of death
brought with it. The infamous hangman, the defiling
rope! The aristocratic education, the proud,
unbending
spirit of the noble girl, revolted whenever she
thought upon it. She shuddered to survey the picture
which her imagination continued to describe before her.
She shuddered, and was convulsed at the feet of her
father.
She was permitted to remain with her father
throughout
the day, but was compelled to leave him at a
certain
hour every night. This was an indulgence of
Colonel Proctor, who sympathized with her sufferings,
with all the feelings of the man, and the courtesy of
the honourable gentleman. He deplored and
disapproved
of the judgment of Cornwallis; but, according
to that strict military etiquette, upon which no officer
insisted more rigidly than Proctor, he forebore any
utterance
of opinion on the subject of his superior's
proceedings
,
and only, while he resolved to obey them
rigidly, prepared to temper his severity with all the
softening indulgence which was left discretionary with
him. Katharine felt, and looked her gratitudeher
consciousness of his delicacy and forbearance. Still
it pained her pride to be dependant, even to a degree
so small, upon her country's enemy. She felt this
humiliation also, but, with a proper good sense, she
yielded to circumstances, and showed no sign of such
a feeling
Humphries gathered these particulars from his
father
and sister. He learned that even at that moment
Katharine was at the garrison; that, as the gates were
closed at ten o'clock, she would then be compelled to
leave it; and readily conjecturing that she had made
arrangements for remaining at Dorchester during the
night, he now felt desirous of finding out her place of
residence. There was, however, but one ready mode
of making this discovery, and as the night was dark,
and the object worthy the risk, with a bold
determination
,
he made his arrangements to lurk around the gate
of the fortress, until she should make her appearance.
He could then follow her at a safe distance, and thus
find out her abode.
No sooner determined, than acted upon. He sallied
forth, and, by a circuitous route, reached the point of
observation. Here he waited not long, before the old
family coach made its appearance; and, in half an hour
after, two ladies, escorted by as many officers,
appeared
from the entrance. The ladies were assisted
into the carriage, the officers returned, the gates again
closed, and the vehicle wheeling about to pursue its
way, when Humphries, who had sheltered himself
behind
a tree close in the neighbourhood, now boldly
leaped forward, and mounting behind the coach, was
carried along with it.
They alighted, as he had anticipated, at the lively
dwelling of old Pryor. The sturdy landlord himself
came forth, and pushing aside the negro, assisted the
ladies from the carriage. They entered the house.
and, watching his opportunity, Humphries followed
them. The moment that Pryor was disengaged, the
partisan sought him, and, in private, unfolded
himself
to the pleasantly astonished landlord. A few
moments
more gave him an interview with Katharine and
her aunt. The guise, garb, and expression of the
latter
,
were stiff and old maidish, as usual. Not so with
the former. Her eye was wild, her hair disordered,
her cheeks flushed, and her step quick and convulsive,
while her lips frequently quivered with the thrilling
thoughts that were present and active in her mind.
She hurried forward to meet him upon his entrance;
she seized his hand with unstudied and earnest warmth;
she hailed him as a friendas one sent from
Singleton
.
I cannot talk to you yet, said she, brokenly, I
must wait for breath; but I am gladoh, very glad to
see you.
Sit down, Kate, my love, said the old lady; you
fatigue, you afflict yourself, my dear.
She sank obediently into the chair; but again
immediately
started up, and approached the partisan.
I cannot sitI am in no want of rest, and have
no time for it. Oh, Mr. Humphries! tell mespeak to
mesay what is the hope you bring me!
Major Singleton
She interrupted him.
AyRobertI look to him to save meto save my
father. Where is Robert now?
In the Cypress, Miss KatharineI come from him
now?
Thank God! He has not deserted mehe will
not desert me!
Never, Miss Katharine, I'll answer for it; the
major is never the man to desert you, or anybody
never.
I know itI know it, Mr. Humphries. You do
his noble heart only justice when you say so. He
will not desert mehe will not desert my father. But
I must go to himI must see him, this very night.
He must tell me what he can dowhat he will try to
do for me in this horrible necessity. He must show
me that he will save my father.
And as she spoke, she hastily retied the strings of
her bonnet; and her whole manner was that of one
full of resolution.
Why, what would you do, my child? asked her
aunt.
Go to himgo to Robert Singleton.
My child, don't think of itremember, you're a
lady
A womana daughter! she replied, almost fiercely.
I have no fearsI should have no scruples. If there
be danger or reproach, I will risk it all for my father.
You fear not, Mr. Humphries, to conduct me to your
leader?
It's an ugly road, Miss Katharine, for a lady
mud and water, bog and bush, and mighty crooked.
Is that all! shall such things keep me back from
my duty, when all depends on it? Oh, no! These are
triflesyour difficulties I fear not. Then, turning to
her aunt, who had now risen and seized her arm
persuasively
Your
scruples, my dear aunt, I heed not.
I must go.
The major will be mighty glad to see you, Miss
Katharine, I'm certain; and no harm can come of your
going. I can guide you true to the spot, dark or
daylight
the same; and I'm close and cautious enough
about danger. But you'll have to ride horseback.
I can do itI can do it, she cried eagerly; that
will be no difficulty.
Then we must get you a saddle from Pryorthat's
easy enough too; for I know he's got one, and he'll be
quick to let you have it.
See to itsee to it at once, Mr. Humphries, I pray
you. Let there be no delay.
Humphries hurried off. The aunt strove to change
her resolve, but the fearless girl was inflexible.
Robert Singleton knows me, auntthank God! I
know him. If I did not, I might listen to you now.
Knowing him, I freely confide my name, my life, my
honour to his keeping. I have no fearsnone. But
since he has comesince I have heard his name, and
seen his messengerI have hopesmany hopesgood
hopessweet hopes. He will save my fatherhe will
try with all his soul, and with all his strength; and God
mustGod willprosper him!
Such was the strain with which she rejected her
aunt's entreaties, and persisted in her determination.
When Humphries reappeared with Pryor, announcing
his determination to depart, the old lady, finding she
could not change the resolution of her niece, was for
going along with her in the coach; but Humphries
resisted the suggestion as impracticable.
We can't run the old coach into the bush, if an
enemy pops into the road, ma'am; and it's a chance
we may have to do that before we get to the Cypress, even
at this time of night. The fewer, the easier to hide;
the smaller the bundle, the bigger the hole to cover it.
It won't be an easy journey, ma'am, no how, I tell you.
The old lady was soon discouraged, and consented,
though with great reluctance, to the arrangement which
separated her from Katharine. The latter was soon
ready, and carefully muffled up; she was conducted
by Humphries to the edge of the wood where his own
horse had been concealed, and to which spot Pry or
had punctually carried that intended for the maiden.
They rode with spirit, and soon reached the swamp.
Humphries carefully chose a path, which, if more direct,
and more exposed to detection, was, at least, far more
easily travelled than that which he usually pursued.
He conducted her into safe concealment on the little
rising ridge of sand which Davis had previously chosen
for his proposed fight with Hastings. Here he
persuaded
her to remain, until he should go to the camp
and conduct Singleton to her. She did not hesitate to
do so; the arrangement was more agreeable to her in
many respects, as it spared her the toilsome journey
through the worst portions of the swamp, at the same
time that it promised her that privacy in her interview
with Singleton, which, as we shall see, was absolutely
necessary to its progress. In leaving her, Humphries
saw no impropriety. He knew not of any danger in
the swamp to her; and she was quite too much
absorbed
in her thought of her father's danger, to think for
a single instant on the subject of her own position.
The spot, too, upon which she stood had nothing
terrific
in its aspect. The trees were few, and not gloomy
like those of the swamp. The stars shone down freely
over the bank, and the light was sweet, though faint,
as it fell glistening over the white sands upon which
she stood, and was freely reflected from the glazed
green of the leaves that hung circling about her.
Alighting from her horse, her trusty companion fastened
him to a hanging bough, and promising to return quickly,
rode onward to the camp.
He had not been long gone, when she heard the
rustling of the bush behind her. She turned towards
the spot, and beheld a gigantic figure emerging from
the bush. The intruder was the maniac Frampton. His
fierce habits, wild aspects, dismal shriek, and soiled
and tattered garments, were enough to startle, not a
timid maiden only, but a bold-spirited man. Katharine
might have been alarmed even more than she was, had
he appeared to her as he usually appeared to others.
But a singular change seemed to have come over him.
His step was irresolutehis manner shrinkinghis
countenance full of awe. He continued, however, to
approach; and though really apprehensive, the maiden
firmly held her ground, looked steadily upon him, and
neither screamed nor spoke. But, as he continued to
advance, though slowly and respectfully, she gave back
before him. He then addressed her in a strain which
confounded and astonished.
Fly me not, sweet spiritleave me not in
darkness
hear
mescorn not my prayerI kneel to you
I pray you for pardonhave I not lovedhave I not
revenged you? You know ityou feel ityou have
seen itfly me notI will do moreI swear it on
my knees. Look.
The maniac was prostrate before herhis face prone
in the dusthis hands clasped above his headhis
tones, when he spoke, subdued, and full of humility
She was more terrified at what she saw, as it was now
evident that she was alone with a madman. In this
way, crouching towards her, he continued to rave,
addressing
her as an angelas one departedand
reminding
her, as his wife, of the olden happiness which
they had known togetherthe love they had borne
each other, and which he prayed her still to cherish
for him in heaven. Approaching footsteps startled him
just as he had partly risen to his knees, and while he
was still imploring her after this fashion. The noise
brought to him a momentary consciousness. He seemed
to realize his mistake, and with his fearful laugh,
bounding away, he was sheltered in the neighbouring
bush before Singleton and his comrade had yet reached
the spot where the latter had left the maiden.
Humphries kept aloof, while Singleton met his cousin.
The scene was short between them, but how full of all
that was sweetall that was exciting to both! She
rushed towards him as soon as his person was
distinguished
.
Oh, Robert! I have come to you a beggera
wo-begone
beggar. I have no hope but from youno
confidence but in you. To youto you onlyI bend
my thoughtI turn my eyeI look for lifemy life,
my father's lifeall. Save himsave me!
For this, Katharine, have I come. If I can save
your father, even though at the hazard of my own life,
I shall do so. You have my pledge for this.
Thanks, thanks, dear Robert! my heart thanks
you. But what is your hope, your plan?tell me all,
that I may calculate on your chances, that I may note
their progress, that I may praythat I may assist, if assist
I can, in a work which calls for menfor manhood only.
The question troubled Singleton. What could he tell
her? He himself knew little as yet of the true
condition
of things in Dorchester. No time had yet been
allowed him to devise a scheme or take a step in its
execution. He told her this, and she heard him with
impatience.
But something, dear Robert, must be done, and
quickly. Do not be cold, I pray youdo not
deliberate
Vol. II.Y
too long, or nothing will be done. Hear me, Robert
hear me but a while. You came to me a suitor
you said you loved me, and I believed you, Robert.
He took her hand. She continued
I believed you, and I was pleased to believe. My
pride and my heart both rejoiced in my conquest: but
this I said notthis I showed not to youI did not
reject, though I did not receive your prayer. Now
hear memy hand is in yoursit is yoursI give it
you in love, in pledge, in true affectionit is yours,
and I am yours for ever. Only save my fathersay
to me that you will save him, and here, in this solemn
placethese thick trees, and the spectre-like stars, only
looking wanly down upon us, and bearing witnessI
avow myself your wifeyours, at any moment after,
that you shall name, to bind me such for ever.
He carried her hand to his lipshe kept it there for
a momentthen releasing it, replied
And does Katharine Walton think to buy me to the
performance of a sacred duty? Am I not come to save
himto save or perish with your father? This was
my resolve when I sued for leave to pursue the guard
which brought him to the village. Even your love will
fail to add any thing of strength or spirit to my
determination
.
It is an oath in heaven; and my life for his,
whether you love or hate, whether you receive or reject
my prayer.
Noble, unselfish!true friend, brave cousin! You
will do all for me; you are determined to make me
and mine your debtor. You will not be bought by the
hand which I have placed in yourswhich you have
sought for yearsas you would leave me free still to
any choice upon which my heart has been set. You
are too proud, too noble to take advantage of my
necessities
.
But I will not be outdone thus. I will now
become the suitor in turn; and, Robert, if the poor
charms and the humble virtues of Katharine Walton
be not all gone, in the eyes of her cousin, she offers
them allall, without pledge of service, without hope
of recompense, without any thing in return, but the
noble heart and the true hand which he once proffered
to her.
Singleton caught the high-minded and beautiful
woman
in his arms: the first sacred embrace, the first
mutual kiss of requited love, hallowed and terminated
the scene between them.
He rode forth with her on the way to Dorchester,
taking a circuitous route in his progress, and leaving
her to the conduct of Humphries as they came in sight
of the village. On their way, he gave her a certain
message which she was to bear her fathercontaining
advice and instructions for his government. He also
suggestedmore to satisfy her impatience than with
any certainty of their adoptionvarious plans of
rescue
.
Having a perfect reliance on the skill and
courage
of her lover, not less than upon his affections, she
became more soothed and satisfied by what she heard.
Her hopes grew active and warm, and her sanguine
thought already beheld the freedom of her doomed sire,
obtained by the powerful arm of her adventurous lover.
Let us not, however, anticipate events.
CHAPTER XXVII.
God speedGod speed! the good endeavour stands
An earnest of success; for virtue strives
Still hopeful, when most hopeless.
The
next night found Singleton himself in the
village
.
He could not be persuaded by Humphries to
keep away. The house of old Pryor, who was ready
for any uproar, received him; and there, concealed
even from Aunt Barbara, he contemplated the prospect
before him, and devised more fully his plans for the
rescue of his uncle. His fair cousin was in the same
dwelling, and he engaged her company at such brief
moments
as he could steal from his labours, and she from
the presence of her aunt. Humphries was in the
village
also, having his hiding-place in his father's stable
loft. Obeying his instructions, Davis came to him
there late the same night, and once more found himself
in the presence of the fair coquette, Bella. The Goose
Creeker turned upon her an unfriendly shoulder, and,
humbled as she had been by circumstances of which
Davis knew nothing, his conduct distressed her to a
degree which she could not conceal. She turned
away to conceal her tears, and the heart of the trooper
smote him. When she retired, Humphries bluntly
asked Davis why he was so rough to his sister. The
subject was a delicate one; but the person addressed
was a plain-spoken fellow, who did not scruple at any
time to speak what he thought. Accordingly, he went
over briefly the whole course of difficulty between
them, and particularly insisted upon the preference
shown to Hastings.
But he's dead, man; there's no fear of him now.
I never was afeard of him, Bill; but then I didn't
love him; and the girl that did can't love me, for there's
nothing alike between us.
Oh, pshaw, man! but she didn't love him, you see,
said the other. I know all about it. A gal's a gal,
and there's no helping itshe will be foolish
sometimes
.
There's none of them that don't like a dozen
chaps hanging at their skirtsthat's the fun of the
thing with them; and Bella is jist like all the rest.
But the gal is good stuff after all, you see; for though
I did think when Hastings was dancing about her that
she had a liking after the fellow, I soon found out that
she liked somebody else all the time.
You don't say so! Who? demanded the other,
violently and hurriedly, as if taking the alarm anew at
the prospect of a rivalry, which, whatever might be
his cause of anger with the girl, he had no desire to
hear of.
A man, replied Humphries coolly.
Oh, speak out, Bill. I'm sure I don't care; I
shouldn't quarrel with him for it.
No, I reckon not, when you know him. His name's
Davis.
What Davis?
John.
Whowhatwhy, you don't mean me?
You're mighty dull, John Davis, for a man that's
seen so much of the world. That's you, for certain
gospel-true, now, as I tell you. Bella Humphries, my
sister that is, has really a greater liking for you, in
your way, as a man, and a good swamp sucker, than
for any other body that I know of.
But Bill, old fellow, you're joking now; it's all fun
and foolishness. How do you know, now? what makes
you think so? and chuckling and sidling close to his
companion, Davis wound his arm affectionately round
the neck of Humphries as he listened to this narrative,
and put his doubting inquiries in reply.
How do I know? I'll tell you.
Humphries then proceeded to give a brief account
of the dialogue between Bella and Mother Blonay,
prior to the assault of Hastings upon the former. We
need not describe the joy of Davis on the recital.
That very night an interview between the coquette and
her lover put all things right between them.
But you were cross, Bella, you know; and then
you took such pains to please that fellow.
Yes, I was foolish, John; but you know you had
no patience; and if I only looked at any other body
than yourself, you were all in a blaze, and spoke so
angry that you frightened me more than once. But
you won't be angry with me again, and I promise I'll
love you always, and you only.
Davis made similar promises, and both, perhaps, kept
them. With this, however, we have nothing now to do.
Both Davis and his sweetheart were put in requisition
for the contemplated rescue. Other persons, in the
village, known whigs, were also intrusted with parts of
the general performance; and, in the brief space of time
intervening between the arrival of Singleton in
Dorchester
,
and the day of execution, a bold scheme had been
Y 2
prepared for the rescue of the destined victim. The
partisan discovered that the whole force of Colonel
Proctor at the garrison scarcely exceeded the
command
of a captain; sixty regulars was the estimated
number given him by Humphries. The greater part
of these would in all probability form the escort of the
solemn procession; and these were too numerous, too
well armed, and too well drilled for his little force of
thirty men, unless he could form a scheme of surprise,
by which to distract their attention and defeat their
unanimity. The plan was suggested by old Pryor, and
its boldness won the confidence of Singleton.
Here's the road, Major Singleton, you seehere's
the red clay hill, and here's the blasted tree that's borne
better fruit than was ever born on it. Here comes the
red-coats, dn 'em, I say. Now, look herehere's
the bush, thick enough on both sides to cover a troop
quietly. You fix your men here, and here, and here;
and the guard comes; and here's the colonelhe's in
the centre. What do you want then? Something to
make a noise and a confusion is it? Well, you must
begin
with the crowd; them that's got nothing particular
to do, and that goes only to look on: there'll be enough
of them. Begin with them, I say; only get them
frightened, and when once the fright begins, it goes
like wildfire in dry grassit goes everywhere. First
the people, then the soldiers, all get it; and them that
don't scamper will be sure to be very stupid. When
that's done, all's done. Then you tumble among 'em,
now on one side, now on the other, cutting up and
cutting down, shouting and screaming all the while, till
you've done as much as you think will answer. That's
what you want, is it?
Yeslet us once create the panic without
breaking
our own little force for the purpose, and we will
then take advantage of it. The odds then will not be
so great, and the prospect of success no longer
doubtful
.
Such was the reply of Singleton, whose previous
suggestions Pryor had only adopted and reiterated in
his long and prosy speech. The old man, hitching up
his waistbands with a most provoking gravity,
approached
the chair where the partisan sat, and
whispered
a single sentence in his ear.
Can you do itwill you do it? was the quick
inquiry
of Singleton.
I canI will.
Then set about your preparations directly, and I
shall prepare for the rest.
There was no time for delay, and that night, after
the return of Katharine from her customary visit to her
father, Singleton sought her in private. She was
hopeful
,
but doubtful. The manner and the words of her
lover strengthened and assured her.
Katharine, I have strong hopesvery strong hopes,
though we depend greatly on circumstances. We have
many agents at work, and you too must contribute.
You must go to `The Oaks' to-night, and provide horses,
as many as possible, and of the fleetest. We shall
probably want them all. Have them sent, by daylight,
to the little wood, just above the
He paused, and his cheek grew pale. She
understood
the occasion of his pause. But her spirit was
strong, greatly nerved for the necessity; and, at the
moment, masculine in the highest degree.
The place of executionthe gallowsyou would
say. Go on, go on, Robert. Let me hearlet me
do.
Yes; therein the little wood aboveI shall
station
trusty men to receive and dispose of them. This
you must doand do quickly; and this is allall that
you will be required to perform. To me, and others,
you must leave the rest. Go now, Kate, andhe
passed his arm about her, and his voice grew
tremulous
I
shall not again see you, Katemy ownmy
loveuntil it is all over. If I fail
You must not fail, she cried, hurriedly, starting
from his embrace, and looking almost sternly into his
countenance. You must not fail, Robert; rather than
thathear memy father must not die in shame
the gallows must not pollute himthe rope must not
dishonour his neck. There is an alternativea
dreadful
alternative, Robertbut still an alternative. She
put her hand upon the pistols at his side, as she
concluded
the sentence, wildly, but in a voice subdued to
a whisper, If he must die, there is another mode
another. Only do not hesitate, Robert: if you cannot
save him from death, you may from dishonour. Fear
not to spare him the shame which is worse than death
to his spirit, and quite as dreadful to mine.
She threw her arms around his neck, and sobbed
audibly for an instant.
And if I fall, Kate
In life or death, Robert, I am still yours. She
had withdrawn her face from his bosom as she spoke.
Her glistening eyes, with a holy earnestness, were fixed
upon his own, and truth was in all their language.
How holy, how sweet, how ennobling, how endearing,
was the one kissthe last embrace they took that
night! That night, preceding a day of so muchof
such an awfulinterest to them both. A hurried word
of encouragement from botha parting prayer, sent
up in unison to Heaven from their mutual lips and
united
spiritsand they separatedthe one to pray for that
success for which the other was appointed to fight.
From this conference, the partisan proceeded to
another
with his coadjutors, Humphries and Davis. The
whole plan was then matured, and Bella was made a
party to the labour by her brother. His instructions to
her were simple enough.
Bella, you're not afraid to go to the church, just
before daylight?
Afraid, brother William! no, I'm not afraid; but
what am I to do there?
Listen. Go there by daydawn, and go up to the
steeple.
But how am I to get in?
Through the window; the door will be locked fast
enough, and no getting the key out of old Johnson's
hands. Get in at the window, which you can do easy
enough, and keep quiet until you see the soldiers
marching off with the colonel.
Well?
Watch themyou can see every thing easy enough
from the tower. Look to the red hill, and when you
see them arrived at the foot of it, set the bells a-going
hard as you can, as if you were ringing for dear life;
and ring away until you can't ring any more,you may
then stop. That's all you've got to do. Will you do
it?
But what's it forwhat's the good of it?
No matterI can't tell you now; but it must be
done by somebody, and you're the best one to do it.
Will you promise me?now come, be a good girl, Bella,
and I'll tell John Davis all about you.
The girl promised, and the conspirators then
proceeded
to other preparations, all preliminary, and all
deemed essential to the complete success of their
enterprise
.
They had all returned to the swamp, long
before the daylight opened upon them.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
'Tis the last trial, and the strife must come,
Soon to our peril. But the heart is firm
The rigid muscle setthe steel prepared,
And the thought hopeful of our full success.
The gods befriend and aid us, as we serve,
And battle for the truth.
The
day dawned beautifully and brightly. The sun
rose without a cloud darkening his upward progress,
and the richly variegated woods gladdened in his
beams. The air was balmy, and the wind silent.
The quiet, slumberous day of the intense summer,
unbroken
by warning or discordant sounds, and alive
only in the cheering scream of the bird, and the drowsy
hum of the insect, seemed but indifferently to accord
with the bitter and the gloomy purpose of man. It
was the day of purposed execution. How little did
the spirit of the unconscious and thoughtless nature
harmonize with that having an immortal hope and
destiny, yet so bent upon earthly strife, so busy with
its foolish passions! Alas! that man should take
so few lessons from the sweet ministers of Godthe
bird and the flowersent for his pleasure and his
profit, and which, ministering innocently by song and
sweet to his happiness, should yet so commonly fail to
teach him innocence.
A sad scene was going on in the cell of the destined
victim. His daughter kneeled beside him at daylight
in his prison. She had eheered his solitude with the
sunshine of her own sweet and gentle thoughtsshe
had whispered hope in his ears when he himself
refused
to hope. She had forgotten her own griefs
while ministering to hisand this is the reward which
virtue always brings to duty. How happy was she thus
to minister! how pointless was the shaft of fate to him,
while thus he listened to, and felt her tribute ministry!
In that hour, if he did not hope, he at least felt free
from all the chafings of despair. What if the doom
camewhat if he escaped not the cruel indignity and
the painful deathhad he not hearddid he not feel,
deep in his soul, the prevailing force of those prayers
which the lips of his innocent child sent up for him
momently to Heaven?
Yet, do not flatter yourself too much, my daughter,
he said to her in reply to one of her uttered
anticipations
of relief from Singleton. You must not persuade
me, at least. I must be prepared; and though I shall
certainly contribute all in my power to co-operate with
Robert in any effort which he shall make, I must not the
less prepare to encounter the last trial as unavoidable.
Robert will do what he can, I feel satisfied. But what of
that? His force is small, inferior to that which guards
me, and desperation only may avail in what he attempts.
And he will be desperate, father; he will not strike
feebly, or heartlessly, or hopelessly. Oh no! I know
he will not. He is resolved with all his resolve, and
you know his spirit. He does not sayhe will not tell
me what he intends; but his eyes are so earnest, and
he lookscould you but have seen him, father, when
he promised me to save you, your hope would be like
mine; you would not, you could not, doubt that he
would do it.
I would notI do not doubt, my child, that he will
try
And if Robert tries, father
He interrupted her sanguine speech and the implied
tribute to her lover, folding his arms about her neck,
as she knelt beside him, and placing his lips upon her
forehead.
You are a devoted girl, and Robert may well love
you, my child. Tell me, Katharineit will do me
good to know that his affections are yours, and that
you have not been unmindful of his worth.
How could Ihow? Have we not known him
long enough, my father?
God bless you, KateGod bless you! This, if I
perish, would still be a redeeming pleasure, as I should
then know him to be well rewarded, and be sure that
I leave you with a protector. Your loves, my child,
are hallowed with my blessings, with the prayers for
your good of one who, in a few hours, may be in the
presence of God himself.
She clung to him like a despairing infant.
Speak not thus, my fatherlet me hopedo not
make me doubt that you will be savedthat the bitter
cup will pass by us.
Hopehope on, my childit is your duty. Hope
is one of life's best alliesthe first to come, the last to
desert us. But I need not tell you to hope. You
cannot
help it. Hope and virtue are twins, and
inseparable
;
the one never flies until the other deserts it.
There is no despair for the good.
I believe itI trustand you, too, hope, my father,
if this be true. I feel it in my soul, even as if, at this
moment, I beheld it with my eyes. A good spirit at my
heartGod's spiritis there to assure me of my hope.
Thus cheered and cheering, the two, interrupted
only occasionally by the entrance of the colonel's
sister
,
conversed together from daylight until the
approaching
noon. But, as the hour drew nigh assigned
for the executionwhen the danger began to assume, as
it were, a bodily form and pressure; the thoughts came
thick to the mind; the doubts grew strong and
oppressive
about the heart; the fears seized upon the
flickering
fancies; and imagination, painting in vivid colours
the dreadful circumstances of the approaching time to
the mind's eye of the maiden, greatly served to
overthrow
all the stability of her resolveall the fine
soothing of her hope. She moaned aloud as she clung
now to the neck of her father. In that moment the
nature
of the man grew active, and the contrast between
the two would claim the art of the painter to imbody
to the eye, and the strong imagination, only, could
depict
it to the mind of one not beholding it. He, who
had wept with her before, was now erect and strong.
If it was not hope that strengthened, it was the
courage
and high resolve of fine moral character, strong in
conscious integritystrong in resolvethat lifted up
spirit and form, alike, defyingly, in the face of death.
It is a noble picture, that of a brave man looking out
upon danger, and fearlessly awaiting its approach. It
is a painfully sweet picture, that of the frail woman
storm beaten, storm broken, like a flower stricken to
the earth, and, in its weakness, compelled to rest upon
its bosom; but still smiling, still cheering, still giving
forth love and worship, even as the flower gives forth
perfume, and ready to share the fate which it dreads,
but which it has not the strength to avert.
Such was the picture in the dungeon of Colonel
Walton
.
The masculine spirit was already composed for
the final trialthe last struggle of life, with its
uncompromising
enemy. The man was prepared to meet
death with unshrinking resolution; the gentleman, with
grace and dignity: and when, entering his dungeon,
Colonel Proctor came to his prisonerhis own eyes
suffused
,
and his deportment that of one himself a victim
a victim certainly to humiliation and griefto
announce
the arrival of the hour, he met the unshaken
glance and carriage of one who seemed rather a
conqueror
than a condemned.
Leave us, but a few moments, Colonel Proctorbut
a few moments, and let my servant, Csar, be
summoned
,
if you please. He, only, will attend me.'
Proctor bowed, and departed.
Fatheroh! my fatherit is not the hourit is
not time yetdo not gonot yet! Robert may not be
readynot quite ready. He has to come from the
Cypress
he
has a great deal to do, and will want all the
time he can get.
She clung to him, as if to keep him back. Her
eyes were starting from their sockets, bloodshot and
wandering. Her words came chokingly forthher
frame was convulsed and shivering; her whole manner
that of one in whose mind reason and opposing
apprehensions
were earnestly at strife for the ascendancy. He
lifted her from the floor, as if she had been a child
his own nerves untrembling all the while. He lifted
her to his lips, and calmly kissed her cheek. The
act itself told more than words. He had treated her
as a child, and she understood the gentle form of that
rebuke. She tried to compose herself, and her words,
though equally broken and incoherent, were far more
subdued in their utterance. How tenderhow holy
was that brief communion!
Katharine be firm, my childbe firm, for my sake.
Be firm to prayto pray for my rescue; nor for that
aloneyou must be firm to act.
She grasped his hand, and looked inquiringly.
Robert, he continued, as she listenedRobert,
with that good sense which distinguishes his
proceedings
always, has told you nothing plainly of his present
plan. He knew that you could not well comprehend
military particulars, and that you would better be
satisfied
with his own general assurance, than if he had
undertaken
to show you those arrangements which you must
yet fail to appreciate. To teach only a part of his
design
,
Vol. II.Z
would be to leave the inquiring mind doubtful of the
rest. I can conjecture the design which he has in
view, in part at leastand the horses which you were
required to send him, he has doubtless prepared in
readiness for me along the road, in the event of his
rescuing me. It is for you to contribute something to
the same object. He could not venture across the
bridge, and he therefore made no arrangements in that
quarter, should it suit me to shape my flight to that side
of the rivera desperate man most desperately bent, I
may be disposed to push through my enemies, even
where they are thickest. In that event, there should
be horses there. You must see to this, for your aunt
has none of the necessary energy. Your firmness must
do this, even now. Take the carriage there, and there
remain with it. It may be all to me, and the trust is
now with you.
The object of Walton was not expressed to his
daughter. He had no real idea that he should need
any such assistance; but he well knew that by the
employment of her mind at the most perilous moment,
in a labour of seeming necessity, he should divest it in
reality of its own griefs. Throw responsibility upon
the young mind, if you seek to strengthen it. This
was his design; and its effect was instant. The
belief
that on her resolution now so much was to depend,
alone restored and strengthened her. Yet she could
not so soon recover, and, taking her last embrace
almost in a convulsion, she was hurried away by her
aunt from the mournful dungeon, a few moments before
the officer appeared to conduct the prisoner to the place
of doom. Colonel Proctor himself forebore to attend
the execution. He assigned the task to an inferior
officer
,
his duty not requiring his personal presence. A
strong guard was detached from the garrison, and the
sad procession emerged at midday from the gates.
Major Singleton had well devised his plans, and
prepared, as fully as in his power, for the due
execution
of his purposes. He had brought his troop
before daylight to the spot assigned them. To those
who know the ground, his arrangement will be
readily
comprehended. To those who do not, a few
words may be necessary, and will certainly suffice
for explanation. The road at the point of execution
was on the easy ascent of a small clay hill. The
woods were thick on either hand. On the eastern
side of the wood, a few yards below the gallows,
a small tracka common wagon or neighbourhood
roadwound into the forest, making a turn within a
few paces from the main path, which effectually
concealed
it at that distance from the sight. In this
sheltering
place, one half of Singleton's troop, well mounted
and ready for the charge, lay concealed. On the
opposite
side of the main road, closely hidden in the
wood, some thirty paces above, another portion of his
force, similarly posted and prepared, stood in waiting
for the signal. Three chosen riflemen were assigned
trees at different points of the wood on either hand,
commanding the scene of execution. They were
closely imbowered in the foliage, and the trees,
intervening
,
effectually secured them from the sight, even
though the report of their pieces indicated the
direction
.
Their horses were hitched to swinging boughs
in the wood behind them, ready for their reception the
moment their task should have been finished.
Singleton
himself led the party destined to make the first
charge. To Humphries the other body was assigned.
No instructions were omitted, necessary to bring about
concerted action; and the minutest directionsay, even
to the rifleman who was required to lead the firewere
insisted upon by the young but thoughtful partisan.
Such being the preparation, there was no danger of
the plan failing from hurry or want of coolness.
The little coquette, whom the restoration to the good
regards of John Davis had made the most obliging
little creature that the village had for some time known,
did not forget the part which had been assigned her in
the duties of the day. Clambering over the graves,
with some little feminine trepidation, she made her
way into the church, and from thence into the steeple,
while the stars were yet shining palely in the
heavens
.
She had her dread of ghosts, for she had heard
a thousand stories of their nocturnal habits; but then,
she recollected John Davis, who had given her a
parting
admonition to do ably the task assigned her.
John Davis stood to her at that moment in the place of
a principle; and, like many thousand others of both
sexes, she always understood her duties best when
they came through certain lips, and were insisted upon
by a certain preacher. Man-worship, in those times, as
at present, was not uncommonly mistaken for the most
profound worship of God.
Here she watched patiently and long. Day came,
and from the tower looking forth, she beheld his rising
light with a feeling of relief, if not of joy. The first
faint blush that drove away the stars from the east,
almost
won her worship on this occasion; not only
because
it relieved her gloomy watch, but because of its
own beauty. How natural is the worship of the sun!
How idle to wonder at the pagan who sees in it the
imbodied god of his idolatry! It speaks for a God in
all its aspects, and is worthy of homage, not only as it
so greatly ministers to man, but as it is worthy of its
Creator.
Patiently, hour after hour, until the approaching noon,
did the girl continue close concealed in the steeple,
awaiting the moment which should call for the
execution
of her dutiesand it came at last. The painful
and suppressed tones of the military music reached
her ear, and the gloomy procession emerged from the
gate of the garrison beneath her eye. First came a
small guard, then the prisoner, attended by a
clergyman
,
and then the main body of the guard marching
on either hand. As the fearful notes resounded through
the village, its inhabitants came forth in groups,
joining
the melancholy march, and contributing by their
numbers so much the more to its imposing solemnity.
The prisoner was much beloved in the village and its
neighbourhood, even by those who had taken sides
with the invader; and the knowledge of this fact only
made the hope more strong and active in the bosom of
Singleton, that his plan must be successful. He felt
assured, in the event of a commotion, that none of the
natives would interfere to prevent the rescue of
Walton
or assist in his recovery.
The heart of Bella Humphries thrilled fearfully as
she watched the procession. The imposing martial
array, the gorgeous uniform of the British, their fine,
regular movement, close and well-arrayed order, and
gleaming bayonets, struck terror to her heart, while
they aroused all the enthusiastic admiration of her
mind. Her task was to watch until the cavalcade
should reach a certain point, which, from her elevated
position, she could easily behold over the trees. She
was then to sound the tocsin, and thus furnish the
expected
signal to all the conspirators. Firmly, though
tremblingly, she looked forth upon the array, which
she could readily distinguish in all its parts. There
was the prisoner, seated in the degrading cart; there
was the priest beside him; there the different bodies of
soldiers; and there, hanging upon the skirts, or
crowding
upon the sides of the melancholy procession, came
the villagers and country people. She could even
distinguish Goggle, and his hag-like mother, trudging
along, at a hurried pace, in the front of the
procession
.
The old woman hung upon the arms of her son,
who seemed but partially disposed to carry such a
burden. The savage had not lost a single feature
marking his old identity. He was the same lounging,
shuffling, callous wretch that we have before known
him; and his slow, indifferent movementfor here he
had no mischief to performwas the subject of rebuke
with his own mother.
Come now, Ned, my boymove a bit faster, will
you? The people are coming fast behind, and we shall
see nothing if they get before us.
Why, what's to see, mother? Adrat it, there's
nothing
so much in a fellow hanging. I've seen more than
one, and so have you.
That's true, Ned; but still I like it, and I don't care
how many of these great folks they lift up among the
trees. I hate 'em all, Neddy, boy; for all of them hate
Z 2
you. They keep you down, my sonthey trample
upon youthey laugh at you, and their best word to
you is a curse. God curse 'em for it; I hate 'em all.
Adrat it, but you can't hang 'em; and so what's the
use to talk about it?
If I could! she muttered bitterly between her
closed teeth. The son replied with a laugh,
concluding
the sentence
The trees would be full of such fruit.
Ay, that they would; and I've tried for the power
I've asked for the power over them, but it hasn't
come to me. I've got out of my bed at midnight, when
the night was blackest, and I've called upon the bad
spirits to come to me, and help me to my revenge
on them that have scorned you, and spit upon you, and
called you by scornful names; but I had no learning,
and so the evil ones came not to my aid, though I've
looked for 'em, and longed for 'em, and wanted 'em
badly.
She spoke in the language of disappointment; her
looks and manner both corresponded with the chagrin
which her words expressed. Yet she complained
unjustly
.
The spirits of evil had been serving her to
the utmost extent of their power; but, with the
vulgar
mind, always, the power must have a body and
a sign to the external senses, before its presence will
be recognised or understood.
The ill-favoured son chuckled at the disappointment
she expressed, and with a taste differing from her own,
congratulated her upon their indulgent absence.
Adrat it, mother, but they would have been ugly
company if they had come; and I'm mighty glad they
didn't listen to you. They would ha' made the cabin
too hot to hold us.
Fear not; for they say that the person who calls
them can keep them down, and make 'em only do
what's wanted. I wasn't afraid; they wouldn't have
seen me tremble if they had come, even at midnight,
when I called them. But there goes another that ought
to be strapped up too. He's another great man too,
and has scarlet cushions in his pew at church, while
I must sit on the bare bench in the aisle, as if in God's
house some are to be poor, and some rich.
Adrat it, mother, hush, or they'll hear you. Come
this side, out of the way of the crowdhere to the
left.
Don't carry me where I can't see. I want to see
every thing, and you must get me a place on the hill.
Why, that'll be close by the tree.
That's what I want. I want to see his mouth
when the cart moves.
Dn my heart, if I stand there with you; I'll go
higher up; and so must you. You'll only be in the
way, mother, to go there.
But there I will stand, for my eyes are bad, and I
can't see farther off. You can leave me, if you don't
like it. I can stay by myself.
Adrat it, so I will. I can see very well at a
hundred
yards; that's nigh enough for me: and I don't
like to go too nigh when people's in the notion of
hanging
.
It aint safe.
He hurried the beldam to the hill assigned for the
place of execution. A few paces only separated her
from the fatal tree; and she saw all the desired points
distinctly. The procession moved on; the crowd
gathered
;
the tree was before the doomed victim; and the
officer in command riding up, ordered a halt before it,
and proceeded to make his arrangements, when the
bell sounded: a single stroke and then a pauseas if
the hand grew palsied immediately after. That stroke,
however, so single, so sudden, drew every eye, aroused
all attention; and coming immediately upon the
solemn
feelings induced by the approaching scene in the
minds of all the spectators, it had the effect of
startling
,
for an instant, all who heard it. But when it was
repeatedwhen the painful clamour grew quick and
violent
,
and the rapidly clashing metal thundered forth a
reckless, unregulated peal, varying, yet continuousthe
surprise was complete. In that moment, a new terror
came, close following upon the first. The signal had
been heard and obeyed by the other conspirators, and
wild cries of men, women, and children, coming from
Dorchester, aroused in painful astonishment those
forming
the procession, soldiers as well as people. The
cause of the alarm, in another instant, seemed
explained
to the wondering multitude, as they looked
towards the village. A sudden rush of flamea wide
high columnrose from its centre, and ascended into
the calm atmosphere, like a pyramid. Another, and
another body of flame, in different directions, and the
now distinguishable cry from the village, announced it
to be on fire. The crowdeach individual only
thinking
of his family and household goodsbroke on every
side through the guard clustering around the prisoner;
heedless of the resistance which they offered, and all
unconscious of the present danger. In that moment,
while the alarm was at the highest, and as the officer
struggled to keep his ranks unbroken, the rifle of one
of the marksmen in the tree-top singled him out as a
victim, and he fell beneath the unerring aim which the
rifleman had taken. It was then that the bugle of
Singleton
soundeda clear, quick, and lively note. That
of Humphries, on the opposite quarter, responded, and
the charge of the partisan followed close upon it. The
officer next in command to him who had fallen,
however
surprised, coolly enough prepared to do his duty.
He closed his men around the prisoner with the first
appearance of danger, and when the rushing horses
were heard trooping from the wood, he boldly faced in
the direction of the expected enemy. All this was the
work of an instant. The brands had been well prepared
under the direction of old Pryor; and with the feeling of
a true patriot, his own dwelling had been chosen by him
the very first for destruction. He had piled the
resinous
and rich lightwood in every apartment. He had
filled it with combustibles, and had so prepared it, that
the blaze must be sudden, and the conflagration
complete
.
Three other houses were chosen and prepared
in like manner; and, once ignited, their possessors
rushed away to the place of execution, crying their
alarm aloud, and adding to the wild confusion. Their
cries resounded violently, with a new and more
emphatic
burst, as, coming out of the village, they
appeared
upon the road, just as the bugle of Singleton
had sounded for his charge. The brave partisan had
bent all his energies to his purpose, and he now gave
all his spirit, and all his strength, to its manful
completion
.
His first plunge from the coppice placed him in
front of a presented bayonet. Quick as thought, he
wheeled his steed to the right, avoiding the lunge
which carried the soldier forward. While the
forefeet
of the animal were yet in air, he, as suddenly,
wheeled him back again, and his hoofs were beaten
down, with all his weight, upon the body of the soldier,
who lay crushed and twisting under his legs. This
movement had broken the bristling line, in the centre
of which the strong-limbed partisan now found himself.
He did not stop to calculate. In action, alone, lay his
hope of safety or success. He was penetrating the
square in which his uncle was a prisoner. The fatal
cart was before him, and this was enough to give new
vigour to his effort. Right and left, his heavy sabre
descended
a
sweeping death, defying the opposing steel,
and biting fatally at every stroke. He was well
supported
by his men, and, though not one-half the
number
of his enemies, he had already gained a decided
advantage
,
and made some progress towards his object,
when the charge of Humphries followed up his success.
The lieutenant hurried over the ground, cheering and
shouting. An old woman, feebly tottering to the
road-side
,
stumbled along the path, but he did not pause in
his progress. Indeed, he could not. The troop
followed
himhorseman after horseman went over the
prostrate body, grinding it to the earth, until there was
as little human in its appearance, as there was in the
heart of its owner. She gave but one crya dreadful
scream. It chilled the heart of the brave trooper,
as the hoofs of his steed went down upon her breast.
He knew the voicehe heard the wordsand, hag as
she was, foul and malignant, the appeal to her son, in
the last accents of her lips, was touching in the
extreme
.
It was his name that she cried in her
death-struggle
and
he heard the cry. He emerged from the
bush, where he had been sheltered; but, when the
contest
was clear before him, he again sunk back. He
was cool enough to see that nothing could save the
beldam
he
was calculating enough to risk nothing in an
effort so hopeless. Stealing along the wood, however,
he unslung his rifle, freed his knife from the sheath, and
prepared to take any possible advantage which the
progress of circumstances might afford him.
The fight grew fearful around the cart in which the
prisoner sat. The clergyman leaped into the crowd,
dreading that conspicuousness in the affray which the
situation gave him. Colonel Walton, alone, remained
within it. He had arisen, but his hands were tied;
and, though his feet were free, he yet felt that his
position
was much more secure, as long as the sabre only
was employed, than it would be, without weapons, and
having no use of his hands, in the melee, and under
the feet of the horses. But he shouted encouragingly
to Singleton, who, indeed, needed now no other
encouragement
than his own fierce phrensy. The fury
that impelled him looked little less than madness. He
seemed double-armed and invulnerable. More than
once had a strong combatant opposed him, and
hopelessly
.
He had ploughed his way through the living
wall, with a steel and strength equally irresistible.
Courage, unclecourage! Can you do nothing for
yourself? And, striking as he spoke, down went
another soldier.
I am tied, was the reply as quickly. In the next
moment, leaping from his horse into the centre of the
vehicle, Lance Frampton applied his knife to the
cords.
Hurrah! was the cheering cry of the partisans,
as the prisoner clapped his hands in air, showing their
enlargement. A soldier seized the horse which drew
the cart, by the bridle, and turning his head among the
crowd, sought to lead him off. But the sabre of
Singleton
seemingly
aimed at the soldier, who dodged
it by sinking down while yet holding upon the bridle
was adroitly intended for the horse. It went
resistlessly
through his neck, and falling among the crowd
about him, the animal struggled in the agonies of death,
still farther adding to the confusion. Walton, at that
moment, sprang from the cart, and the partisans
gathered
around him. The guard, considerably diminished,
now collected for a charge; but the pistols of the
partisans
,
which they could now safely venture to employ,
were brought to bear upon them. They recoiled, and
in the moment, Colonel Walton gained the cover of
the wood; another found him mounted: and rushing
forth, with a wild shout, he gave to the enemy an idea
of the presence of some fresher enemy. This was all
that was wanting to the completion of the confusion.
They gave backat first they merely yieldedthen
they broke, and, as the partisans beheld their advantage,
and pressed on to avail themselves of it, the
dismembered
guard fled down the road in the direction of the
village.
Backback! cried Singleton, to his men, as they
prepared to pursue. Enough has been done for our
purposelet us hazard nothing in a rash pursuit.
Then turning to Colonel Walton, in a few brief words,
he congratulated him on his rescue, but urged his
immediate
flight.
Humphries, cried he to that officer, conduct
Colonel Walton to the Cypress instantly. I follow you
with the men. Nay, linger not for me, there is more
to be done if we delay. I will collect the troop.
They would have paused, Colonel Walton in
particular
,
who seemed determined to share all the risks
to which Singleton was subjected; but the latter, at
once, put on the authority with which he was invested,
and sternly commanded immediate and implicit
obedience
to his orders. There was no farther delay.
Walton was soon out of sight, while Singleton,
collecting
his scattered troops, followed hard upon his footsteps.
They fled in seasonjust as Colonel Proctor, who had
now become familiar with the cause of alarm, and sallied
forth with all the remaining garrison, emerged from
the village. The Briton found only the remnant of the
defeated guard; and it was not his policy to pursue, with
so small a force as that under his orders, a body now
almost equal, and flushed with recent victory. Thus
terminated the battle of Dorchester. The victory
was with the partisans, but they paid dearly for it.
Five of their men were slain outright, and an equal
number wounded. The battle, so long as it lasted,
had been sanguinary in the extreme; nor did it
terminate
altogether with the actual conflict. The flames
which had ushered in the conflict, continued to rage
long after it was over; and one-half of the beautiful
town, by close of day, lay in ashes.
How sweet was the meeting of the father with his
child, the day of peril now safely over, in the deep
recesses of the Cypress swamp! There, on the first
tidings of the advantage gained by her friends, she had
repaired in the hope to meet him. Nor had she sought
him there in vain. He himself bore her the first
tidings of his safety; and convulsed with joy, and
almost speechless, she hung upon his neck, feeble and
fainting, with not the strength to speak her emotions.
But when she looked round and saw not her lover,
the thought of his dangerthe doubt of his safety
awakened all her anxieties anew, and brought forth all
her strength.
Tell me that he is safeRobertRobert.
He is, and will soon be here.
They had not long to wait. He came, guiding her to
the spot where her first pledge to him had been given
where the first kiss of a true love had been exchanged
between them: the pledge under better auspices was
gratefully renewed.
And you are now minemine for ever, my own
Katharine.
Yoursyours only, and for ever.
The eye of a father looked on, and sanctioned the
fond embrace, which rewarded the partisan for his peril,
and the maiden for her firm and filial devotion.
But this is not a time for dalliance, my Katharine.
It is enough that I am secure of your affections
enough that you are minewe must part now. Your
father is not yet safenot till we get him into the
camp of Marion. Be satisfied that the immediate
danger is withdrawn; we must try and keep him from
a renewal of it; and can only do so by throwing the
Peedee between him and his enemies. For us, my
love, the hope is strong, though there must still be
doubt. We must part now.
So soon!
Too soon. But we may not linger here with safety.
We are still in danger. This blow will bring Tarleton
upon us, who rides like a madman. ComeI will lead
you to your carriage, and
He bore her away through the copse, and no eye
beheld their parting; but it was sweet, and it was
holy. Her last kiss hung upon his lips, with an
enduring
sweetness, for the long season which intervened
between that period and the hour of their final union.
He returned in a few moments to the swamp, and
there found the maniac Frampton standing upon the
edge of the swamp, in curious observation of the men.
He would have carried him along with the party, and
spoke to him to that effect; but the other appeared
not to heed: and the only glance of consciousness
which he seemed to exhibit was when his fiery eye
rested upon the features of his youthful son.
Singleton
approached, and while persuading him to remove
with his party from the swamp, laid his hand upon
the shoulder of the insane wretch. The effect was
electrical. He bounded away with his demoniac
laugh, and plunging through the creek, fled in the
direction of his wife's burial-place. The partisan
saw that nothing could possibly be done with him,
and bidding his youthful charge, Lance Frampton,
beside him, he put his band in motion, and hurried
forward
,
once more to unite with Marion in the long and
perilous warfare of the swampskept up as it was,
until, step by step, beaten to the Atlantic shores, the
invader fled to his ships, and left the country. But
these events are for other legends. Our present task
is ended.
THE END.